<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89302-0028 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.3-02-89.f2.A1027</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 54, No. 40 / Thursday, March 2, 1989 /Rules and Regulations <ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Office of the Secretary</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">49 CFR Part 24 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[FHWA Docket No. 87-22] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">RIN 2125-AB 85 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Uniform Relocation Assistance and Real Property Acquisition Regulationsfor Federal and Federally Assisted Programs </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Federal Highway Administration (FHWA), DOT.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final rule. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>This regulation establishes a governmentwide single rulefor the implementation of statutory amendments to the Uniform RelocationAssistance and Real Property Acquisition Policies Act of 1970 (the UniformAct) made by the Uniform Relocation Act Amendments of 1987 Title IV ofthe Surface Transportation and Uniform Relocation Assistance Act of 1987(1987 Amendments), Pub. L. 100-17, 101 Stat. 246-256. The Uniform Act appliesto all Federal or federally assisted activities that involve the acquisitionof real property or the displacement of persons, including displacementscaused by rehabilitation and demolition activities. This regulation isintended to ensure that the implementation of the Uniform Act by Federalagencies is, in fact, as uniform and consistent as possible, while encouragingState and local discretion in implementing the Uniform Act's provisions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATE: </T2>This regulation is effective March 2, 1989. Further informationconcerning agency implementation is provided below.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT: </T2>F.D. Luckow, Chief, Program RequirementsDivision, Office of Right-of-Way, HRW-10, (202) 366-0116; or Reid Alsop,Office of the Chief Counsel, HCC-40, (202) 366-1371. The address is FederalHighway Administration, 400 Seventh Street SW., Washington, DC 20590.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2><ITAG tagnum="84">Background </ITAG>This regulation is the final step in the development of a governmentwidesingle rule for implementing the Uniform Act. The background of this developmentis described in considerable detail in the preamble to the interim finalrule issued on December 17, 1987 (52 FR 47994), and the Notice of ProposedRulemaking (NPRM), issued on July 21, 1988 (53 FR 27598), and is not repeatedhere. On February 27, 1985, a Presidential Memorandum was signed and publishedin the <T4>Federal Register </T4>on March 5, 1985 (50 FR 8953), naming the Departmentof Transportation (DOT) as the agency with lead responsibility for theUniform Act. This led to the publication of a multi-agency governmentwidecommon rule on February 27, 1986 (51 FR 7000).The 1987 Amendments named the DOT as lead agency. The Secretary of theDepartment of Transportation has delegated this responsibility to the FederalHighway Administration (FHWA). The 1987 Amendments require the lead agency,in coordination with other Federal agencies, to issue rules, establishprocedures and make interpretations to implement provisions of the UniformAct. <ITAG tagnum="84">Implementation of the 1987 Amendments </ITAG>On Tuesday, May 19, 1987 (52 FR 18768) the FHWA issued a Notice describingsignificant changes in the law and general plans to implement those changes.On Tuesday, December 1, 1987 (52 FR 45667) the FHWA issued a Notice ofRegulatory Intent giving further notice of the specific regulatory actionsthat it and the other affected Federal agencies would take to implementthe 1987 Amendments. A few provisions of the 1987 Amendments upon which the law is explicitand allows for little, if any, administrative discretion or interpretation,and for which a period of public notice and comment would have been impractical,were implemented in an interim final rule in Part 24 issued by FHWA (52FR 47994), on December 17, 1987. On the same day (52 FR 48015) 17 Federal Departments and agencies thatadminister the Uniform Act, and had adopted the governmentwide common rule,published interim final rules rescinding the governmentwide common rulefrom the codification of their regulations and adopting in its place across-reference to the governmentwide single regulation published by FHWAat 49 CFR Part 24. The effective date for these agency rescissions andcross references varied, however all such actions were to take effect onor before April 2, 1989, the date the 1987 Amendments become mandatory.An eighteenth Federal Department, the Department of Housing and Urban Development(HUD), was unable to join the other Federal agencies in publishing an interimfinal rescission and cross referencing action on December 17, 1987, becauseof its need to first satisfy certain Congressional review obligations.HUD subsequently published such an interim rule on February 19, 1988 (53FR 4964). As discussed in the preamble to the NPRM, no comments were received thatobjected to the use of the rescission and cross-referencing actions bythe various Federal agencies concerned to establish a governmentwide singleregulation. The only relevant comment objected to the effective date ofHUD's rescission and cross-referencing action. HUD considered that commentbut does not believe it is feasible to change the date for administrativereasons, in order to best achieve a smooth transition to the new requirementsof the 1987 Amendments. The objective of the February 27, 1985 Presidential memorandum, and oneof the primary goals of the 1987 Amendments, was to establish governmentwideuniformity so as to eliminate the differences and inconsistencies amongFederal agencies that had plagued Federal implementation of the UniformAct since its enactment in 1971. These differences and inconsistencieshad been particularly burdensome to State and local governments that wereadministering a variety of Federal programs, and also, in some cases, resultedin differences in the benefits provided to persons in like circumstances.The 1987 Amendments clearly provide that a single Federal lead agency willpromulgate a governmentwide single rule for the Uniform Act's implementation.Accordingly, other Federal agencies covered by the Act no longer have independentstatutory authority to promulgate their own separate Uniform Act regulationsand, in implementing the Uniform Act, must follow the regulations publishedby the lead agency. The Uniform Act is unique in that it imposes requirementsdirectly upon a large number of Federal and Federally assisted programs,but assigns the authority for the publication of all necessary implementingregulations to one lead agency. (Of course, such regulations will continueto be developed with the participation of HUD and other Federal agencies).Accordingly, because a governmentwide single regulation is required bylaw, because of the unique nature of the Uniform Act, because no commentswere received, and because no useful purpose would be served by having18 Federal agencies take additional regulatory action to formally finalizetheir rescission and cross-reference actions, the interim rescission andcross-reference actions taken by such agencies should henceforth be consideredfinal, and will remain in effect indefinitely. Those departments and agencies, and the parts of the Code of Federal Regulationswhich contain a cross reference to this part, are listed below:<ITAG tagnum="25">Department of Agriculture, 7 CFR Part 21 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Department of Commerce, 15 CFR Part 11 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Department of Defense, 32 CFR Part 259 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Department of Education, 34 CFR Part 15 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Department of Energy, 10 CFR Part 1039 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Environmental Protection Agency, 40 CFR Part 4 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Federal Emergency Management Agency, 44 CFR Part 25 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">General Services Administration, 41 CFR Part 105-51 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Department of Health and Human Services, 45 CFR Part 15 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Department of Housing and Urban Development, 24 CFR Part 42  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Department of the Interior, 41 CFR Part 114-50 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Department of Justice, 41 CFR Part 128-18 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Department of Labor, 29 CFR Part 12 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">National Aeronautics and Space Administration, 14 CFR Part 1208  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Pennsylvania Avenue Development Corporation, 36 CFR Part 904 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Tennessee Valley Authority, 18 CFR Part 1306 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Veterans Administration, 38 CFR Part 25</ITAG>The United States Postal Service will incorporate changes in its full-textregulation at 39 CFR Part 777 to make it consistent with this rule andwill publish its final rule on or before April 2, 1989 in the <T4>Federal Register. </T4> <ITAG tagnum="84">Implementation Dates</ITAG>This final rule replaces the December 17, 1987 interim final rule thatwas contained in 49 CFR Part 24. As is discussed further below, this finalrule is basically the same as the interim final rule except for the additionof provisions implementing those sections of the 1987 Amendments that werenot implemented in the interim final rule. This final rule is the lastregulatory step in the implementation of the 1987 Amendments. The preambleto the interim final rule noted that ``a final rule will replace this interimfinal rule prior to the date the 1987 Amendments become mandatory''.The rescission and cross reference actions taken by the agencies listedabove provided for some differences in the dates when each agency wouldimplement 49 CFR Part 24. (However all the agencies will adopt Part 24on or before April 2, 1989, the date on which the 1987 Amendments becomemandatory). Agency implementation of this final rule is therefore governedby the implementation dates for implementing 49 CFR Part 24 contained inthe various agency's December 17, 1987 rescission and cross reference actions.Generally those actions provide that direct Federal projects, undertakenby a Federal agency itself, will comply with Part 24, and that federallyassisted projects would comply with Part 24 if the recipient of the Federalfinancial assistance was able to comply, except that all programs fundedby the Department of Housing and Urban Development and the EnvironmentalProtection Agency would not comply with Part 24 until April 2, 1989.As was the case with the interim final rule, nothing in this rule prohibitsthe retroactive payment of any additional benefits provided by this rule.Whether to provide any such benefits retroactively depends entirely onan agency's discretion and funding authorities.<ITAG tagnum="84">Comments Received in Response to the NPRM</ITAG>On Thursday, July 21, 1988 (53 FR 27598) the FHWA issued a NPRM for thepurpose of developing a comprehensive, governmentwide single rule for theuniform and consistent implementation of the Uniform Act, as amended.The major changes made by the 1987 amendments include:_Expansion of the Uniform Act coverage to include virtually all activitiesthat receive Federal funds, including those undertaken by private entities._A moderate increase in benefit levels._The establishment of a lead agency to issue a governmentwide single implementingregulation._Providing that the computation of certain relocation benefits be donein accordance with the lead agency regulations, rather than prescribingthe computation method in the statute._Granting States greater flexibility and discretion in implementing theprovisions of the Uniform Act.All members of the public affected by relocation or land acquisition activitiesundertaken or funded by Federal agencies were encouraged to comment onthis NPRM. Comments from interested State and local governments were particularlyrequested.The NPRM was a ``full text'' rule primarily as a convenience to the reader.Comments were specifically requested and desired on changes stemming fromthe 1987 Amendments. Numerous commenters however took the opportunity toagain express an opinion on certain issues that were addressed in the governmentwidecommon rule or in the governmentwide single interim final rule. As such,comments were exhaustively dealt with in the preambles to those rules (51FR 7000 and 52 FR 8015) respectively; they are not repeated in this rulemaking.A description of the regulatory changes proposed for this part were setforth in the NPRM. The only major changes proposed were those requiredby enactment of the 1987 Amendments. Where no such changes were required,the provisions of the governmentwide common rule, as modified by the December17, 1987 interim final rule, were generally repeated in the proposed rule.That is, the proposed rule was basically the same as the common interimfinal rule with the exception of those additional changes that were considerednecessary to fully implement the 1987 Amendments. Comments were invitedon both those non-discretionary changes that were adopted in the December17, 1987, interim final rule and the remaining changes proposed in theNPRM.In furtherance of the statutory objective of securing the views of Stateand local governments and the public in the promulgation of these regulations,the FHWA conducted three public meetings during the comment period followingpublication of the proposed rule.Dates for the meetings were August 17, 1988 in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania,August 22 in Portland, Oregon and August 24 in Chicago, Illinois.The purpose of these meetings was to receive comments on the proposed rulefrom interested parties. These comments are entered in FHWA Docket No.87-22 and have been given full consideration in the development of thefinal rule.In response to the July 21, 1988 <T4>Federal Register </T4> publication, there were a total of 120 commentsreceived at the docket, including those received at the 3 public meetings.These 120 comments represent 101 different organizations or persons: 31State highway administrations, 4 other State level agencies, 19 local publicagencies, 7 private parties, 5 public interest groups, 4 consultants, and31 associations. Most of the associations represented utilities and wereconcerned primarily with their new responsibilities as acquiring agenciesunder the Act or with andSection; 24.307, dealing with discretionary utilityrelocation payments. Comments received from several organizations involvedin the rural electric cooperative industry relating to acquisition activitiesclaimed a significant economic impact on the industry. However, carefulanalysis of the comments indicates that because of their unfamiliaritywith the provisions of the Uniform Act, the respondents have misunderstoodcertain of the requirements of the regulation.Great care and attention have been given to these comments and as mostof the apparent questions concern real property acquisition requirements,these comments have been extensively considered and discussed in andSection;24.101 (b) and (c) of this preamble.There is no basis for expecting that reasonable compliance with this regulationas required by the 1987 Amendments will impose exceptional additional expenditureson the part of the members of the rural electric cooperative industry.A number of unnecessary administrative requirements found in earlier regulationshave been eliminated with a consequent reduction in the burden on affectedentities. Other requirements have been reduced or modified to further thegoals of efficient and cost effective implementation of the Uniform Act.More than 1,200 specific comments were received. Many of the comments weredirected at provisions in the current governmentwide common rule, for whichno changes were proposed in the NPRM, or provisions which are specificallydetermined by the statute. A large number of comments were general statements,or questions, regarding a section or subsection which required no changein the regulation but which are addressed in the appropriate section discussionfollowing in this preamble. A number of respondents had questions about operational details which cannotbe addressed in the rule itself. FHWA will, however, respond to these andother concerns in forthcoming technical advisories and similar instructivememoranda. Except as related to a few specific provisions, which are addressed atthe appropriate places in the preamble, the vast majority of the publiccomments dealt more with clarification of interpretation than with substantivematters. Some commenters suggested different wording or rearranging certain paragraphswithin the rule itself. While a certain amount of such editorial refinementhas been done when it was necessary for clarity, the FHWA recognizes thatthe basic format, as well as most of the specific provisions of this rulemakingwere articulated in the governmentwide common rule, and acquiring and displacingagencies have become familiar with the existing format. To avoid confusion,we therefore have not made wholesale changes in format or location of therespective provisions in this rule merely for editorial preference. Some comments suggested changes that are precluded by statute; however,we are cognizant of the concerns expressed in such comments. We are interestedin the experiences gained by persons and agencies as they operate withinthe framework of this regulation, and will consider legislative changes,if necessary. In addition, an early draft of the NPRM, the NPRM itself, and a draft ofthis final rule were each circulated to affected Federal agencies for theirreview and comment. Further, a number of meetings were held with representativesof interested Federal agencies. Many useful comments were provided duringthis process. We were particularly assisted by the time and expertise providedby HUD. All comments were reviewed and appropriate changes to the proposed rulewere made. A description of the substantive changes from the proposed rulefollows. Other changes not affecting content were made for clarity or readability.<ITAG tagnum="84">Section-by-Section Analysis </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart A_General </ITAG>Section 24.1 Purpose Paragraph (c) was proposed to establish efficient and cost effective implementationas one of the primary purposes of this regulation. Two of the three commentson the paragraph commended the inclusion of the paragraph while the otherindicated misgivings that, without a definition or explanation of the intentof the paragraph, it may appear to some agencies that cost savings aremore important than providing the assistance or protection due an owneror displaced person. This paragraph has been included in the final regulationto emphasize the Federal concern that State and local agencies not be burdenedwith unnecessary regulatory requirements in the implementation of the UniformAct. For this reason, the NPRM preamble discussion of this paragraph calledattention to the waiver provision of andSection; 24.7 and its use to avoidunnecessary delay or administrative burdens. The waiver provision, in turn,is explicit regarding two major considerations. The first is that the Federalagency, before waiving any requirement, must determine that the waiverdoes not reduce any assistance or protection provided to an owner or displacedperson under this regulation. The second is that any request for a waivershall be justified on a case-by-case basis. While FHWA does not interpretcase-by-case to mean, necessarily, a parcel-by-parcel basis, neither doesit encompass the waiver of a requirement on a program-wide scope. The broaderthe scope of the waiver, the more carefully the Federal agency must weighits effect on the assistance and protection to be provided an owner ordisplaced person. Section 24.2 Definitions <T3>Section 24.2(a) Agency. </T3>There were several comments on this paragraphand as a result the paragraph on lead agency has been removed and is nowa separate paragraph (andSection; 24.2) within the definitions. Other respondents suggested deletions, expansions, or other changes inthe remaining definitions. However, the definitions are taken from thestatute and they remain unchanged. As explained in the preamble of theNPRM published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>July 21, 1988, the term ``Agency'' is generallyused throughout this part to encompass all entities subject to the UniformAct. <T3>Section 24.2(d) Comparable replacement dwelling. </T3>Comments werereceived from five entities concerning the definition of the term ``comparablereplacement dwelling.'' The term and its definition originate in the UniformAct and the 1987 Amendments, as stated in the preamble of the NPRM. Theterms ``comparable style of living'' and ``functionally equivalent,'' takentogether, mean that the comparable replacement dwelling selected for computingthe replacement housing payment is located in the same, or same type of,residential development as the acquired dwelling, on a site typical insize for that development; is the same type of dwelling, i.e., single-familyfor single family, apartment for apartment, etc.; and provides the sameor similar amenities within the dwelling. For example, if the displacedperson entertains large groups frequently and the acquired dwelling isarranged to accommodate this living style, then the replacement comparablehouse should also be capable of being arranged in this fashion.This does not, however, require strict and absolute adherence to an exhaustive,detailed, feature-by-feature comparison. A mechanistic approach is notrequired. Reasonable trade-offs can be made. These should reflect the rangeof purposes for which the various features of the replacement dwellingmay be used. Additional discussion about this subject can be found in theappendix.<T3>Section 24.2(d)(8)(i).</T3> A recommendation was received to changethe word ``paid'' to ``offered'' in describing the replacement housingpayment provided to a 180-day owner-occupant. We have retained the currentwording because the computation of the full price differential, as describedin andSection; 24.401(c), is limited to the lesser of the amount needed forpurchase of a comparable replacement dwelling or the actual dwelling purchased.<T3>Section 24.2(d)(8)(ii).</T3> This section has been revised to clarifythat the utility costs for replacement rental housing will be based onestimated average monthly utility costs because the actual utility costswill not be available. For additional clarification of the issue of utilitycosts refer to the discussion in this preamble for andSection; 24.402(b),Rental assistance payment.Eight comments were received about the use of 30 percent of the gross monthlyincome for determining the financial means of displaced tenants. In accordancewith the discussion in the preamble of the NPRM, FHWA examined this issuecarefully before revising andSection; 24.2(d)(8) and andSection; 24.402 Replacementhousing payment for 90-day occupants. The use of 30 percent of gross monthlyincome for all tenants, to meet the statutory requirement that the incomeof a low-income tenant be considered when computing a rental assistancepayment, is still considered to be the most equitable, practical, and appropriatemethod. It is similar to the method used by many agencies such as Statehighway agencies prior to the Common Rule. Additional discussion of thisissue is to be found in this preamble for andSection; 24.402(b) Rental assistancepayment. <T3>Section 24.2(d)(8)(iii).</T3> Eleven comments were received about thepossible eligibility of a less than 90-day occupant for a replacement housingpayment under Housing of last resort. Most objected to this eligibility.Persons who are in occupancy at the time of the initiation of negotiations,but who do not meet the length of occupancy requirements in andSection;andSection;24.401 or 24.402, are displaced persons and are entitled to advisory assistanceand moving payments. They may, also, be entitled to rental assistance underhousing of last resort provisions if comparable rental replacement housingis not available at a rent not greater than 30 percent of the person'sgross monthly household income. This section provides financial means standardsfor a class of displaced persons heretofore called ``subsequent occupants.''When section 205 was amended in 1987, section 205(c)(3) was revised torequire assurances that a person shall not be required to move from a dwellingunless the person has had a reasonable opportunity to relocate to a comparablereplacement dwelling. Since an occupant of less than 90 days is a displacedperson, the necessary criteria for providing a comparable replacement dwellingwas developed. The use of the financial means criteria assure that thedisplaced person will participate in the cost of a comparable replacementdwelling to the maximum extent of his or her financial capability. In responseto another comment, FHWA also addressed the appropriate use of the incomeof those receiving public assistance. If they receive an amount designatedfor shelter and utilities, then that is the amount that should be usedin determining the displaced person's financial means.<T3>Section 24.2(e)</T3> <T3>Contribute materially.</T3> Four comments were received about thisdefinition. Two recommended that all the criteria would have to be presentfor the business to contribute materially to the income of a displacedperson. This is clearly not the case. One preferred that the displacingagency be authorized to develop alternative criteria. This definition hasremained as written. FHWA considers that sufficient flexibility has beenpermitted in the definition of ``contribute materially'' to accommodateunusual circumstances.<T3>Section 24.2(f) Decent, safe, and sanitary dwelling.</T3> Two commentswere received concerning the addition of ``cooling'' to the requirementfor heating. If cooling is determined to be as critical as heating fora particular State or area, a displacing agency may, in a uniform manner,require that an adequate cooling system be provided in a comparable replacementdwelling.<T3>Section 24.2(g)(2)(iv) Persons not displaced.</T3> The NPRM specificallyrequested comments on andSection; 24.2(g)(2)(iv) as to whether certain tenantswho are affected by HUD funded rehabilitation activities should be considered``displaced persons.'' Such tenants are those who are not required to movepermanently because of the federally funded physical alteration of theirdwelling units, or a change in the unit's ownership, but whose rents areincreased following completion of the rehabilitation activities, resultingin the tenants moving elsewhere. The NPRM proposed that such tenants wouldnot be included in the definition of ``displaced person'' if the otherconditions included in andSection; 24.2(g)(2)(iv) were satisfied. These conditionsincluded the opportunity to lease and occupy another dwelling unit in thesame building or complex (without regard to the amount of rent charged)and the payment of any temporary relocation costs.Twenty-two comments were received on this subject. Seven recommended thatthese tenants be covered. Eight recommended the addition of a further conditionmentioned in the NPRM, to provide that, so long as the tenant is offeredan opportunity to rent a decent, safe, and sanitary dwelling for the sameamount as the tenant paid before the rehabilitation project, or 30 percentof the household's gross income, whichever is greater, such tenant wouldnot be considered a displaced person. Two commenters recommended retainingthe language in the NPRM. Three commenters generally opposed consideringsuch tenants as displaced persons. Finally, two comments concerned technicalmatters.HUD recommended that this section be deleted from the regulation, but suggestedthat it could be covered in HUD's various program regulations so that coveragecould be tailored to each affected HUD program. HUD continues to believethat these tenants are not covered by the Uniform Act because the rentalincrease that prompts their move is, in HUD's view, not a direct resultof rehabilitation. However, HUD has indicated its willingness and desireto treat the financial hardship faced by such persons on a program-by-programbasis, and to deal specifically with this issue in developing new regulationsimplementing its several programs assisting residential rehabilitation.Since this issue affects only HUD funded activities, we believe that HUD'sviews should be given great weight. Accordingly, this section has beenrevised to include language similar to that contained in andSection; <T2>XX</T2>.2(f)(2)(iii) of the common governmentwide rule. This wouldnot preclude HUD from providing assistance to such persons in their variousprogram regulations.<T3>Section 24.2(g)(2)(viii).</T3> At the request of one Federal agency,we have changed the term ``sells'' to ``conveys'' in andSection; 24.2(g)(2)(viii).Occasionally, Federal agencies acquire land through exchanges or otheragreements that are not technically ``sales.'' <T3>Section 24.2(k) Initiation of negotiations.</T3> Several respondentscommented on this section. Since it is not practical to try to identifywhat specifically constitutes the initiation of negotiations for each andevery Federal, or federally assisted program, the definition must be somewhatgeneric. Nonetheless, the intent and purpose is reasonably clear. The prefatoryparagraph addresses those situations in which specific Federal programregulations define the meaning of initiation of negotiations for that program.For the bulk of the acquisition on Federal, or federally assisted programs,projects, or activities, the proposed definition is sufficient. We haveadded a definition of Notice of intent to acquire or notice of eligibilityfor relocation assistance, at andSection; 24.2(o), which should help to clarifythe meaning of initiation of negotiations and its relationship to entitlementsunder the Uniform Act. The two controlling points in this set of circumstancesare the action or actions of the agency and the action of the displacedperson. There must be a clear, legitimate and reasonable causal connectionbetween the two. For example, a tenant moving on the basis of having learnedhis landlord had applied for a rehabilitation loan would not establishthe tenant's eligibility for benefits.<T3>Section 24.2(l) Lead agency.</T3> The definition of ``lead agency''was inserted at this point in the definitions, and the following preamblediscussion refers to the new section numbers for the definition in question.<T3>Section 24.2(n) Nonprofit organization.</T3> The definition was revisedto recognize that a non-profit organization must, in addition to havingtax-exempt status under the Internal Revenue Code, be appropriately incorporatedunder the laws of a State as a non-profit organization.<T3>Section 24.2(o) Notice of intent to acquire or notice of eligibilityfor relocation assistance.</T3> This added definition was discussed underandSection; 24.2(k). The purpose of a notice of this nature is to clearlyestablish a displaced person's eligibility for relocation benefits. However,it should be understood that the absence of such a notice does not deprivethe person of eligibility for relocation benefits. The Federal fundingagency, within its own program or project requirements, should developa procedure for the timely delivery of such notices to persons to be displaced,including those affected by activities undertaken prior to the commitmentof Federal financial assistance to the activity.<T3>Section 24.2(p) Programs or projects.</T3> In response to commentsfrom two Federal agencies the definition of ``project'' has been revised.Because of the multiplicity of Federal and federally assisted programsand projects, a single definition must necessarily be extremely general.Each Federal agency will continue to have responsibility for identifyingits programs and projects that are covered by the Uniform Act.<T3> Section 24.2(t) Small business.</T3> A number of respondents commentedon the definition of ``small business.'' Specific comment on the 500 employeethreshold was solicited and the responses ranged from one recommendinga change to a dollar volume criterion; two recommending 20 employees; threerecommending 50 employees; four recommending 100 employees; one recommending250; one respondent recommended the threshold be eliminated and the paymentbe available to any and all businesses; two indicated concern, but hadno threshold number; and ten indicated agreement with the 500 employeethreshold. FHWA's use of a 500 employee threshold for a small businessis in accordance with the Small Business Administration's current definitionof small businesses. Since the purpose of the definition is to facilitatethe application of the small business criterion to the eligibility requirementsfor business re-establishment payments, the definition remains unchangedexcept for the addition of the requirement that there must be at leastone employee at the affected site.<T3>Section 24.2(y) Unlawful occupancy.</T3> The definition of ``unlawfuloccupancy'' has been changed slightly to clarify its applicability. Onecommenter mentioned that local custom, type of tenancy and type of facilitymay dictate different practices in terms of dealing with unlawful occupants.This has been addressed in the modified language. The main point of theother substantive comments received on this definition actually dealt withthe relationship of this provision to andSection; 24.206, Eviction for cause.As these two provisions deal with basic eligibility issues, displacingagencies should be especially aware of the interrelationship. In responseto comments, changes have been made in the eviction for cause provisionwhich is discussed below at andSection; 24.206. While the intent of thisprovision is to generally proscribe certain types of occupants, such assquatters, from eligibility for relocation payments, displacing agenciesare permitted some discretion where specific circumstances may warranta finding that the occupancy is lawful.<T3>Section 24.2(z) Utility costs.</T3> There were eight comments on thisparagraph, five recommended the addition of the cost of trash removal toutility costs. Due to the wide variance in local practices for trash removalranging from ``haul your own'' to free government services, FHWA has notmodified the definition of utility costs. All costs now included are generallyfurnished by public agencies.Section 24.4 Assurances, monitoring and corrective action<T3>Section 24.4(a) Assurances.</T3> Six comments were received on thissection. One comment about the procedures for monitoring local public agenciesconducting highway projects is more appropriately considered under theFHWA's program guidance. Two commenters were concerned about the effectof the regulatory language on their current procedures and practices. Oneagency also asked that the requirement for a ``specific reference to anyState law which the Agency believes provides an exception to section 301or 302 of the Uniform Act'' be deleted and, in its place, the lead agencyrequest each State Attorney General to provide an opinion as to exceptionspermissible under State law. This would, then, be provided to each Stateagency; presumably by the lead agency.We believe the section on Assurances reflects the intent of sections 210and 305 of the Uniform Act; provides reasonable uniformity for all Federalagencies; and should not impose any significant or time-consuming burdenon those agencies with respect to the approval of a State agency's assurances.Neither the Uniform Act, nor this regulation, dictates the length (sentence,paragraph, or page) of a State agency's assurances. The Uniform Act requiresthat assurances be ``satisfactory'' and this regulation requires that assurancesbe ``appropriate,'' and in accordance with sections 210 and 305, for displacingand acquiring agencies respectively. The Federal funding agency determinesthat the assurances meet these requirements.Since it is likely that some State agencies may operate under statuteswhich could provide them with exceptions not available to other State agencies,we believe it necessary for the individual State agencies, on their ownbehalf, to identify any State law which provides them with an exceptionto section 301 or 302 of the Uniform Act. One commenter may have misunderstood the relationship between the assurancesand Subpart G, Certification, as well as the nature of the assurances.The assurances should not be viewed as an alternative to certification.If anything, it is the other way around and, even then, the certificationmust address the requirements of the Uniform Act covered by the assurancesif the certifying State agency intends to assume those responsibilities.The assurances are, therefore, fundamental and it is anticipated that mostState agencies will initially provide assurances to ensure compliance withthe Uniform Act rather than seek approval of a certification application.A State agency must provide these assurances, or obtain a certification,as set forth in both the Act and regulation, as a condition of receivingFederal financial assistance.However, in response to a concern of the Department of Agriculture, agencieswho acquire under the procedures for voluntary transactions, or personswithout the power of eminent domain, will not be required to certify undersection 305 of the Uniform Act. Any agency that displaces persons willhave to provide assurances or be certified for compliance with section210 of the Act.The purpose for providing exceptions to the real property acquisition proceduresin andSection; 24.101(a) is to make it clear that not all acquisitions aresubject to the requirements of Subpart B of this regulation. The sectionis intended to describe circumstances which would exclude specific acquisitionsfrom the application of the regulation; it is not intended to provide thebasis for the exclusion of an entire agency program. Section 24.5  Manner of NoticeTwo comments were received on this section, which is unchanged from previousrequirements in both the Common and the Interim Final Rules. One commentapproved of the requirement and the other comment suggested that the noticeto the owner of the Agency's interest in acquiring property described inandSection; 24.102(b) also be personally served or sent by certified or registeredfirst class mail. No change has been made. Section 24.6 Administration of Jointly-funded ProjectsTwo comments were received on this section, which is essentially unchangedfrom previous requirements, except for the addition of the statutory responsibilityof the lead agency to designate a cognizant agency in the absence of agreementbetween Federal agencies. Neither comment addressed this change and nofurther change has been made.Section 24.7 Federal Agency Waiver of RegulationsTwo comments were received which were specifically related to this section.One noted approval of the provisions as written, the second asked for someexamples of a proper justification, or some basis upon which to make adecision. This section has already been discussed in general in connectionwith comments on andSection; 24.1. Because of the great variety of situationswhich may make seeking a waiver advisable, we do not believe it practicalto provide examples. Examples have a tendency to be both limiting and,conversely, to serve as unreliable justifications or precedents for expansiveinterpretations.The primary concern is that the waiver of a non-statutory requirement inthe regulation does not reduce <T3>any</T3> assistance or protection provided to an owner or displacedperson under this part. There is little doubt that requirements imposedby the Uniform Act may, necessarily, create some delay and administrativeburden. Therefore, it would be inappropriate to grant a waiver based onthe general proposition of delay and administrative burden. The Waiverproposal must be specific and it must protect the rights of owners anddisplaced persons and not be designed to serve some convenience of therequesting agency.The proper implementation of this provision of the regulation requiresthe exercise of good judgement, with proper concern for displaced persons.Section 24.8 Compliance with Other Laws and RegulationsTwo comments were received on this section. One said the list of authoritiesshould include a statute which was already included. The second commentsuggested the inclusion of Executive Order 12630, Governmental Actionsand Interference with Constitutionally Protected Property Rights, and thishas been done.This section was also revised to emphasize that there may be other lawsand regulations to be complied within implementing this regulation andthe list provided is not necessarily all inclusive.Section 24.9 Recordkeeping and reports<T3>Section 24.9(a) Records.</T3> Four comments were received on this section.One appreciated the provision for confidentiality of records. Another askedfor the ``established requirements'' for ``adequate records.'' The adequacyof an agency's records is determined by the ability of those records todemonstrate compliance with this regulation regarding the agency's acquisitionand displacement activities. Two comments were concerned with the 3-yearretention period for records. One suggested an extension to 5 years, theother suggested a period of 3 years after the project is completed. Thereis nothing to prevent an Agency from retaining records for a period longerthan 3 years after final payment to a property owner or displaced person.FHWA has amended the regulation to require retention of records for 3 yearsor in accordance with applicable regulations of the federal funding agency.<T3>Section 24.9(c) Reports.</T3> Special consideration and comment wasrequested on the format and timing of this report. Four comments were favorableto both the format and timing of the report. One comment agreed with theformat, but claimed the information was needed on an annual basis. Twocomments approved of the timing, but wanted the format changed. The finalrespondent wanted both the timing and the format altered. With the exceptionof one suggested format change, to lump all non-residential displacementstogether, the proposed changes are clearly related to the specific programrequirements of the respondents. As such, it would be inappropriate toaddress these concerns with revisions to a report intended to serve, withas little burden as possible, as source material for periodic reports tothe Congress on the principal activities conducted under the Uniform Act.The report format and timing remain unchanged. Section 24.10 Appeals<T3>Section 24.10(b) Actions which may be appealed.</T3> Several commentswere received on this section. The principal concern was that the appealprocess seemed to extend to the question of just compensation. There arewell established procedures in place in every State, and in the Federalgovernment, to handle disagreements involving just compensation. Theseprocedures typically begin with the offer of just compensation and conclude,where necessary, with litigation.What is appealable is found in the Uniform Act and the regulation wherethey refer to the aggrieved person's ``application.'' This refers to theapplication for the benefits of the Uniform Act. The intent of the Actand the regulation is to require that there be a procedure for appealsconcerning the benefits or eligibility conferred by the Uniform Act. Thisprovides an administrative remedy for persons aggrieved by an agency determinationas to his or her benefits or eligibility. Normally this procedure wouldhave to be completed before such person could seek judicial review.<T3>Section 24.10(c) Time limit for initiating appeal.</T3> Two commenterssuggested extending the time limit for initiating an appeal. The responsibilityfor setting the time limit rests with the Agency subject only to the constraintthat it not be less than 60 days after the person receives written notificationof the Agency's determination regarding the person's application or claim.<T3>Section 24.10(h)  Agency official to review appeal.</T3> Several commentswere received about agency appeal processes, the levels of review, andthe official conducting the review, whether from the agency or anotherappropriate hearing officer.The appeal process is an entirely internal process of an agency. The decisionsby the agency about the process must only conform to these regulationsand whatever other administrative rules which the agency must follow. However,as stated in the rule, agencies must advise the person of his or her rightto seek judicial review after the administrative hearing procedure is exhausted.Having considered the comments, FHWA has elected to retain andSection; 24.10as written.<ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart B_Real Property Acquisition </ITAG>Section 24.101 Applicabilityof Acquisition Requirements <T3>Section 24.101(a). </T3>There were a large number of comments on thissection which addresses the applicability of Subpart B and Title III ofthe Uniform Act. Most of the comments expressed a concern with limitedscope of application, and several requested that the voluntary transactioncriteria found in Appendix A of the December 17, 1987 interim final rulebe included. FHWA has substantially revised this section based on the comments. Voluntarytransaction criteria have been included, and a provision has been addedexempting from coverage certain real property transactions between cooperativesand their members. The presence of Federal financial assistance is thebasic determinant for applicability, with exceptions provided for thoseacquisitions listed in andSection; 24.101(a)(1)-(4). Eminent domain authority is not a determining factor by itself, althoughany acquisition made under the threat of eminent domain is clearly subjectto Subpart B requirements because such an acquisition cannot be a voluntarytransaction. Essential to the voluntary transaction process is the requirement thatthe owner must be informed in writing that the property will not be acquiredunless amicable agreement can be reached. However, even though an acquisitionmay be excluded as a voluntary transaction, agencies may choose to followthe Subpart B process. <T3>Section 24.101 (b) and (c). </T3>Certain clarifications have been madein these sections. The change in andSection; 24.101(c), federally-assistedprojects, is applicability ``to the <T3>greatest</T3> extent practicable under State law'' (emphasis supplied),which is the same wording as that found in section 305(a) of the UniformAct. FHWA interprets this to mean an agency must comply if compliance islegally possible under State law. This should be taken into account inan agency's assurances pursuant to andSection; 24.4(a). <T3>Utility companies as acquiring agencies.</T3>_When the Congress amendedthe Uniform Act, it changed the definition of ``State agency'' to include``any person who has the authority to acquire property by eminent domainunder State law.'' Utility companies are the most common example of non-governmentalentities which are granted eminent domain authority. The effect of thischange was, for the first time, to bring utility companies under UniformAct coverage for certain of their projects. Sixteen comments were submitted by or on behalf of utility companies, representingthe views and concerns of many hundreds of individual entities throughtheir associations, cooperatives, and law firms. Almost all of these commentsconcern the possible impact of Subpart B of these regulations upon ruralelectric cooperatives that may receive Federal financial assistance fromthe Rural Electrification Administration (REA) in the Department of Agriculture(USDA). This section of the preamble is devoted to the comments and concerns ofthose entities. FHWA believes that compliance with the Uniform Act andthese regulations will not be as burdensome as some of the commenters perceiveit to be. In addition, as discussed further below, one suggestion, exemptingfrom coverage certain transactions between cooperatives and their members,has been adopted. Following are the substantive issues raised in the comments, with an FHWAreply. 1. The rule should be amended so it would not apply to electric cooperatives.<T3>Reply: </T3>FHWA does not have authority to exempt any entity or groupof entities from compliance. However, as described in some detail later,the regulations intentionally provide much latitude and discretion in howa particular objective may be accomplished. 2. It would appear that all of our projects and acquisitions are coveredby the regulation. <T3>Reply: </T3>There are certain conditions that must be present beforea utility company must comply with Subpart B requirements. Most importantly,there must be Federal financial assistance as defined at andSection; 24.2(j).If Federal involvement is solely the guarantee of a loan from non-Federalsources, for example, the Uniform Act is not applicable. If an individual acquisition qualifies as a voluntary transaction underandSection; 24.101(a)(1), Subpart B requirements do not apply. This may beimportant for non-site specific acquisitions. It was stated in a comment that a condition of membership in a cooperativemay include an obligation to contribute power line rights-of-way. A provisionhas been added in andSection; 24.101(a)(3) to provide that Subpart B requirementsdo not apply if the contribution of real property to a cooperative is madeby a member to meet the requirements of membership agreements, contractsor bylaws. FHWA believes that such cases, where members of cooperativeshave agreed to provide real property to the cooperative as necessary toadvance the common interest of the members, are similar to voluntary transactionsrather than to normal Federal or federally funded acquisition.3. This regulation appears to replace the State eminent domain law underwhich we operate. <T3>Reply: </T3>Both section 305 of the Uniform Act and andSection; 24.101(c)of this part make it clear that the real property acquisition policiesin Title III of the Act and Subpart B of this part are applicable ``tothe greatest extent practicable under State law''. This means that whilecompliance is required if it is not prohibited by State law, these provisionsdo not supercede or overrule any State law requirements. Accordingly, utilitycompanies must continue to comply with the requirements of State eminentdomain law. Section 24.4(a) of this part addresses the assurances of compliancethat must be submitted (generally a one-time action) to the Federal agencyproviding financial assistance. Section 24.101(c) addresses the matterof exceptions to Subpart B provisions because of provisions of State law.A utility company may wish to contact the highway agency in its State forassistance in preparing its assurances in those situations where the sameState eminent domain law applies to both the highway agency and the utilitycompany. The State highway agency should know whether the assurances ofcompliance need to be qualified because of State law. 4. We understand andSection;andSection; 24.102(c)(2) and 24.103(a) to requirean appraisal report containing all of the information listed in andSection;24.103(a) when the property value exceeds $2,500. <T3>Reply: </T3>That is not the intent of these sections. Under the appraisalwaiver provisions of andSection; 24.102(c)(2), the utility company has theoption of not making an appraisal if the value is estimated to be lessthan $2,500, and the valuation problem is simple and straight-forward.See the preamble discussion of that section for further information. Under the appraisal standards in andSection; 24.103(a), the utility companyessentially determines its own appraisal documentation standards and policies,particularly with respect to acquisitions which do not require a detailedappraisal. The intent of this provision is to match the extent of the analysisand documentation to the complexity of the appraisal problem. In difficult, complex valuation situations, andSection; 24.103(a) requirespreparation of a ``detailed'' appraisal, and specifies the minimum contentof such appraisals. The minimum content specifications apply only to detailedappraisal reports. Several commenters missed this point. Finally, there is no necessary connection between the $2,500 appraisalwaiver ceiling, and the need to prepare a detailed appraisal report. Thedecision on when to secure a detailed appraisal lies primarily with theutility company, based on its assessment of the situation. 5. The regulation appears to require that we contract for the servicesof independent appraisers, even though we have well qualified appraiserson our staff. <T3>Reply: </T3>This is incorrect. The use of staff or outside personnelfor appraisal work is entirely at the discretion of the utility company.The only policy which addresses this issue is andSection; 24.103(d), whichessentially states the appraiser must be qualified to perform the work.6. The regulation appears to require that we give the owner a copy of theappraisal, which will hinder negotiations. <T3>Reply: </T3>The regulation does not require that the owner be givena copy of the appraisal. In some cases this is a matter of State law, butin the typical situation it is a negotiation policy decision at the discretionof the Agency. In andSection; 24.102(e), the owner is required to be given a written offerand summary statement which, in very brief terms, amounts to a descriptionof what the offer is for. A utility company may wish to contact the Statehighway agency and obtain a copy of its summary statement form or formatfor use as a guide. 7. These regulations are not appropriate for use in acquiring substationsites. Generally there are many alternative locations available, and oneof the owners will usually be happy to sell a satisfactory site.<T3>Reply: </T3>It was this kind of situation FHWA contemplated when itdeveloped the voluntary transaction policy and criteria found at andSection;24.101(a)(1). If an acquisition meets the criteria, Subpart B requirementsdo not apply. 8. Section 24.102(j) regarding a deposit with the court is in conflictwith our State law on various points. State law specifies a different placefor the deposit, and is likewise specific on how the amount of the depositis to be determined. <T3>Reply: </T3>The provision comes from section 301(4) of the UniformAct, and, as noted above, is applicable to the greatest extent practicableunder State law on federally assisted projects. If State law prescribesa different process there is no conflict because State eminent domain lawprevails. See also andSection; 24.4(a) regarding assurances. 9. Just compensation in our State is based on the before and after rule,rather than the take plus damage rule. If we were to appraise damages separately,as seems to be necessary under andSection; 24.103(a)(5), the appraisal wouldnot be admissable in court. <T3>Reply: </T3>The language in section 301(3) of the Uniform Act recognizesthe differences in State law on what constitutes just compensation. Itwas not FHWA intent to force a different appraisal process. This oversighthas been corrected by the addition of ``where appropriate'' to andSection;24.103(a)(5). 10. The requirement for a review appraisal in andSection; 24.104 should bedeleted except for high value situations. <T3>Reply: </T3>FHWA has not adopted this recommendation because of theimportance we place on the appraisal review function. The comment indicates there may be a misunderstanding. Section 24.104 doesnot require an appraisal by a reviewer (although the reviewer may chooseto do so because of an inadequate appraisal report). Rather, this sectionis intended to require a review of the appraisal or appraisals on a property.The review is an essential part of the process of establishing the amountof the offer of just compensation to be made to the owner. In simplisticterms, the reviewer checks for errors of fact, consistency of value fromproperty to property, and general adequacy of the appraisal as a basisfor the offer of just compensation. Where there is only one appraisal, the reviewer is that critical secondparty involved in the process of setting the amount of the offer. The associationwith andSection; 24.4(c) regarding prevention of fraud, waste, and mismanagementis readily apparent. The reader is directed to the discussion under andSection; 24.104 in AppendixA for further information. As stated there, in low value, uncomplicatedsituations a signature may suffice as the reviewer's statement. The foregoing discussion of issues raised in the comments is intended toassist utility companies and others in the implementation of these regulationsand to describe how the impact of these regulations on cooperatives willbe limited. However, it is possible that there may be other questions thathave not been answered. We encourage any further comments relating to theimpact of this regulation on rural electric cooperatives. Any further commentson this subject will be considered and, if warranted the regulation willbe amended and/or the discussion in the preamble will be supplemented.Most, if not all, Federal financial assistance for utility companies comesthrough the REA of the USDA. FHWA intends to work closely with Departmentalofficials in effecting smooth implementation. Section 24.102 Basic Acquisition Policies <T3>Section 24.102(c)(2). </T3>This section addresses waiver of appraisals.One comment said agencies should have the latitude to decide not to obtainan appraisal where property may be donated without first obtaining a releasefrom the owner. The Agency has that discretion for the under $2,500 value category. A priorrelease is not necessary. However, the FHWA does not agree with extendingthat same policy to all donation situations. An owner may want an appraisaland an offer before making a decision to donate, and it is only fair tomake the owner aware of this option. On the matter of establishing the dollar threshold at $2,500, four statedit was too high, seven said it was too low, and ten stated $2,500 was acceptable.FHWA has decided to retain the proposed threshold. A commenter raised the question of a review where no appraisal has beenmade. Other comments questioned how an Agency is going to know if an acquisitionis worth less than $2,500 in the absence of an appraisal. Section 24.102(c)(2) contemplates that an informed judgment will be madeby a qualified person. While it is not a regulatory requirement, prudencesuggests the value calculation be in writing, and be retained. On the matter of a review: Under andSection; 24.102(d), the Agency is requiredto make a written offer. Offer letters are generally signed by someoneat the management level. It is general FHWA policy to have not less thantwo people involved in setting the amount of an offer of just compensation.This process would constitute a review where no appraisal is made. Preciselyhow such matters will be handled is within Agency discretion. A few comments objected to waiving an appraisal for any reason. An Agencyhas no obligation to waive the appraisal of an acquisition if it prefersnot to. Section 24.103 Criteria for Appraisals <T3>Section 24.103(a). </T3>One Agency described how it intended to integratethe appraisal waiver provision in andSection; 24.102(c)(2) with this sectionon appraisal standards. Many other variations are also possible, but thecomment is summarized here for purposes of illustration. In brief, negotiatorswill be instructed to clearly explain to the owner the right to have anappraisal made and in no way pressure the owner to sign a waiver; acquisitionsvalued between $500 and $2,500 are to be supported by sales in the projectarea, and will be approved by a review appraiser prior to negotiations.As described, this Agency intends to do more than the minimum: An appraisalwould always be a property owner option; some value documentation willbe a requirement; and a reviewer's approval is necessary in certain circumstances.This description is intended to illustrate the latitude an agency has inimplementing the provisions of this Subpart. <T3>Section 24.103(a)(2). </T3>One comment recommended the requirementfor a 5-year sales history be cut back to two or three years. This recommendationwas not adopted, primarily because it applies only when a detailed appraisalis necessary. When a detailed appraisal is not necessary, the agency mayset a different standard.<T3>Section 24.103(a)(3).</T3> A comment recommended that a statement beadded to the effect that the appraiser must explain the absence of morerecent sales data when the sales used are over 6 months old. This is viewedas a good business practice on the part of the appraiser, but not as anessential regulatory requirement. <T3>Section 24.103(e). </T3>Three comments recommended an increase in thedollar threshold from $2,500 to $5,000 where the same person can both appraiseand negotiate. The FHWA has not adopted this recommendation because supportfor the increase is not widespread. Section 24.104 Review of appraisals <T3>Section 24.104(b).</T3> In response to a comment, a minor editorialclarification has been made to this section regarding the role of the reviewingappraiser in establishment of the Agency's offer of just compensation.Section 24.105 Acquisition of Tenant-owned ImprovementsFour comments expressed a concern with the matter of adequately protectingthe rights of a tenant owner of improvements. One of these comments recommendedspecific reference to tenant owners be made at many points within SubpartB.FHWA has made no change because it believes tenant owner interests areadequately protected. The language of Subpart B is based on the premisethat if a tenant can demonstrate an ownership interest in real property,that person is an owner of real property to be acquired for purposes ofthis regulation, and is to be treated as such.<T3>Section 24.105(c).</T3> Five comments stated that contributory valueor salvage value measures of compensation to a tenant-owner are not fairand equitable when the appraiser finds that all of the value is in theland, with no value attributable to the improvement. As a consequence,they recommended a ``value in place'' measure of compensation be addedto this section.FHWA appreciates the difficulty this circumstance presents, but the provisionsof Section 302 of the Uniform Act do not permit it to accommodate the recommendation.Section 302 specifies contributory value, or value for removal (which hasbeen implemented as salvage value) as the measures of compensation.However, there is some latitude available under andSection; 24.105(e). Paymentunder ``other applicable law'' could include provisions of State law and/orrelocation assistance benefits. Also, contributory value can be viewedon a temporary basis in the valuation estimate process. FHWA believes thebasic objective is payment of an amount of compensation which is just,reasonable, and fair.Two comments were received from representatives of the outdoor advertisingindustry. Both comments focused on the way advertising signs are treatedby andSection;andSection; 24.2(q), 24.105, and 24.303(e) of the regulation.They suggested that, pursuant to section 302 of the Uniform Act, all advertisingsigns covered by the Uniform Act should be acquired as tenant owned improvements,and that the value of a sign in place before removal should be used indetermining the owner's compensation. Neither of these suggestions havebeen adopted. Specific language concerning advertising signs in section 101(7)(D) ofthe Uniform Act makes it clear that some, if not all, signowners shouldbe entitled to moving and related expenses under section 202 of the UniformAct, rather than to compensation for a sign's acquisition under section302. Furthermore, that language in section 101(7)(D) was amended in the1987 Amendments to broaden the benefits available to signowners under section202. For many years, FHWA has reconciled the specific language in section101(7)(D) of the Uniform Act and the more general language concerning tenantimprovements in section 302 of the Act by providing that an advertisingsign considered to be personal property under State law should receivethe relocation benefits provided by section 202, and if considered to bereal property, it should be acquired in accordance with section 302. FHWAbelieves this is the most reasonable interpretation of the provisions ofthe Uniform Act, and it continues to be reflected in this final rule.When a sign is acquired under section 302, subsection 302(b)(1) providesthat its owner should receive the greater of its contributory value tothe real property or its ``fair market value * * * for removal from thereal property.'' FHWA interprets this phrase to mean that removal of the sign must be takeninto consideration in determining ``fair market value for removal,'' andbelieves this is done in andSection;andSection; 24.105 and 24.2(q) of the regulation.<ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart C_General Relocation Requirements </ITAG>Section 24.203 RelocationNotices <T3>Section 24.203(a). </T3>A comment was received that the term ``as soonas feasible'' was not sufficiently specific. FHWA considers this term tomean ``as soon as practical'' and does not believe that any further elaborationis necessary. This comment and several other similar comments addressedto this section may have merit in individual situations, but do not necessitatechanges in the regulations. Displacing agencies may wish to clarify particularmatters that are of concern to them in their operating instructions. <T3>Section 24.203(b). </T3>In response to one comment, a definition of``Notice of intent to acquire or notice of relocation eligibility'' hasbeen added at andSection; 24.2(o). Section 24.205 Relocation Planning, Advisory Services, and Coordination<T3>Section 24.205(a) Relocation planning. </T3>There were 13 commentsconcerning relocation planning. Most were in favor of the planning concept,but were concerned about how relocation plans could hinder project development.The relocation planning required by this section should be a tool to assistin the orderly development of a project and should be considered in thislight by both the displacing agency and the funding agency. FHWA believesthat most displacing agencies are well aware of the program or projectbenefits which can be derived through early and sound relocation planningand many agencies currently use comprehensive planning techniques in projectdevelopment. We do not view relocation planning as a complicated, timeconsuming activity. We see relocation planning as a process which providesmeaningful information to program and project decision makers. It doesnot need to result in a detailed document containing unnecessary data andneedless problem solving. Instead, it should be a process which is scopedto the complexity and nature of anticipated program or project relocationactivity and should not require a burdensome commitment of Agency resources.Language emphasizing this has been added to this section. In response toseveral comments, there is no requirement that planning documents be submittedfor approval to the funding agency at any stage of a project or program.Planning is the responsibility of the displacing agency. <T3>Section 24.205(c) Relocation assistance advisory services. </T3>Severalcomments were received concerning relocation assistance advisory services.Three comments objected to the requirement to provide transportation toinspect housing in andSection; 24.205(c)(2)(ii)(D). This provision is notnew and has been a part of the common rule for implementation of the UniformAct since that rule was first promulgated by DOT on March 5, 1985 (50 FR8955 (1985)). It is the obligation of the displacing agency to assure thatboth owners and tenants are able to inspect the housing to which they arereferred. There is no evidence to suggest that this service has been abusedby displaced persons. <T3>Section 24.205(c)(2)(iii). </T3>At the suggestion of one commenter,the words ``comparable and'' have been removed from this section. The emphasisis on the identification of suitable property locations for business andfarm operations. <T3>Section 24.205(c)(2)(vi). </T3>The provision of advisory services toa person who initially occupies property after it is acquired by the agencyis required by the statute. Therefore, it cannot be deleted as recommendedby several commenters. These persons are not displaced persons, but areeligible for advisory services. Section 24.206 Eviction for Cause In response to comments, this provision has been modified in several respects.HUD, in its program regulations dealing with displacements caused by otherthan State-agency acquisition, has long recognized eviction for cause asa basis for denying eligibility for relocation benefits. Now that the UniformAct and these implementing regulations apply to this broader array of displacementactivities, it is necessary that valid evictions continue to be recognizedas a factor that can extinguish potential rights to relocation payments.At the same time, it is important that otherwise entitled persons not bedenied relocation payments by an eviction undertaken for the purpose ofevading an obligation to make relocation assistance available, or for minorviolations of a lease. Accordingly, this final rule retains the major thrust of the eviction forcause section, which has been a part of the governmentwide common rulesince 1986, that persons lawfully occupying property at the time of theinitiation of negotiations will continue to have a presumptive entitlementto relocation payments. However, modifications have been included to clarify that payments maybe denied in certain circumstances. Thus, a person who is evicted for causeprior to the initiation of negotiations may be denied payment even if thatperson vacates the premises after the initiation of negotiations. In addition,persons who seriously or repeatedly violate material terms of the leaseor occupancy agreement may be evicted even if the eviction proceeding isbegun after the initiation of negotiations. In either case, the Agency must assure itself that the eviction actionis not undertaken to evade the protections of the Uniform Act. Such evictionfor cause circumstances should arise only infrequently and Federal fundingagencies will be expected to ensure that this provision is not misused.Section 24.207 General Requirements_Claims for Relocation Payments<T3>Section 24.207 (f) </T3>Deductions from relocation payments. This sectionhas remained the same as was published as part of the common rule in theMarch 5, 1985 <T4>Federal Register.</T4> Section 24.207 continues to allow agencies todeduct a person's unpaid rent owed to the Agency from the person's relocationpayment in cases where it will not prevent the person from obtaining acomparable replacement dwelling. Since the relocation payment is not tobe considered income (andSection; 24.208) and is provided for the particularpurpose of obtaining replacement housing for the displaced person, it cannotbe released to other creditors without assurances that comparable decent,safe, and sanitary housing will be available to the displaced person.<ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart D_Payments for Moving and Related Expenses</ITAG>In addition to comments on proposed rule changes, a number of commentsreceived on this subpart were requests for clarification. Ordinarily, suchclarification would be provided by technical advisory guidance. However,to be responsive to the comments, we have summarized the answers to someof these below. Section 24.306 in the NPRM has been renumbered as andSection; 24.304 andandSection; 24.304 has been renumbered as andSection; 24.306 to provide a bettergrouping of topics. The numbers used below are those used in this finalrule. Section 24.301  Payment for Actual Reasonable Moving and Related Expenses_ResidentialMoves Questions were received about payment for the storage of personal propertycovered in andSection; 24.301(d). As with all other moving expenses, theAgency determines what storage costs are reasonable and necessary for amove to take place. If the Agency determines storage to be necessary, thecosts of moving the personal property to and from storage would also beeligible for payment. Boarding of animals is not considered to be storage. Section 24.302 Fixed Payment for Moving Expenses_ Residential Moves There were numerous comments concerning the $50 fixed payment for movingexpenses provided in andSection; 24.302. FHWA has clarified the languageof this exception to apply only to persons with minimal personal possessionswho are in occupancy of a dormitory-style room shared by two or more unrelatedpersons, or a person whose residential move is performed by an agency atno expense to the person. This language is also reflected in the movingexpense schedule which is published by FHWA elsewhere in this Part II oftoday's <T4>Federal Register.</T4>Section 24.303 Payment for Actual Reasonable Moving and Related Expenses_NonresidentialMoves<T3>Sections 24.303(a)(3) and 24.304(a)(4). </T3>Four comments asked forclarification of the difference in treatment of utilities in these twosections. The expenses for providing utilities under andSection; 24.303(a)(3)are those costs incurred to attach relocated personal property to utilityservice already provided on-site, such as electrical boxes, gas meters,and water meters. Modifications to the equipment or to the on-site utilityservice may also be eligible, if necessary. These costs must be necessaryto reinstall personal property that has been moved from a displacementsite or newly installed at such site and would generally only benefit therelocated business operation. Section 24.304(a)(4) provides for makingelectrical and other services available to the replacement site. Thesecosts may be necessary to make the real property suitable for the businessoperation and could generally enhance the value of the real property. Costsunder andSection; 24.304(a)(4) are limited by statute to $10,000 for allreestablishment expenses. Costs under andSection; 24.303(a)(3) are limitedto what is necessary, without dollar limitation.<T3> Section 24.303(a)(9).</T3> There were several comments about reletteringof signs and replacing stationery made obsolete as a result of a move.This section covers those business items typically used by a business forthe purpose of advising its customers and the public of the location ofthe business. If a displacing agency considers other items appropriatefor this category, it may use the waiver procedures in andSection; 24.7 ona case-by-case basis.<T3> Section 24.303(a)(10).</T3> One commenter suggested that an acquiringagency could become responsible under the requirements of this sectionfor abandoned personal property that could be considered hazardous material.This is not a Uniform Act issue, but an issue typically governed by Federalor State laws governing the proper disposal of hazardous material.<T3>Section 24.303(a)(13).</T3> Two comments stated that the $1,000 limiton the cost of searching for a replacement location was not adequate forsome business and farm operations. The displacing agency may use the waiverprocedures in andSection; 24.7 on a case-by-case basis if a displaced businessor farm operation has unique requirements or circumstances.<T3>Section 24.303(c). </T3>Questions were received about self-moves ofbusiness or farm operations. This section does not preclude actual costself-moves supported by records and receipts of the costs incurred. TheAgency may use moving costs findings prepared by qualified staff, estimatesobtained by the Agency, or if acceptable to the Agency, estimates obtainedby the business or farm operator. A single moving cost finding for a lowcost or uncomplicated move prepared by qualified staff is a ``single bidor estimate'' for purposes of this section.Section 24.304 Reestablishment Expenses_Nonresidential Moves Twenty eight commenters provided comments on this section. While generallyin agreement with the list of eligible expenses in andSection; 24.304(a),the majority thought that the dollar limits should be removed from thethree categories where limits are imposed. We have elected to retain thedollar limits which serve as cost controls for expenses which we believeto be most vulnerable to abuse. Since it is the Agency's prerogative todetermine which reestablishment expenses are reasonable and necessary andsince andSection; 24.304(a)(13) allows the Agency to request a waiver fromthe Federal funding agency within the $10,000 statutory maximum, thereis sufficient flexibility provided to the Agency. On the other hand, thestated limits of $5,000 for increased operating costs and $1,500 for exteriorsigning are considered to be reasonable in most cases, and may assist abusiness owner in making appropriate decisions about a new business siteand the size and type of signing for the new business site. The inclusionof increased costs of operations as an eligible expense in andSection; 24.304(a)(10)was also commented upon. The Uniform Act's legislative history supportsthe inclusion of these expenses. Since the costs of operation are legitimatereportable business expenses, the income tax records of most businessesshould be adequate to provide a record of such costs prior to displacement.The costs at the new location can be established or estimated using suchsources as the new leases, utility company projections for utility chargesand taxing authority records for tax increases. <T3>Section 24.304(b)(6). </T3>This section has been deleted. The 1987Amendments exclude ``a person whose sole business at the displacement dwellingin the rental of such property to others . . .'' from qualifying for an``in lieu'' payment (see andSection; 24.306(a)(4)). This exclusion, however,does not extend to reestablishment expenses. Section 24.306 Fixed Payment for Moving Expenses_Nonresidential MovesComments were received from 20 sources on this section. Recommendationswere made to pay the fixed payment as an option to a business with no criteriaor, conversely, to pay the fixed payment only if the business was discontinued.The additional criteria added in the NPRM were also commented upon. Severalwanted to add additional criteria. One commenter wanted different criteriafor farm operations than for businesses. A number of comments were receivedthat would make the owners of residential property ineligible for thispayment. Others thought that the owners of leased commercial property shouldalso be ineligible. FHWA has not changed this section. The fixed payment is an alternativeto the payments for moving and reestablishing a business, farm, or nonprofitorganization. The new criteria are added to either clarify eligibility,correct inequities, or implement new statutory exclusions as explainedin the preamble of the NPRM. The displacing agency retains the flexibilityto determine the basic eligibility based on the substantial loss of existingpatronage criteria and gains criteria that can readily be explained todisplaced persons. There is no requirement now, nor has there ever been such a requirement,that a displaced business must be discontinued to receive this payment.Similarly, this payment has been and continues to be available to otherwiseeligible businesses that do discontinue operations. There is also no requirementthat a business be without a source of income as suggested by three commenters.Establishing separate income and payment criteria for farm operations wouldnot be appropriate at this time. There were several comments concerning the perceived inequity of the ineligibilityof owners of rental residential property for a fixed payment while ownersof other rental property remained eligible. FHWA has corrected this inequityby, generally, excluding owners of rental property from eligibility fornon-residential fixed payment. <T3>Section 24.306(d) Nonprofit organization. </T3>There were a varietyof comments concerning the minimal fixed payment of $2,500 in lieu of actualmoving expenses. Most of them favored increasing the payment availableto nonprofit organizations. In response, FHWA has revised the payment tononprofit organizations to range from $1,000 to $20,000 based on criteriasimilar to businesses, i.e. the average annual revenue for 2 years minusoperating expenses. This procedure will be more equitable for nonprofitorganizations. <T3>Section 24.306(e) Average annual net earnings of a business or farmoperation. </T3>Several comments were received about the computation ofaverage annual net earnings when business or farm operations suffer a netloss for any year. There are several ways to compute net losses. Some agencieshave used ``0'' if the net earnings result in a net loss. Other agenciesuse the actual net loss figure. Either method is acceptable if used uniformlyby a funding agency.Section 24.307 Discretionary Utility Relocation PaymentsA few respondents urged that the reimbursement of extraordinary expensesbe made mandatory, while several others indicated the discretion giventhe displacing agency should be retained. The discretionary language, ``thedisplacing agency may, at its option,'' has been retained because the 1987Amendments and the Conference Report accompanying them are quite clearthat this payment is intended to be at the discretion, or option, of thedisplacing agency. It would not be appropriate to make mandatory by regulationthat which was left clearly permissive by statute. <T3>Section 24.307(a)(5).</T3> A number of respondents objected to thelanguage in the NPRM which requires that State or local reimbursement be``permitted by State statute.'' The principal thrust of the objectionswas that this language meant that unless there was a specific State statutepermitting the payment, no payment could be considered. FHWA agrees thatthe proposed language could be subject to misinterpretation and have revisedthe subsection, to provide that reimbursement must be ``in accordance withState law.'' This conforms to the clear intent of Congress, as expressedin the Conference Report that accompanied the 1987 Amendments.<T3>Section 24.307(b) Extraordinary expenses. </T3>Six comments expressedconcern with this section's definition of ``extraordinary expenses.'' Threeof the comments recommended changes which would permit certain expenses,even though ordinarily budgeted, to be considered as ``not routine or predictableexpenses'' and, therefore, qualify as ``extraordinary expenses.'' FHWAhas not adopted these recommendations. It is the expressed intent of Congress,as found in the Conference Report, that ``utilities would continue to paythose ordinary relocation costs within their reasonable contemplation asoccupants of local rights-of-way * * *'' FHWA believes the language ofthis section will allow a utility company to present its case for thoseexpenses which it considers to be ``not routine or predictable'' and notordinarily budgeted as operating expenses.Four comments urged removal of the provision which would exclude from extraordinaryexpenses those expenses which the utility company has explicitly and knowinglyagreed to bear as a condition for use of the right-of-way. Again the languageof the rule represents the clear intent of Congress as expressed in theConference Report accompanying the 1987 Amendments.While we are cognizant of the concerns presented by the public utilityindustry, we believe this rule clearly expresses the intent of Congress,and, as a consequence, andSection; 24.307(b) is unchanged.<ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart E_Replacement housing payments</ITAG>Section 24.401 ReplacementHousing Payment for 180-Day Homeowner-Occupants<T3>Section 24.401(a)(2).</T3> Several comments were received about theextension of eligibility for a replacement housing payment beyond one yearfor good cause. In response, the meaning of ``for good cause'' has beenamplified in the appendix.<T3>Section 24.401(a)(2)(i).</T3> Comments were received about the appropriate``start'' date for the one-year eligibility for a replacement housing paymentin the case of condemnation. In response FHWA has clarified that the one-yearperiod starts when the full amount of estimated just compensation is depositedin the court. This may be the Agency's proffered amount or a commissioners'award, if appropriate. In either case, the Agency does not need to delaythe one-year start date until final adjudication.<T3>Section 24.401(a)(2)(ii).</T3> This section has been changed to conformwith the amendments of section 203(a)(2) of the Uniform Act made by section406(5) of the 1987 Amendments. Several comments were received about thedifferences between the criteria for eligibility for 180 day owner-occupantsand 90 day owner-occupants and tenants. The change in criteria for 180day owner-occupants is statutory. There is no requirement that changesbe made in criteria for 90 day owner-occupants and tenants. The ``datethe displaced person moves'' is a simpler criterion to use than the ``datethe displacing agency's obligation under andSection; 24.204 is met'' andhas been retained where feasible.<T3>Section 24.401(d).</T3> Thirty-one comments were received concerningthe method for computing increased mortgage interest payments. The commenterswere about evenly split between preference for the buydown method as presentedin the body of the NPRM, and the buydown method presented in the preamble.A few wanted the option of using the former annuity or amortization methodif it should prove less expensive for the Agency.The discussions in favor of the simplified buydown method presented inthe preamble emphasized the cost-savings and time-savings to the Agency,and the ability of a displaced person to plan his or her replacement housingpurchase knowing the full amount of payments to which such person is entitled.The view of these commenters was that this would not create a windfallbecause the displaced person still had to acquire a decent, safe, and sanitaryreplacement dwelling to be eligible; only the financing terms were hisor her choice. Several comments were also made that the displaced personcould readily understand the concept that an interest rate at less thancurrent market interest rates was an asset and the computed payment wasrelated to this fact.On the other hand, those comments that favored the language in the bodyof the NPRM were concerned that a windfall would be created if a personpaid cash for the replacement dwelling or assumed an existing mortgageat a lower interest rate than the computed rate. There was also a questionof the legality for the preamble alternate, and concern that making thepayment available on terms other than those actually used in the purchaseof a replacement dwelling would not satisfy the statutory language.FHWA has elected to retain the procedure in the body of the NPRM. Thisprocedure requires that an estimate of the amount of the payment be providedto the person. Such estimate shall be based on the current prevailing ratefor fixed-rate mortgages and subsequent payment based on the actual mortgageterms obtained. This process will require advisory services to the displacedperson to enable such person to be prudent in the financing of his or herreplacement dwelling.In response to comments received, FHWA has revised andSection; 24.401(d)(2),by adopting the language in andSection; <T2>XX</T2>.401(d)(3) of the common governmentwide rule, to provide thatthe payment shall be based on the remaining term of the mortgage on thedisplacement dwelling or the actual term of the new mortgage, whicheveris less.Many of the same commenters who preferred this method did not think thattheir agency could make the increased mortgage interest payments at thetime of closing because of their payment procedures or the loan processingprocedures of lending institutions. In response, the final rule has beenrevised to provide that the payments must be made ``at or near'' the timeof closing. However, the implied purpose of the increased mortgage interestcosts payment is to reduce the replacement mortgage; therefore this paymentmust be available to lower the amount of the mortgage in a timely manner,preferably at the time of the closing on the replacement property. Thisprocedure does require close coordination with the closing agent, but ismore cost-effective than the amortization method. The agencies who thoughtthey would be most successful using the buy-down procedure were those whoused escrow accounts to make funds available to displaced persons.There were also several comments about home equity loans and the inclusionof these mortgages in the computation of the increased mortgage interestcosts payment. Home equity loans are valid mortgage liens on residentialreal property regardless of how the proceeds from the loans are used. Therefore,they must be included in the computation.In answer to another comment, the mortgage rate to be used to compute theincreased mortgage interest costs payment when the property is securedwith an adjustable rate mortgage is the interest rate that is current onthe property as of the date of acquisition. A sample computation of an increased mortgage interest costs payment isincluded in Appendix A, as requested by a number of commenters. An IBMPC compatible computer program and financial calculator instructions willbe made available as technical guidance as soon as feasible. Section 24.402 Replacement Housing Payment for 90-Day Occupants <T3>Section 24.402(a)(2)(ii)(A). </T3>The change made in andSection; 24.401(a)(2)(i),concerning the deposit of estimated just compensation, is made here also.<T3>Section 24.402(b) Rental assistance payment. </T3>There were numerouscomments about the changes made in this section. The first issue was the inclusion of the cost of utilities in the computationof the rental assistance payment. The inclusion of utilities has been anongoing issue since the Publication of the common rule in 1985. Since thattime, utility services have been included in the computation of a rentalassistance payment if they were included at the displacement dwelling and/orthe comparable dwelling as a part of the rent. FHWA recognizes the concernsof the current 14 commenters about the increased administrative burdenfor securing information and the variables in utility usage due to differinguser lifestyles. These concerns can be addressed in various ways. One commentersuggested that a schedule be devised for utility costs with the input ofutility companies in the project area that will reflect actual, reasonablecosts. Another agency suggested that if true comparables are used for paymentdetermination, the utility costs should also be comparable and their inclusionshould not increase the cost of replacement housing. Relocation from asubstandard dwelling to a standard dwelling could, in fact, decrease thecost of utilities, especially the cost of heat unless a larger dwellingis used to meet the needs of a family, or if all utilities were not availablein the displacement dwelling, as noted by another commenter. Agencies may establish their own procedures to be used for determiningthe cost of utilities if the procedures are used uniformly. FHWA is continuing to include utilities in the monthly base housing computationbecause utilities are considered to be an integral part of monthly housingcosts and historically have been treated as such by several Federal programsincluding those administered by HUD as a standard practice. The existenceof adequate utilities is a primary requirement for a dwelling to be decent,safe, and sanitary. The 30 percent figure used in andSection; 24.402(b)(2)(ii) to determine basemonthly rental is considered a reasonable percentage of income to be appliedto rental housing costs under current market and economic conditions, andis consistent with the percentage of income figures currently being usedin other subsidized housing and related programs of HUD and other agencies.Several commenters stated that, in their experience, many tenants are nowpaying 40 percent or more of their incomes for housing costs. Our concernis that the 40 percent payments primarily reflect the lack of affordablerental housing in the current market. We do agree that some tenants voluntarilyelect to spend more than 30 percent of their income for housing when moreaffordable housing is available. However, FHWA believes these lifestylechoices for convenience, prestige or other reasons to be the exceptions,not the rule. Consideration must also be given to the fact that privatelending institution requirements set the limit on the monthly cost of housingafter purchase of a dwelling at approximately the same level as the 30percent of income criteria established for tenants. The inclusion of a person's income in computing a base monthly rent figurewas also opposed by several commenters. The biggest concern was a perceiveddifficulty in the verification of income and an implied reluctance to acceptincome information from some displaced persons. FHWA believes that accurateinformation concerning income can be obtained from most persons. If thereis obvious evidence that a person has more income than reported, it isthe Agency's prerogative to accept the income as reported, to request additionalverification of income, including income tax returns, or to inform theperson that there is reasonable doubt that the information is accurate.If the income information is not provided or amplified as requested, theAgency may take such action as it deems necessary to obtain income informationunder a uniform agency-wide or area-wide policy. <T3>Section 24.402(b)(3) Manner of disbursement. </T3>Eleven comments werereceived concerning the vesting of the full amount of the rental assistancepayment when the displaced tenant receives the first rental assistancepayment, either in lump sum or as an installment. Most of the commentstook exception to the idea of vesting. The vesting of the full amount of the rental assistance payment is intendedto establish at a definite point in time, the full amount of the paymentfor the 42 month period after displacement. Vesting eliminates the red-taperequirements of recordkeeping, re-inspection, and recertification of thereplacement dwellings, and continued contacts with the displaced personand the person's landlord that would otherwise be necessary. It also eliminatesthe potential problem of additional project costs as rents are increasedor new DSS dwellings need to be found for those who no longer live in standardhousing. FHWA understands that the same commenters are concerned aboutthe diversion of lump sum rental assistance payments for non-housing uses,and a subsequent return of the displaced person to sub-standard housing.One way to effectively provide installment payments, either to the displacedperson or to the person and the person's landlord, without continuing agencysupervision, is to place the payment in an escrow account that will bedisbursed according to a pre-determined schedule. This method could alsoserve for disbursement of housing of last resort payments, which are alsovested. The method of disbursement remains the Agency's discretion. It should be understood that, under vesting, the only times a rental assistancepayment should change are during the one-year period described in andSection;24.402(a)(2), and then only if tenant elects to up-grade his or her housingto receive the full amount of the original computed rental assistance paymentbased on a comparable dwelling, or changes his or her status from tenantto owner and therefore becomes eligible for an additional payment (seeandSection; 24.403(e)).<T3>Section 24.402(c) </T3><T3>Downpayment assistance payment.</T3> Twenty-one comments were receivedconcerning downpayment assistance. Only 4 of the 21 commenters believedthat the amount available for downpayment assistance should be limitedto the computed amount of the rental assistance payment for tenants. Themajority stated that agencies should make downpayment assistance paymentsof up to $5,250, with most recommending that the payment be restrictedto the amount necessary to obtain conventional loan financing for purchaseof a replacement dwelling. The main concern expressed was that allowingeach agency to select a procedure for computing the down payment assistancepayment did not promote uniformity.Since the legislation does not give the lead agency the authority to selecta particular procedure, but reserves such authority to the displacing agencies,we have elected to retain the existing language. As several commenterssuggested, displacing agencies may want to coordinate with other agencieswithin the State or jurisdiction where they are located to reach a consensuson the procedure to be followed in that State or jurisdiction. FHWA willappreciate being advised of the experience of the various agencies in theimplementation of this procedure. If the experience indicates that a changeis needed to affect a more uniform implementation, we will seek a legislativechange.Regardless of the procedure selected, a rental assistance payment willhave to be initially computed for tenants. If the computed rental assistancepayment is zero, then the downpayment assistance is zero unless the agencyhas elected to make downpayment assistance payments of up to $5,250. Iftheir eligibility is greater than $5,250 for rental assistance, they willbe eligible for housing of last resort for rental assistance or downpaymentassistance. As is required by statute, eligibility for owners of more than90 days but less than 180 days for downpayment assistance will be limitedto the amount that would have been computed had they been 180 day owners.Section 24.403 <T3>Additional Rules Governing Replacement Housing Payments</T3>Several comments were received concerning the requirement in andSection;24.403(a)(1) that an adjustment be made to the asking price of any dwellingused to compute the replacement housing payment to the extent justifiedby local market data. This procedure has been a part of the governmentwidecommon rule since it was first published in March 1985. It requires thatadjustments be made in the asking price of comparable dwellings to theextent that the market demonstrates that expected sale prices will be lessthan the asking prices. A clarification of the use of this procedure hasbeen added to Appendix A.In andSection;24.403(a)(2), for clarity and as suggested by several commenters,FHWA has separated the procedures for major exterior attributes and buildableresidential lots into two paragraphs.<T3>Section 24.403(c)(6).</T3> Several comments were received concerningthe use of current fair market value for the acquisition price of a previouslyowned dwelling when it is used as the replacement dwelling. The currentfair market value is used because (1) it is the amount that would havebeen paid if the dwelling were purchased on the current market as a replacementresidence, (2) the displaced owner could have acquired any other dwellingas a replacement and (3) the use of the previously owned dwelling is theconversion of an existing asset to replacement housing purposes. This regulationoperates the same whether the previously-owned dwelling is mortgaged orunencumbered. In response to one commenter, the cost of an appraisal ofthe previously owned dwelling is a reimbursable cost if the agency considersan appraisal to be appropriate and necessary.Section 24.404 <T3>Replacement Housing of Last Resort</T3>There were 13 comments on replacement housing of last resort. Several concernedthe requirement that the use of housing of last resort be justified. Suchjustification is considered important for good program management and isconsistent with the requirement, added by the 1987 Amendments, that anypayment provided for housing of last resort that exceeds the maximum amountsprovided to tenants and owners by andSection;andSection; 24.401 and 24.402must be justified. A slight modification was made to andSection;24.404(a)(2)(i)at the recommendation of one commenter to clarify that justification forlast resort housing assistance may be for an entire project or programarea, if appropriate, without additional case-by-case justification. Anumber of comments were received about the change in status of a displacedperson from a tenant to an owner. FHWA has clarified that such a changein status must be with the concurrence of the displaced person. The concurrenceof the displaced person should be received prior to the execution of anyof the methods of providing for housing of last resort. Several generalcomments were received about the concept of replacement housing of lastresort. Replacement housing of last resort is a legislatively authorizedcontinuation of the replacement housing assistance provided by andSection;andSection;24.401 and 24.402 of this part, and provides for comparable replacementhousing for displaced persons not adequately provided for under those sections,or who do not meet the eligibility requirements of those sections. Additionalflexibility is provided to displacing agencies for the provision of housingof last resort so that housing needs are met for owners and tenants inthe most cost-effective, yet equitable way.<ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart F_Mobile Homes </ITAG>Section 24.502 <T3>Moving and Related Expenses_Mobile Homes </T3>Only one comment was received on this subpart. In response, andSection;24.502(a)has been modified to state more clearly that, even though an owner-occupantwhose mobile home is not acquired may receive replacement housing underandSection; 24.503(a)(3), and therefore is not eligible for payment for movingthe mobile home, he may be eligible for payment for moving personal propertyfrom the mobile home. Also, the commenter thought that all mobile homesshould be treated as real property. This may be appropriate in areas wheremobile homes are treated as real property under State law or where an agencyhas the option to consider mobile homes to be either real property or personalproperty. However, some State laws consider mobile homes to be personalproperty only, and, therefore, they may not be acquired as realty.<ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart G_Certification</ITAG>This subpart implements one of the most significant changes added by the1987 Amendments. As such, FHWA has a special interest in its implementationand would appreciate receiving further information on its use and effectiveness.Several respondents commented on Subpart G, however no single comment,or group of comments, was sufficiently persuasive to necessitate a changein the proposed text. However, one comment on andSection; 24.603, Monitoringand corrective action, did draw our attention to the need for a substantiverevision of andSection; 24.603(b).Section 24.602 Certification ApplicationTwo commenters recommended that certification applications be made directlyfrom the head of the State agency to the Federal agency providing financialassistance, rather than through the State governor, or the governor's designee.FHWA does not adopt this recommendation. There is a definite need for afocal point within each State for the receipt and screening of certificationapplications. Consistent with the principles of federalism, the Officeof the Governor, as the Chief Executive Officer in any State, is the logicalstarting point for this process since the governor normally exercises executiveauthority over the State agencies that are recipients of Federal financialassistance or through which Federal financial assistance is channelledto sub-recipients at the local level, all of whom are subject to the UniformAct and any of whom could make application for certification approval.The certification process does not alter the existing relationship betweenlocal sub-recipients and the State-level recipients of Federal financialassistance. It is expected that any certification application made by asub-recipient will be made through the State-level agency to the governor,or the governor's designee. In those instances where the local level agency(city, county, etc.) is the direct recipient, and there is no State-levelagency authorized to perform such functions, the certification applicationwould be made directly to the governor, or the governor's designee.The governor, or a State office or agency designated by the governor, willbe able to standardize the process and develop an expertise in the processingof applications. Further, the governor or his or her designee will be moreable to assess the capabilities of those State agencies seeking to assumeFederal agency responsibilities through the certification process. A focalpoint of this nature will be particularly advantageous in processing certificationsfrom a State agency seeking certification approval from more than one Federalagency.Two commenters indicated some misunderstanding of the responsibilitiesof the Federal funding agency.It is not intended that the Federal funding agency endorse an approvedapplication received from the governor, or the governor's designee, ifthe Federal funding agency has appropriate indications revealing programdeficiencies regarding the certifying State agency. The purpose of havingthe Federal funding agency accept the approved application without performingan independent review is threefold: first, it emphasizes the role of thegovernor, or the governor's designee, in evaluating the State agency certifications;second, it will bring into focus the current status of the Federal fundingagency's oversight of its State agencies; third, unless there are pre-existingappropriate indications of deficiencies, the certification approval canbe handled more expeditiously. The second of the three foregoing pointsis the basis for the written assessment of the State agency's capabilitiesto operate under certification which the Federal funding agency must providewhen the certification application is transmitted to the Federal lead agency.Section 24.603 Monitoring and Corrective actionOne respondent objected to the permissive withholding of Federal financialassistance if a certified State agency failed to comply with applicableState law and regulation serving as the basis of its certification. Therespondent perceived this to mean that the authority to withhold approvalof Federal financial assistance is available to any Federal agency regardlessof the source of the financial assistance. This, of course, is not thecase. The authority and the responsibility regarding the withholding ofFederal financial assistance rests with each Federal agency regarding itsprojects, programs, and activities. The respondent's comment did, however,lead us to the recognition of a possible inconsistency between the requirementsof andSection; 24.603(b) and the assurances required by andSection; 24.4 andsections 210 and 305 of the Uniform Act. As a consequence, andSection; 24.603(b)is revised and clarified to provide that if a State agency certifies, underState law and regulation, it can and will comply with the provisions ofthe Uniform Act which would otherwise be covered by the sections 210 and305 assurances and, then, fails to comply, the Federal agency should withholdFederal financial assistance in that State agency's programs, projects,and activities affected by the Uniform Act.The certification process does not diminish the State agency's fundamentalresponsibilities regarding compliance with the Uniform Act, particularlythose provisions referred in the sections 210 and 305 assurances. It isclear, from the statute, that compliance with provisions which are thesubject of the assurances is of paramount importance to the continued Federalfinancial assistance of programs, projects, and activities affected bythe Uniform Act.For example, if Uniform Act non-compliance occurred in connection witha federally assisted project the Federal agency should exercise its authorityto withhold Federal financial assistance until the state agency is againperforming in compliance with the certification.In order to ensure coordination of information among Federal agencies thatmay have accepted a certification from the same state agency, languagehas been added to andSection; 24.603 (b) and (c) to require that the leadagency be consulted by the Federal funding agency before any Federal fundsare withheld from a certified state agency or the acceptance of a certificationis revoked.<ITAG tagnum="74"> Appendix A to Part 24_Additional lnformation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"> The appendix has been modified and augmented to provide for betterunderstanding of the sections of the regulations to which it pertains.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Section 24.2(g)(2)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3> Persons not displaced.</T3> ``Permanently'' has been added to thefirst sentence to clarify that some persons may be temporarily displacedbut are not displaced persons because they have not been permanently displaced.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73"> Section 24.102(m)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3> Fair rental.</T3> In response to several comments concerning short-termrent, the modifier, ``generally,'' has been added to the last sentence.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73"> Section 24.306</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"> Fixed payment for moving expenses_non-residential moves. FHWA hasadded clarifying language in Appendix A for non-profit organizations treatedunder this section.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Section 24.401</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"> Replacement housing payment for 180-day homeowner-occupants.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73"> Section 24.401(a)(2)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"> A statement has been added to clarify the phrase ``for good cause.''</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73"> Section 24.401(d)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"> The computation of a ``buydown'' payment, the factors used in computation,and the agency's obligation to the displaced person are explained. Eventhough one commenter suggested that adjustment of the buydown payment,when a displaced person elects to mortgage the replacement dwelling forless than the remaining mortgage on the displacement dwelling, penalizesthe displaced person for making a larger downpayment, we are retainingthis provision. In addition, we have accepted a recommendation that themortgage with the shortest term be used to compute the payment. FHWA hasamended the procedures to reflect this adjustment.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"> The FHWA is interested in your experience with this new procedurefor computing the mortgage interest differential payment.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74"> Appendix B to Part 24_Statistical Report Form</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"> The reformatted statistical report form includes a new line itemfor reporting payments for the statutory business reestablishment expenseentitlement. (See line 7A). Several comments were received regarding theinformation required in Part B, column (A). More accurate statistical analysescan be obtained by changing the requirement for column (A) to displacementsinstead of number of claims since a displaced person may receive more thanone claim in several categories. The heading for column (A) has been changedto number of displacements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">As required by Section 1320.21 of OMB's new paperwork clearance regulationthat was published in the<T4> Federal Register</T4> on May 10, 1988, we have included an agencydisclosure notice for public reporting on the STATISTICAL REPORT FORM.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A request was received from HUD to add new items to the statisticalreport form to collect race, sex, ethnicity, handicap and familial statusdata. These items were not included in the report form presented in theNPRM and, therefore, FHWA does not have the benefit of public comment onwhat, if any, paperwork burden such additional information collection wouldhave on agencies or persons carrying out acquisition or displacement activities.Therefore, the report form format remains unchanged at this time exceptfor the minor alteration referred to above.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Regulatory Impact </ITAG>The FHWA has determined that this action does not constitute a major ruleunder Executive Order 12291 or a significant rule under the regulatorypolicies and procedures of the Department of Transportation. ExecutiveOrder 12291 requires that a regulatory impact analysis be prepared for``major'' rules which are defined in the Order as any rule that has anannual effect on the national economy of $100 million or more, or has certainother specified effects. The economic impacts of this final rule are primarily mandated by the provisionsof the 1987 Amendments. However, since some of the statutory changes areadministrative or procedural, savings to Federal, State, and local agenciesshould result in the administration of the Uniform Act. Other statutorychanges, which alter benefit levels, and expand the Act's application toinclude certain private persons who receive Federal financial assistance,and persons displaced by certain nonacquisition activities, should resultin a modest increase in amounts paid under the Uniform Act. However, we do not believe that the proposed regulations will have an annualeconomic effect of $100 million or more, or the other effects listed inthe Executive Order. For this reason, FHWA has determined that this regulationis not a major rule within the meaning of the Order. Federal agencies administering direct Federal activities, as well as manystates, currently have the necessary authority to comply with the additionalprovisions of the 1987 Amendments implemented in this rule. To delay thepromulgation of the amendments made in this rule would deprive many partiesof the protections and benefits intended by those provisions of the 1987Amendments. Accordingly, the FHWA finds good cause to make this regulationeffective without the 30-day delay in effective date under the AdministrativeProcedures Act, 5 U.S.C. 553(b). <ITAG tagnum="84">Regulatory Flexibility Act </ITAG>The Regulatory Flexibility Act (5 U.S.C. 605(b)) requires that for eachrule with a ``significant economic impact on a substantial number of smallentities'' an analysis be prepared describing the rules impact on smallentities, and identifying any significant alternatives to the rule thatwould minimize the economic impacts on small entities. The provisions of the Uniform Act that are implemented in this final rulehave not changed substantially. The primary impact of the 1987 Amendmentsis expected to be an increase in benefits provided to small businesses,the elimination of unnecessary administrative requirements imposed on Stateand local agencies, and the consequent reduction of burden on those affectedentities, and the expansion of the Act's application to those private entitiesthat seek and receive Federal financial assistance. In response to comments received from rural electric cooperatives FHWAhas considered the impact that this rule would have on such cooperatives.Primarily for the reasons provided elsewhere in the preamble we have concludedthat this regulation would not have a significant economic impact on asubstantial number of small electric cooperatives. Based on information available to FHWA at this time and under the criteriaof the Regulatory Flexibility Act, the FHWA hereby certifies that thisregulation will not have a significant economic impact on a substantialnumber of small entities. <ITAG tagnum="84">Paperwork Reduction Act Requirements </ITAG>Today's final rule makes one change to the Uniform Act Report form, whichis contained in Appendix B of Part 24. A new item, 7A, is added to obtaininformation relating to the new business reestablishment payment addedby the 1987 Amendments. Several minor editorial changes have also beenmade in this form. Federal funding agencies which elect to require a reporton Uniform Act activities will submit the revised form to the Office ofManagement and Budget (OMB) for review under 44 U.S.C. 3504(h), the PaperworkReduction Act, Pub. L. 96-511. Agencies may continue to use the previousreport form until OMB approval is granted. <ITAG tagnum="84">Federalism Assessment </ITAG>As discussed in the Supplementary Information sections of this preamble,this final rule builds upon the positive Federalism accomplishments achievedin the promulgation of the governmentwide common rule on February 27, 1986(51 FR 7000) which significantly reduced administrative burdens on Statesand local recipients of Federal financial assistance. The FHWA has determinedthat the Federalism accomplishments of the common rule are retained intoday's rule and the changes which have been made are fully consistentwith the principles and criteria contained in Executive Order 12612 anddo not have sufficient further Federalism implications to warrant the preparationof a complete Federalism Assessment. This final rule implements a provision of the 1987 Amendments that givessubstantial additional discretion to the States. This is the <T3>certification procedure </T3>which provides an alternative wherebyState agencies, with adequate authority under State law, can comply withthe Uniform Act with a minimum amount of Federal supervision or oversight.This certification procedure would give maximum authority and control tothe State governor, or his or her designee, in managing and coordinatingthe certification procedure in each State. <ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 49 CFR Part 24 </ITAG>Real property acquisition, Relocation assistance, Reporting and recordkeepingrequirements, Transportation.Accordingly, Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations is amended asset forth below.<ITAG tagnum="21">Issued on: February 22, 1989.    </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Robert E. Farris, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Federal Highway Administrator.</ITAG>Part 24 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 24_UNIFORM RELOCATION ASSISTANCE AND REAL PROPERTY ACQUISITIONFOR FEDERAL AND FEDERALLY ASSISTED PROGRAMS</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart A_General</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">24.1 Purpose.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">24.2 Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">24.3 No duplication of payments.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">24.4 Assurances, monitoring and corrective action.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">24.5 Manner of notices.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">24.6 Administration of jointly-funded projects.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">24.7 Federal agency waiver of regulations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">24.8 Compliance with other laws and regulations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">24.9 Recordkeeping and reports.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">24.10 Appeals.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart B_Real Property Acquisition</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">24.101 Applicability of acquisition requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">24.102 Basic acquisition policies.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">24.103 Criteria for appraisals.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">24.104 Review of appraisals.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">24.105 Acquisition of tenant-owned improvements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">24.106 Expenses incidental to transfer of title to the Agency.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">24.107 Certain litigation expenses.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">24.108 Donations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart C_General Relocation Requirements</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">24.201 Purpose.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">24.202 Applicability.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">24.203 Relocation notices.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">24.204 Availability of comparable replacement dwelling before displacement.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">24.205 Relocation planning, advisory services, and coordination.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">24.206 Eviction for cause.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">24.207 General requirements_claims for relocation payments.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">24.208 Relocation payments not considered as income.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart D_Payments for Moving and Related Expenses</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">24.301 Payment for actual reasonable moving and related expenses_residentialmoves.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">24.302 Fixed payment for moving expenses_residential moves.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">24.303 Payment for actual reasonable moving and related expenses_nonresidentialmoves.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">24.304 Reestablishment expenses_nonresidential moves.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">24.305 Ineligible moving and related expenses.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">24.306 Fixed payment for moving expenses_nonresidentia1 moves.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">24.307 Discretionary utility relocation payments.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart E_Replacement Housing Payments</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">24.401 Replacement housing payment for 180-day homeowner-occupants.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">24.402 Replacement housing payment for 90-day occupants.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">24.403 Additional rules governing replacement housing payments.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">24.404 Replacement housing of last resort.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart F_Mobile Homes</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">24.501 Applicability.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">24.502 Moving and related expenses_mobile homes.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">24.503 Replacement housing payment for 180-day mobile homeowner-occupants.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">24.504 Replacement housing payment for 90-day mobile home occupants.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">24.505 Additional rules governing relocation payments to mobile homeoccupants.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart G_Certification</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">24.601 Purpose.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">24.602 Certification application.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">24.603 Monitoring and corrective action.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Appendix A to Part 24_Additional Information</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Appendix B to Part 24_Statistical Report Form</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20"/><T4>Authority:</T4> Section 213, Uniform Relocation Assistance and RealProperty Acquisition Policies Act of 1970 Pub. L. 91-646, 84 Stat. 1894(42 U.S.C. 4601) as amended by the Surface Transportation and Uniform RelocationAssistance Act of 1987, Title IV of Pub. L. 100-17, 101 Stat. 246-256 (42U.S.C. 4601 note); and 49 CFR 1.48(cc).<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart A_General</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 24.1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Purpose.</ITAG>The purpose of this part is to promulgate rules to implement the UniformRelocation Assistance and Real Property Acquisition Policies Act of 1970,as amended (42 U.S.C. 4601<T3> et seq.</T3>), in accordance with the following objectives:(a) To ensure that owners of real property to be acquired for Federal andfederally-assisted projects are treated fairly and consistently, to encourageand expedite acquisition by agreements with such owners, to minimize litigationand relieve congestion in the courts, and to promote public confidencein Federal and federally-assisted land acquisition programs;(b) To ensure that persons displaced as a direct result of Federal or federally-assistedprojects are treated fairly, consistently, and equitably so that such personalwill not suffer disproportionate injuries as a result of projects designedfor the benefit of the public as a whole; and(c) To ensure that Agencies implement these regulations in a manner thatis efficient and cost effective.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 24.2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Agency. </T3>The term ``Agency'' means the Federal agency, State, Stateagency, or person that acquires real property or displaces a person. (1) <T3>Acquiring agency. </T3>The term ``acquiring agency'' means a Stateagency, as defined in paragraph (a)(2) of this section, which has the authorityto acquire property by eminent domain under State law, and a State agencyor person which does not have such authority. Any Agency or person solelyacquiring property pursuant to the provisions of andSection; 24.101(a) (1),(2), (3), or (4) need not provide the assurances required by andSection;24.4(a)(1) or (2). (2) <T3>Displacing agency. </T3>The term ``displacing agency'' means any Federalagency carrying out a program or project, and any State, State agency,or person carrying out a program or project with Federal financial assistance,which causes a person to be a displaced person. (3) <T3>Federal agency. </T3>The term ``Federal agency'' means any department,Agency, or instrumentality in the executive branch of the Government, anywholly owned Government corporation, the Architect of the Capitol, theFederal Reserve Banks and branches thereof, and any person who has theauthority to acquire property by eminent domain under Federal law. (4) <T3>State agency. </T3>The term ``State agency'' means any department,Agency or instrumentality of a State or of a political subdivision of aState, any department, Agency, or instrumentality of two or more Statesor of two or more political subdivisions of a State or States, and anyperson who has the authority to acquire property by eminent domain underState law. (b) <T3>Appraisal. </T3>The term ``appraisal'' means a written statement independentlyand impartially prepared by a qualified appraiser setting forth an opinionof defined value of an adequately described property as of a specific date,supported by the presentation and analysis of relevant market information.(c) <T3>Business. </T3>The term ``business'' means any lawful activity, excepta farm operation, that is conducted: (1) Primarily for the purchase, sale, lease and/or rental of personal and/orreal property, and/or for the manufacture, processing, and/or marketingof products, commodities, and/or any other personal property; or (2) Primarily for the sale of services to the public: or (3) Primarily for outdoor advertising display purposes, when the displaymust be moved as a result of the project; or (4) By a nonprofit organization that has established its nonprofit statusunder applicable Federal or State law. (d) <T3>Comparable replacement dwelling. </T3>The term ``comparable replacementdwelling'' means a dwelling which is: (1) Decent, safe and sanitary as described in paragraph (f) of this section;(2) Functionally equivalent to the displacement dwelling. The term ``functionallyequivalent'' means that it performs the same function, provides the sameutility, and is capable of contributing to a comparable style of living.While a comparable replacement dwelling need not possess every featureof the displacement dwelling, the principal features must be present. Generally,functional equivalency is an objective standard, reflecting the range ofpurposes for which the various physical features of a dwelling may be used.However, in determining whether a replacement dwelling is functionallyequivalent to the displacement dwelling, the Agency may consider reasonabletrade-offs for specific features when the replacement unit is ``equal toor better than'' the displacement dwelling. (See Appendix A of this part);(3) Adequate in size to accommodate the occupants; (4) In an area not subject to unreasonable adverse environmental conditions;(5) In a location generally not less desirable than the location of thedisplaced person's dwelling with respect to public utilities and commercialand public facilities, and reasonably accessible to the person's placeof employment; (6) On a site that is typical in size for residential development withnormal site improvements, including customary landscaping. The site neednot include special improvements such as outbuildings, swimming pools,or greenhouses. (See also andSection; 24.403(a)(2).); (7) Currently available to the displaced person on the private market.However, a comparable replacement dwelling for a person receiving governmenthousing assistance before displacement may reflect similar government housingassistance. (See Appendix A of this part.); and (8) Within the financial means of the displaced person. (i) A replacement dwelling purchased by a homeowner in occupancy at thedisplacement dwelling for at least 180 days prior to initiation of negotiations(180-day homeowner) is considered to be within the homeowner's financialmeans if the homeowner will receive the full price differential as describedin andSection; 24.401(c), all increased mortgage interest costs as describedat andSection; 24.401(d) and all incidental expenses as described at andSection;24.401(e), plus any additional amount required to be paid under andSection;24.404, Replacement housing of last resort.(ii) A replacement dwelling rented by an eligible displaced person is consideredto be within his or her financial means if, after receiving rental assistanceunder this part, the person's monthly rent and estimated average monthlyutility costs for the replacement dwelling do not exceed the person's basemonthly rental for the displacement dwelling as described at andSection;24.402(b)(2).  (iii) For a displaced person who is not eligible to receive a replacementhousing payment because of the person's failure to meet length-of-occupancyrequirements, comparable replacement rental housing is considered to bewithin the person's financial means if an Agency pays that portion of themonthly housing costs of a replacement dwelling which exceeds 30 percentof such person's gross monthly household income or, if receiving a welfareassistance payment from a program that designates amounts for shelter andutilities, the total of the amounts designated for shelter and utilities.Such rental assistance must be paid under andSection; 24.404, Replacementhousing of last resort.(e)<T3> Contribute materially.</T3> The term ``contribute materially'' meansthat during the 2 taxable years prior to the taxable year in which displacementoccurs, or during such other period as the Agency determines to be moreequitable, a business or farm operation: (1) Had average annual gross receipts of at least $5000; or (2) Had average annual net earnings of at least $1000; or (3) Contributed at least 33\1/3\ percent of the owner's or operator'saverage annual gross income from all sources. (4) If the application of the above criteria creates an inequity or hardshipin any given case, the Agency may approve the use of other criteria asdetermined appropriate. (f) <T3>Decent, safe, and sanitary dwelling. </T3>The term ``decent, safe,and sanitary dwelling'' means a dwelling which meets applicable housingand occupancy codes. However, any of the following standards which arenot met by an applicable code shall apply unless waived for good causeby the Federal agency funding the project. The dwelling shall: (1) Be structurally sound, weathertight, and in good repair. (2) Contain a safe electrical wiring system adequate for lighting andother devices. (3) Contain a heating system capable of sustaining a healthful temperature(of approximately 70 degrees) for a displaced person, except in those areaswhere local climatic conditions do not require such a system. (4) Be adequate in size with respect to the number of rooms and area ofliving space needed to accommodate the displaced person. There shall bea separate, well lighted and ventilated bathroom that provides privacyto the user and contains a sink, bathtub or shower stall, and a toilet,all in good working order and properly connected to appropriate sourcesof water and to a sewage drainage system. In the case of a housekeepingdwelling, there shall be a kitchen area that contains a fully usable sink,properly connected to potable hot and cold water and to a sewage drainagesystem, and adequate space and utility service connections for a stoveand refrigerator. (5) Contains unobstructed egress to safe, open space at ground level.If the replacement dwelling unit is on the second story or above, withaccess directly from or through a common corridor, the common corridormust have at least two means of egress. (6) For a displaced person who is handicapped, be free of any barrierswhich would preclude reasonable ingress, egress, or use of the dwellingby such displaced person. (g)<T3> Displaced person</T3>_ (1) <T3>General. </T3>The term ``displaced person'' means any person who movesfrom the real property or moves his or her personal property from the realproperty: (This includes a person who occupies the real property priorto its acquisition, but who does not meet the length of occupancy requirementsof the Uniform Act as described at andSection; 24.401(a) and 24.402(a)): (i) As a direct result of a written notice of intent to acquire, the initiationof negotiations for, or the acquisition of, such real property in wholeor in part for a project. (ii) As a direct result of rehabilitation or demolition for a project;or (iii) As a direct result of a written notice of intent to acquire, orthe acquisition, rehabilitation or demolition of, in whole or in part,other real property on which the person conducts a business or farm operation,for a project. However, eligibility for such person under this paragraphapplies only for purposes of obtaining relocation assistance advisory servicesunder andSection; 24.205(c), and moving expenses under andSection; 24.301,andSection; 24.302 or andSection; 24.303. (2) <T3>Persons not displaced.</T3> The following is a nonexclusive listingof persons who do not qualify as displaced persons under this part: (i) A person who moves before the initiation of negotiations (see alsoandSection; 24.403(e)), unless the Agency determines that the person wasdisplaced as a direct result of the program or project; or(ii) A person who initially enters into occupancy of the property afterthe date of its acquisition for the project; or(iii) A person who has occupied the property for the purpose of obtainingassistance under the Uniform Act;(iv) A person who is not required to relocate permanently as a direct resultof a project. Such determination shall be made by the Agency in accordancewith any guidelines established by the Federal agency funding the project(see Also Appendix A of this part); or(v) An owner-occupant who moves as a result of an acquisition as describedat andSection;andSection; 24.101(a) (1) and (2) , or as a result of the rehabilitationor demolition of the real property. (However, the displacement of a tenantas a direct result of any acquisition, rehabilitation or demolition fora Federal or federally-assisted project is subject to this part.); or(vi) A person whom the Agency determines is not displaced as a direct resultof a partial acquisition; or(vii) A person who, after receiving a notice of relocation eligibility(described at andSection; 24.203(b)), is notified in writing that he or shewill not be displaced for a project. Such notice shall not be issued unlessthe person has not moved and the Agency agrees to reimburse the personfor any expenses incurred to satisfy any binding contractual relocationobligations entered into after the effective date of the notice of relocationeligibility; or(viii) An owner-occupant who voluntarily conveys his or her property, asdescribed at andSection; 24.101(a) (1) and (2), after being informed in writingthat if a mutually satisfactory agreement on terms of the conveyance cannotbe reached, the Agency will not acquire the property. In such cases, however,any resulting displacement of a tenant is subject to the regulations inthis part; or(ix) A person who retains the right of use and occupancy of the real propertyfor life following its acquisition by the Agency; or(x) A person who retains the right of use and occupancy of the real propertyfor a fixed term after its acquisition by the Department of Interior underPub. L. 93-477 or Pub. L. 93-303; or(xi) A person who is determined to be in unlawful occupancy prior to theinitiation of negotiations (see paragraph (y) of this section), or a personwho has been evicted for cause, under applicable law, as provided for inandSection; 24.206.(h)<T3> Dwelling.</T3> The term ``dwelling'' means the place of permanentor customary and usual residence of a person, according to local customor law, including a single family house; a single family unit in a two-family,multi-family, or multi-purpose property; a unit of a condominium or cooperativehousing project; a non-housekeeping unit; a mobile home; or any other residentialunit.(i)<T3> Farm operation.</T3> The term ``farm operation'' means any activityconducted solely or primarily for the production of one or more agriculturalproducts or commodities, including timber, for sale or home use, and customarilyproducing such products or commodities in sufficient quantity to be capableof contributing materially to the operator's support.(j)<T3> Federal financial assistance.</T3> The term ``Federal financial assistance''means a grant, loan, or contribution provided by the United States, exceptany Federal guarantee or insurance and any interest reduction payment toan individual in connection with the purchase and occupancy of a residenceby that individual.(k)<T3> Initiation of negotiations.</T3> Unless a different action is specifiedin applicable Federal program regulations, the term ``initiation of negotiations''means the following:(1) Whenever the displacement results from the acquisition of the realproperty by a Federal agency or State agency, the ``initiation of negotiations''means the delivery of the initial written offer of just compensation bythe Agency to the owner or the owner's representative to purchase the realproperty for the project. However, if the Federal agency or State agencyissues a notice of its intent to acquire the real property, and a personmoves after that notice, but before de1ivery to the initial written purchaseoffer, the ``initiation of negotiations'' means the actual move of theperson from the property.(2) Whenever the displacement is caused by rehabilitation, demolition orprivately undertaken acquisition of the real property (and there is norelated acquisition by a Federal agency or a State agency), the ``initiationof negotiations'' means the notice to the person that he or she will bedisplaced by the project or, if there is no notice, the actual move ofthe person from the property. (3) In the case of a permanent relocation to protect the public healthand welfare, under the Comprehensive Environmental Response Compensationand Liability Act of 1980 (Pub. L. 96-510, or ``Superfund'') the ``initiationof negotiations'' means the formal announcement of such relocation or theFederal or federally-coordinated health advisory where the Federal Governmentlater decides to conduct a permanent relocation. (l) <T3>Lead agency. </T3>The term ``lead agency'' means the Department ofTransportation acting through the Federal Highway Administration. (m) <T3>Mortgage. </T3>The term ``mortgage'' means such classes of liens asare commonly given to secure advances on, or the unpaid purchase priceof, real property, under the laws of the State in which the real propertyis located, together with the credit instruments, if any, secured thereby.(n) <T3>Nonprofit organization. </T3>The term ``nonprofit organization'' meansan organization that is incorporated under the applicable laws of a Stateas a non-profit organization, and exempt from paying Federal income taxesunder section 501 of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. 501). (o) <T3>Notice of intent to acquire or notice of eligibility for relocationassistance. </T3>Written notice furnished to a person to be displaced,including those to be displaced by rehabilitation or demolition activitiesfrom property acquired prior to the commitment of Federal financial assistanceto the activity, that establishes eligibility for relocation benefits priorto the initiation of negotiation and/or prior to the commitment of Federalfinancial assistance. (p) <T3>Owner of a dwelling. </T3>A person is considered to have met the requirementto own a dwelling if the person purchases or holds any of the followinginterests in real property; (1) Fee title, a life estate, a land contract, a 99-year lease, or a leaseincluding any options for extension with at least 50 years to run fromthe date of acquisition; or (2) An interest in a cooperative housing project which includes the rightto occupy a dwelling; or (3) A contract to purchase any of the interests or estates described inparagraphs (p) (1) or (2) of this section, or (4) Any other interest, including a partial interest, which in the judgmentof the Agency warrants consideration as ownership. (q) <T3>Person. </T3>The term ``person'' means any individual, family, partnership,corporation, or association. (r) <T3>Program or project. </T3>The phrase ``program or project'' means anyactivity or series of activities undertaken by a Federal agency or withFederal financial assistance received or anticipated in any phase of anundertaking in accordance with the Federal funding agency guidelines. (s) <T3>Salvage value. </T3>The term ``salvage value'' means the probable saleprice of an item, if offered for sale on the condition that it will beremoved from the property at the buyer's expense, allowing a reasonableperiod of time to find a person buying with knowledge of the uses and purposesfor which it is adaptable and capable of being used, including separateuse of serviceable components and scrap when there is no reasonable prospectof sale except on that basis.(t) <T3>Small business. </T3>A business having at least one, but not more than500 employees working at the site being acquired or displaced by a programor project. (u) <T3>State. </T3>Any of the several States of the United States or the Districtof Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, any territory or possessionof the United States, the Trust Territories of the Pacific Islands or apolitical subdivision of any of these jurisdictions. (v) <T3>Tenant. </T3>The term ``tenant'' means a person who has the temporaryuse and occupancy of real property owned by another. (w) <T3>Uneconomic remnant. </T3>The term ``uneconomic remnant'' means a parcelof real property in which the owner is left with an interest after thepartial acquisition of the owner's property, and which the acquiring agencyhas determined has little or no value or utility to the owner. (x) <T3>Uniform Act. </T3>The term ``Uniform Act'' means the Uniform RelocationAssistance and Real Property Acquisition Policy Act of 1970 (84 Stat. 1894;42 U.S.C. 4601 <T3>et seq.</T3>; Pub. L. 91-646), and amendments thereto. (y) <T3>Unlawful occupancy. </T3>A person is considered to be in unlawful occupancyif the person has been ordered to move by a court of competent jurisdictionprior to the initiation of negotiations or is determined by the Agencyto be a squatter who is occupying the real property without the permissionof the owner and otherwise has no legal right to occupy the property underState law. A displacing agency may, at its discretion, consider such asquatter to be in lawful occupancy. (z) <T3>Utility costs. </T3>The term ``utility costs'' means expenses for heat,lights, water and sewer. (aa) <T3>Utility facility. </T3>The term ``utility facility'' means any electric,gas, water, steampower, or materials transmission or distribution system;any transportation system; any communications system, including cable television;and any fixtures, equipment, or other property associated with the operation,maintenance, or repair of any such system. A utility facility may be publicly,privately, or cooperatively owned. (bb) <T3>Utility relocation. </T3>The term ``utility relocation'' means theadjustment of a utility facility required by the program or project undertakenby the displacing agency. It includes removing and reinstalling the facility,including necessary temporary facilities; acquiring necessary right-of-wayon new location; moving, rearranging or changing the type of existing facilities;and taking any necessary safety and protective measures. It shall alsomean constructing a replacement facility that has the functional equivalencyof the existing facility and is necessary for the continued operation ofthe utility service, the project economy, or sequence of project construction.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 24.3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">No duplication of payments. </ITAG>No person shall receive any payment under this part if that person receivesa payment under Federal, State, or local law which is determined by theAgency to have the same purpose and effect as such payment under this part.(See Appendix A of this part, andSection; 24.3.) <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 24.4</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Assurances, monitoring and corrective action. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Assurances</T3>_(1) Before a Federal agency may approve any grant to,or contract, or agreement with, a State agency under which Federal financialassistance will be made available for a project which results in real propertyacquisition or displacement that is subject to the Uniform Act, the Stateagency must provide appropriate assurances that it will comply with theUniform Act and this part. A displacing agency's assurances shall be inaccordance with section 210 of the Uniform Act. An acquiring agency's assurancesshall be in accordance with section 305 of the Uniform Act and must containspecific reference to any State law which the Agency believes providesan exception to section 301 or 302 of the Uniform Act. If, in the judgmentof the Federal agency, Uniform Act compliance will be served, a State agencymay provide these assurances at one time to cover all subsequent federally-assistedprograms or projects. An Agency which both acquires real property and displacespersons may combine its section 210 and section 305 assurances in one document.(2) If a Federal agency or State agency provides Federal financial assistanceto a ``person'' causing displacement, such Federal or State agency is responsiblefor ensuring compliance with the requirements of this part, notwithstandingthe person's contractual obligation to the grantee to comply. (3) As an alternative to the assurance requirement described in paragraph(a)(1) of this section, a Federal agency may provide Federal financialassistance to a State agency after it has accepted a certification by suchState agency in accordance with the requirements in Subpart G of this part.(b) <T3>Monitoring and corrective action. </T3>The Federal agency will monitorcompliance with this part, and the State agency shall take whatever correctiveaction is necessary to comply with the Uniform Act and this part. The Federalagency may also apply sanctions in accordance with applicable program regulations.(Also see andSection; 24.603, Subpart G.) (c) <T3>Prevention of fraud, waste, and mismanagement.</T3> The Agency shalltake appropriate measures to carry out this part in a manner that minimizesfraud, waste, and mismanagement.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 24.5</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Manner of notices. </ITAG>Each notice which the Agency is required to provide to a property owneror occupant under this part, except the notice described at andSection; 24.102(b),shall be personally served or sent by certified or registered first-classmail, return receipt requested, and documented in Agency files. Each noticeshall be written in plain, understandable language. Persons who are unableto read and understand the notice must be provided with appropriate translationand counseling. Each notice shall indicate the name and telephone numberof a person who may be contacted for answers to questions or other neededhelp.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 24.6</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Administration of jointly-funded projects.</ITAG>Whenever two or more Federal agencies provide financial assistance to anAgency or Agencies, other than a Federal agency, to carry out functionallyor geographically related activities which will result in the acquisitionof property or the displacement of a person, the Federal agencies may byagreement designate one such agency as the cognizant Federal agency. Inthe unlikely event that agreement among the Agencies cannot be reachedas to which agency shall be the cognizant Federal agency, then the leadagency shall designate one of such agencies to assume the cognizant role.At a minimum, the agreement shall set forth the federally assisted activitieswhich are subject to its terms and cite any policies and procedures, inaddition to this part, that are applicable to the activities under theagreement. Under the agreement, the cognizant Federal agency shall assurethat the project is in compliance with the provisions of the Uniform Actand this part. All federally assisted activities under the agreement shallbe deemed a project for the purposes of this part.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 24.7</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Federal agency waiver of regulations. </ITAG>The Federal agency funding the project may waive any requirement in thispart not required by law if it determines that the waiver does not reduceany assistance or protection provided to an owner or displaced person underthis part. Any request for a waiver shall be justified on a case-by-casebasis.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 24.8</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Compliance with other laws and regulations.</ITAG>The implementation of this part must be in compliance with other applicableFederal laws and implementing regulations, including, but not limited to,the following:(a) Section I of the Civil Rights Act of 1866 (42 U.S.C. 1982 <T3>et seq.</T3>). (b) Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 U.S.C. 2000d <T3>et seq.</T3>). (c) Title VIII of the Civil Rights Act of 1968 (42 U.S.C. 3601 <T3>et seq.</T3>), as amended. (d) The National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 (42 U.S.C. 4321 <T3>et seq.</T3>). (e) Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. 790 <T3>et seq.</T3>).(f) The Flood Disaster Protection Act of 1973 (Pub. L. 93-234). (g) The Age Discrimination Act of 1975 (42 U.S.C. 6101 <T3>et seq.</T3>). (h) Executive Order 11063_Equal Opportunity and Housing, as amended byExecutive Order l2259. (i) Executive Order 11246_Equal Employment Opportunity. (j) Executive Order 11625_Minority Business Enterprise. (k) Executive Orders 11988, Floodplain Management, and 11990, Protectionof Wetlands. (l) Executive Order 12250_Leadership and Coordination of Non-DiscriminationLaws. (m) Executive Order 12259_Leadership and Coordination of Fair Housing inFederal Programs. (n) Executive Order 12630_Governmental Actions and Interference with ConstitutionallyProtected Property Rights. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 24.9</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Recordkeeping and reports. </ITAG>(a)<T3> Records.</T3> The Agency shall maintain adequate records of its acquisitionand displacement activities in sufficient detail to demonstrate compliancewith this part. These records shall be retained for at least 3 years aftereach owner of a property and each person displaced from the property receivesthe final payment to which he or she is entitled under this part, or inaccordance with the applicable regulations of the Federal funding agency,whichever is later. (b)<T3> Confidentiality of records.</T3> Records maintained by an Agency inaccordance with this part are confidential regarding their use as publicinformation, unless applicable law provides otherwise. (c)<T3> Reports.</T3> The Agency shall submit a report of its real propertyacquisition and displacement activities under this part if required bythe Federal agency funding the project. A report will not be required morefrequently than every 3 years, or as the Uniform Act provides, unless theFederal funding agency shows good cause. The report shall be prepared andsubmitted in the format contained in Appendix B of this part. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 24.10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Appeals. </ITAG>(a)<T3> General.</T3> The Agency shall promptly review appeals in accordancewith the requirements of applicable law and this part. (b)<T3> Actions which may be appealed.</T3> Any aggrieved person may filea written appeal with the Agency in any case in which the person believesthat the Agency has failed to properly consider the person's applicationfor assistance under this part. Such assistance may include, but is notlimited to, the person's eligibility for, or the amount of, a payment requiredunder andSection; 24.106 or andSection; 24.107, or a relocation payment requiredunder this part. The Agency shall consider a written appeal regardlessof form. (c)<T3> Time limit for initiating appeal.</T3> The Agency may set a reasonabletime limit for a person to file an appeal. The time limit shall not beless than 60 days after the person receives written notification of theAgency's determination on the person's claim. (d)<T3> Right to representation.</T3> A person has a right to be representedby legal counsel or other representative in connection with his or herappeal, but solely at the person's own expense. (e)<T3> Review of files by person making appeal.</T3> The Agency shall permita person to inspect and copy all materials pertinent to his or her appeal,except materials which are classified as confidential by the Agency. TheAgency may, however, impose reasonable conditions on the person's rightto inspect, consistent with applicable laws. (f)<T3> Scope of review of appeal.</T3> In deciding an appeal, the Agencyshall consider all pertinent justification and other material submittedby the person, and all other available information that is needed to ensurea fair and full review of the appeal.(g) <T3>Determination and notification after appeal.</T3> Promptly after receiptof all information submitted by a person in support of an appeal, the Agencyshall make a written determination on the appeal, including an explanationof the basis on which the decision was made, and furnish the person a copy.If the full relief requested is not granted, the Agency shall advise theperson of his or her right to seek judicial review.(h) <T3>Agency official to review appeal.</T3> The Agency official conductingthe review of the appeal shall be either the head of the Agency or hisor her authorized designee. However, the official shall not have been directlyinvolved in the action appealed.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart B_Real Property Acquisition</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 24.101</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Applicability of acquisition requirements.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General.</T3> The requirements of this subpart apply to any acquisitionof real property for a Federal program or project, and to programs andprojects where there is Federal financial assistance in any part of projectcosts except for:(1) Voluntary transactions that meet all of the following conditions:(i) No specific site or property needs to be acquired, although the Agencymay limit its search for alternative sites to a general geographic area.Where an Agency wishes to purchase more than one site within a geographicarea on this basis, all owners are to be treated similarly.(ii) The property to be acquired is not part of an intended, planned, ordesignated project area where all or substantially all of the propertywithin the area is to be acquired within specific time limits.(iii) The Agency will not acquire the property in the event negotiationsfail to result in an amicable agreement, and the owner is so informed inwriting.(iv) The Agency will inform the owner of what it believes to be the fairmarket value of the property.(2) Acquisitions for programs or projects undertaken by an agency or personthat receives Federal financial assistance but does not have authorityto acquire property by eminent domain, provided that such Agency or personshall:(i) Prior to making an offer for the property, clearly advise the ownerthat it is unable to acquire the property in the event negotiations failto result in an amicable agreement; and(ii) Inform the owner of what it believes to be fair market value of theproperty.(3) The acquisition of real property from a Federal agency, State, or Stateagency, if the Agency desiring to make the purchase does not have authorityto acquire the property through condemnation.(4) The acquisition of real property by a cooperative from a person who,as a condition of membership in the cooperative, has agreed to providewithout charge any real property that is needed by the cooperative.(b) <T3>Less-than-full-fee interest in real property.</T3> In addition to feesimple title, the provisions of this subpart apply when acquiring fee titlesubject to retention of a life estate or a life use; to acquisition byleasing where the lease term, including option(s) for extension, is 50years or more; and to the acquisition of permanent easements. (See AppendixA of this part, andSection; 24.101(b).)(c) <T3>Federally-assisted projects.</T3> For projects receiving Federal financialassistance, the provisions of andSection;andSection; 24.102, 24.103, 24.104,and 24.105 apply to the greatest extent practicable under State law. (SeeandSection; 24.4(a).)<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 24.102</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Basic acquisition policies.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Expeditious acquisition.</T3> The Agency shall make every reasonableeffort to acquire the real property expeditiously by negotiation.(b) <T3>Notice to owner.</T3> As soon as feasible, the owner shall be notifiedof the Agency's interest in acquiring the real property and the basic protections,including the agency's obligation to secure an appraisal, provided to theowner by law and this part. (See also andSection; 24.203.)(c) <T3>Appraisal, waiver thereof, and invitation to owner. </T3>(1) Beforethe initiation of negotiations the real property to be acquired shall beappraised, except as provided in andSection; 24.102(c)(2), and the owner,or the owner's designated representative, shall be given an opportunityto accompany the appraiser during the appraiser's inspection of the property.(2) An appraisal is not required if the owner is donating the propertyand releases the Agency from this obligation, or the Agency determinesthat an appraisal is unnecessary because the valuation problem is uncomplicatedand the fair market value is estimated at $2,500 or less, based on a reviewof available data. (d)<T3> Establishment and offer of just compensation.</T3> Before the initiationof negotiations, the Agency shall establish an amount which it believesis just compensation for the real property. The amount shall not be lessthan the approved appraisal of the fair market value of the property, takinginto account the value of allowable damages or benefits to any remainingproperty. (See also andSection; 24.104.) Promptly thereafter, the Agencyshall make a written offer to the owner to acquire the property for thefull amount believed to be just compensation. (e)<T3> Summary statement.</T3> Along with the initial written purchase offer,the owner shall be given a written statement of the basis for the offerof just compensation, which shall include: (1) A statement of the amount offered as just compensation. In the caseof a partial acquisition, the compensation for the real property to beacquired and the compensation for damages, if any, to the remaining realproperty shall be separately stated. (2) A description and location identification of the real property andthe interest in the real property to be acquired. (3) An identification of the buildings, structures, and other improvements(including removable building equipment and trade fixtures) which are consideredto be part of the real property for which the offer of just compensationis made. Where appropriate, the statement shall identify any separatelyheld ownership interest in the property, e.g., a tenant-owned improvement,and indicate that such interest is not covered by the offer. (f)<T3> Basic negotiation procedures.</T3> The Agency shall make reasonableefforts to contact the owner or the owner's representative and discussits offer to purchase the property, including the basis for the offer ofjust compensation; and, explain its acquisition policies and procedures,including its payment of incidental expenses in accordance with andSection;24.106. The owner shall be given reasonable opportunity to consider theoffer and present material which the owner believes is relevant to determiningthe value of the property and to suggest modification in the proposed termsand conditions of the purchase. The Agency shall consider the owner's presentation. (g)<T3> Updating offer of just compensation.</T3> If the information presentedby the owner, or a material change in the character or condition of theproperty, indicates the need for new appraisal information, or if a significantdelay has occurred since the time of the appraisal(s) of the property,the Agency shall have the appraisal(s) updated or obtain a new appraisal(s).If the latest appraisal information indicates that a change in the purchaseoffer is warranted, the Agency shall promptly reestablish just compensationand offer that amount to the owner in writing. (h)<T3> Coercive action.</T3> The Agency shall not advance the time of condemnation,or defer negotiations or condemnation or the deposit of funds with thecourt, or take any other coercive action in order to induce an agreementon the price to be paid for the property. (i)<T3> Administrative settlement.</T3> The purchase price for the propertymay exceed the amount offered as just compensation when reasonable effortsto negotiate an agreement at that amount have failed and an authorizedAgency official approves such administrative settlement as being reasonable,prudent, and in the public interest. When Federal funds pay for or participatein acquisition costs, a written justification shall be prepared which indicatesthat available information (e.g., appraisals, recent court awards, estimatedtrial costs, or valuation problems) supports such a settlement. (j)<T3> Payment before taking possession.</T3> Before requiring the ownerto surrender possession of the real property, the Agency shall pay theagreed purchase price to the owner, or in the case of a condemnation, depositwith the court, for the benefit of the owner, an amount not less than theAgency's approved appraisal of the fair market value of such property,or the court award of compensation in the condemnation proceeding for theproperty. In exceptional circumstances, with the prior approval of theowner, the Agency may obtain a right-of-entry for construction purposesbefore making payment available to an owner. (k)<T3> Uneconomic remnant.</T3> If the acquisition of only a portion of aproperty would leave the owner with an uneconomic remnant, the Agency shalloffer to acquire the uneconomic remnant along with the portion of the propertyneeded for the project. (See andSection; 24.2(w).) (l)<T3> Inverse condemnation.</T3> If the Agency intends to acquire any interestin real property by exercise of the power of eminent domain, it shall instituteformal condemnation proceedings and not intentionally make it necessaryfor the owner to institute legal proceedings to prove the fact of the takingof the real property. (m)<T3> Fair rental.</T3> If the Agency permits a former owner or tenant tooccupy the real property after acquisition for a short term or a periodsubject to termination by the Agency on short notice, the rent shall notexceed the fair market rent for such occupancy.<ITAG tagnum="80"> andSection; 24.103</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Criteria for appraisals.</ITAG> (a)<T3> Standards of appraisal.</T3> The format and level of documentationfor an appraisal depend on the complexity of the appraisal problem. TheAgency shall develop minimum standards for appraisals consistent with establishedand commonly accepted appraisal practice for those acquisitions which,by virtue of their low value or simplicity, do not require the in-depthanalysis and presentation necessary in a detailed appraisal. A detailedappraisal shall be prepared for all other acquisitions. A detailed appraisalshall reflect nationally recognized appraisal standards, including, tothe extent appropriate, the Uniform Appraisal Standards for Federal LandAcquisition. An appraisal must contain sufficient documentation, includingvaluation data and the appraiser's analysis of that data, to support hisor her opinion of value. At a minimum, a detailed appraisal shall containthe following items:(1) The purpose and/or the function of the appraisal, a definition of theestate being appraised, and a statement of the assumptions and limitingconditions affecting the appraisal. (2) An adequate description of the physical characteristics of the propertybeing appraised (and, in the case of a partial acquisition, an adequatedescription of the remaining property), a statement of the known and observedencumbrances, if any, title information, location, zoning, present use,an analysis of highest and best use, and at least a 5-year sales historyof the property. (3) All relevant and reliable approaches to value consistent with commonlyaccepted professional appraisal practices. When sufficient market salesdata are available to reliably support the fair market value for the specificappraisal problem encountered, the Agency, at its discretion, may requireonly the market approach. If more than one approach is utilized, thereshall be an analysis and reconciliation of approaches to value that aresufficient to support the appraiser's opinion of value. (4) A description of comparable sales, including a description of all relevantphysical, legal, and economic factors such as parties to the transaction,source and method of financing, and verification by a party involved inthe transaction. (5) A statement of the value of the real property to be acquired and, fora partial acquisition, a statement of the value of the damages and benefits,if any, to the remaining real property, where appropriate. (6) The effective date of valuation, date of appraisal, signature, andcertification of the appraiser. (b) <T3>Influence of the project on just compensation. </T3>To the extent permittedby applicable law, the appraiser shall disregard any decrease or increasein the fair market value of the real property caused by the project forwhich the property is to be acquired, or by the likelihood that the propertywould be acquired for the project, other than that due to physical deteriorationwithin the reasonable control of the owner. (c) <T3>Owner retention of improvements. </T3>If the owner of a real propertyimprovement is permitted to retain it for removal from the project site,the amount to be offered for the interest in the real property to be acquiredshall be not less than the difference between the amount determined tobe just compensation for the owner's entire interest in the real propertyand the salvage value (defined at andSection; 24.2(s)) of the retained improvement.(d) <T3>Qualifications of appraisers. </T3>The Agency shall establish criteriafor determining the minimum qualifications of appraisers. Appraiser qualificationsshall be consistent with the level of difficulty of the appraisal assignment.The Agency shall review the experience, education, training, and otherqualifications of appraisers, including review appraisers, and utilizeonly those determined to be qualified. (e) <T3>Conflict of interest. </T3>No appraiser or review appraiser shall haveany interest, direct or indirect, in the real property being appraisedfor the Agency that would in any way conflict with the preparation or reviewof the appraisal. Compensation for making an appraisal shall not be basedon the amount of the valuation. No appraiser shall act as a negotiatorfor real property which that person has appraised, except that the Agencymay permit the same person to both appraise and negotiate an acquisitionwhere the value of the acquisition is $2,500, or less. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 24.104</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Review of appraisals. </ITAG>The Agency shall have an appraisal review process and, at a minimum: (a) A qualified reviewing appraiser shall examine all appraisals to assurethat they meet applicable appraisal requirements and shall, prior to acceptance,seek necessary corrections or revisions. (b) If the reviewing appraiser is unable to approve or recommend approvalof an appraisal as an adequate basis for the establishment of the offerof just compensation, and it is determined that it is not practical toobtain an additional appraisal, the reviewing appraiser may develop appraisaldocumentation in accordance with andSection; 24.103 to support an approvedor recommended value. (c) The review appraiser's certification of the recommended or approvedvalue of the property shall be set forth in a signed statement which identifiesthe appraisal reports reviewed and explains the basis for such recommendationor approval. Any damages or benefits to any remaining property shall alsobe identified in the statement. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 24.105</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Acquisition of tenant-owned improvements. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Acquisition of improvements. </T3>When acquiring any interest in realproperty, the Agency shall offer to acquire at least an equal interestin all buildings, structures, or other improvements located upon the realproperty to be acquired, which it requires to be removed or which it determineswill be adversely affected by the use to which such real property willbe put. This shall include any improvement of a tenant-owner who has theright or obligation to remove the improvement at the expiration of thelease term. (b)<T3> Improvements considered to be real property.</T3> Any building, structure,or other improvement, which would be considered to be real property ifowned by the owner of the real property on which it is located, shall beconsidered to be real property for purposes of this Subpart. (c)<T3> Appraisal and establishment of just compensation for tenant-ownedimprovements.</T3> Just compensation for a tenant-owned improvement isthe amount which the improvement contributes to the fair market value ofthe whole Property or its salvage value, whichever is greater. (Salvagevalue is defined at andSection; 24.2(s).) (d)<T3> Special conditions.</T3> No payment shall be made to a tenant-ownerfor any real property improvement unless: (1) The tenant-owner, in consideration for the payment, assigns, transfers,and releases to the Agency all of the tenant-owner's right, title, andinterest in the improvement; and (2) The owner of the real Property on which the improvement is locateddisclaims all interest in the improvement; and (3) The payment does not result in the duplication of any compensationotherwise authorized by law. (e)<T3> Alternative compensation.</T3> Nothing in this Subpart shall be construedto deprive the tenant-owner of any right to reject payment under this Subpartand to obtain payment for such property interests in accordance with otherapplicable law.<ITAG tagnum="80"> andSection; 24.106</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Expenses incidental to transfer of title to the Agency.</ITAG> (a) The owner of the real property shall be reimbursed for all reasonableexpenses the owner necessarily incurred for: (1) Recording fees, transfer taxes, documentary stamps, evidence of title,boundary surveys, legal descriptions of the real property, and similarexpenses incidental to conveying the real property to the Agency. However,the Agency is not required to pay costs solely required to perfect theowner's title to the real property; and (2) Penalty costs and other charges for prepayment of any preexistingrecorded mortgage entered into in good faith encumbering the real property;and (3) The pro rata portion of any prepaid real property taxes which areallocable to the period after the Agency obtains title to the propertyor effective possession of it, whichever is earlier. (b) Whenever feasible, the Agency shall pay these costs directly so thatthe owner will not have to pay such costs and then seek reimbursement fromthe Agency.<ITAG tagnum="80"> andSection; 24.107</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Certain litigation expenses.</ITAG> The owner of the real property shall be reimbursed for any reasonableexpenses, including reasonable attorney, appraisal, and engineering fees,which the owner actually incurred because of a condemnation proceeding,if: (a) The final judgment of the court is that the Agency cannot acquirethe real property by condemnation; or (b) The condemnation proceeding is abandoned by the Agency other thanunder an agreed-upon settlement; or (c) The court having jurisdiction renders a judgment in favor of the ownerin an inverse condemnation proceeding or the Agency effects a settlementof such proceeding.<ITAG tagnum="80"> andSection; 24.108</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Donations.</ITAG> An owner whose real property is being acquired may, after being fullyinformed by the Agency of the right to receive just compensation for suchproperty, donate such property or any part thereof, any interest therein,or any compensation paid therefor, to the Agency as such owner shall determine.The Agency is responsible for assuring that an appraisal of the real propertyis obtained unless the owner releases the Agency from such obligation,except as provided in andSection; 24.102(c)(2).<ITAG tagnum="52"> Subpart C_General Relocation Requirements</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80"> andSection; 24.201</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Purpose.</ITAG> This Subpart prescribes general requirements governing the provision ofrelocation payments and other relocation assistance in this part.<ITAG tagnum="80"> andSection; 24.202</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Applicability.</ITAG> These requirements apply to the relocation of any displaced person asdefined at andSection; 24.2(g).<ITAG tagnum="80"> andSection; 24.203</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Relocation notices.</ITAG> (a) <T3>General information notice.</T3> As soon as feasible, a person scheduledto be displaced shall be furnished with a general written description ofthe displacing agency's relocation program which does at least the following: (1) Informs the person that he or she may be displaced for the projectand generally describes the relocation payment(s) for which the personmay be eligible, the basic conditions of eligibility, and the proceduresfor obtaining the payment(s). (2) Informs the person that he or she will be given reasonable relocationadvisory services, including referrals to replacement properties, helpin filing payment claims, and other necessary assistance to help the personsuccessfully relocate.(3) Informs the person that he or she will not be required to move withoutat least 90 days' advance written notice (see paragraph (c) of this section),and informs any person to be displaced from a dwelling that he or she cannotbe required to move permanently unless at least one comparable replacementdwelling has been made available.(4) Describes the person's right to appeal the Agency's determination asto a person's application for assistance for which a person may be eligibleunder this part.(b)<T3> Notice of relocation eligibility.</T3> Eligibility for relocationassistance shall begin on the date of initiation of negotiations (definedin andSection; 24.2(k)) for the occupied property. When this occurs, theAgency shall promptly notify all occupants in writing of their eligibilityfor applicable relocation assistance.(c)<T3> Ninety-day notice</T3>_(1)<T3> General.</T3> No lawful occupant shall be required to move unlesshe or she has received at least 90 days advance written notice of the earliestdate by which he or she may be required to move.(2)<T3> Timing of notice.</T3> The displacing agency may issue the notice90 days before it expects the person to be displaced or earlier.(3)<T3> Content of notice.</T3> The 90-day notice shall either state a specificdate as the earliest date by which the occupant may be required to move,or state that the occupant will receive a further notice indicating, atleast 30 days in advance, the specific date by which he or she must move.If the 90-day notice is issued before a comparable replacement dwellingis made available, the notice must state clearly that the occupant willnot have to move earlier than 90 days after such a dwelling is made available.(See andSection; 24.204(a).)(4)<T3> Urgent need.</T3> In unusual circumstances, an occupant may be requiredto vacate the property on less than 90 days advance written notice if thedisplacing agency determines that a 90-day notice is impracticable, suchas when the person's continued occupancy of the property would constitutea substantial danger to health or safety. A copy of the Agency's determinationshall be included in the applicable case file.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 24.204</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Availability of comparable replacement dwelling before displacement.</ITAG>(a)<T3> General.</T3> No person to be displaced shall be required to movefrom his or her dwelling unless at least one comparable replacement dwelling(defined at andSection; 24.2(d)) has been made available to the person. Wherepossible, three or more comparable replacement dwellings shall be madeavailable. A comparable replacement dwelling will be considered to havebeen made available to a person, if:(1) The person is informed of its location; and(2) The person has sufficient time to negotiate and enter into a purchaseagreement or lease for the property; and(3) Subject to reasonable safeguards, the person is assured of receivingthe relocation assistance and acquisition payment to which the person isentitled in sufficient time to complete the purchase or lease of the property.(b)<T3> Circumstances permitting waiver.</T3> The Federal agency funding theproject may grant a waiver of the policy in paragraph (a) of this sectionin any case where it is demonstrated that a person must move because of:(1) A major disaster as defined in section 102(c) of the Disaster ReliefAct of 1974 (42 U.S.C. 5121); or(2) A presidentially declared national emergency; or(3) Another emergency which requires immediate vacation of the real property,such as when continued occupancy of the displacement dwelling constitutesa substantial danger to the health or safety of the occupants or the public.(c)<T3> Basic conditions of emergency move.</T3> Whenever a person is requiredto relocate for a temporary period because of an emergency as describedin paragraph (b) of this section, the Agency shall:(1) Take whatever steps are necessary to assure that the person is temporarilyrelocated to a decent, safe, and sanitary dwelling; and(2) Pay the actual reasonable out-of-pocket moving expenses and any reasonableincrease in rent and utility costs incurred in connection with the temporaryrelocation; and(3) Make available to the displaced person as soon as feasible, at leastone comparable replacement dwelling. (For purposes of filing a claim andmeeting the eligibility requirements for a relocation payment, the dateof displacement is the date the person moves from the temporarily-occupieddwelling.)<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 24.205</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Relocation planning, advisory services, and coordination.</ITAG>(a)<T3> Relocation planning.</T3> During the early stages of development,Federal and Federal-aid programs or projects shall be planned in such amanner that the problems associated with the displacement of individuals,families, businesses, farms, and nonprofit organizations are recognizedand solutions are developed to minimize the adverse impacts of displacement.Such planning, where appropriate, shall precede any action by an Agencywhich will cause displacement, and should be scoped to the complexity andnature of the anticipated displacing activity including an evaluation ofprogram resources available to carry out timely and orderly relocations.Planning may involve a relocation survey or study which may include thefollowing:(1) An estimate of the number of households to be displaced including informationsuch as owner/tenant status, estimated value and rental rates of propertiesto be acquired, family characteristics, and special consideration of theimpacts on minorities, the elderly, large families, and the handicappedwhen applicable.(2) An estimate of the number of comparable replacement dwellings in thearea (including price ranges and rental rates) that are expected to beavailable to fulfill the needs of those households displaced. When an adequatesupply of comparable housing is not expected to be available, considerationof housing of last resort actions should be instituted.(3) An estimate of the number, type and size of the businesses, farms,and nonprofit organizations to be displaced and the approximate numberof employees that may be affected.(4) Consideration of any special relocation advisory services that maybe necessary from the displacing agency and other cooperating agencies.(b)<T3> Loans for planning and preliminary expenses.</T3> In the event thatan Agency elects to consider using the duplicative provision in section215 of the Uniform Act which permits the use of project funds for loansto cover planning and other preliminary expenses for the development ofadditional housing, the lead agency will establish criteria and proceduresfor such use upon the request of the Federal agency funding the programor project. (c) <T3>Relocation assistance advisory services</T3>_(1)<T3> General.</T3> The Agency shall carry out a relocation assistance advisoryprogram which satisfies the requirements of Title VI of the Civil RightsAct of 1964 (42 U.S.C. 2000d<T3> et seq.</T3>), Title VIII of the Civil Rights Act of 1968 (42 U.S.C.3601<T3> et seq.</T3>), and Executive Order 11063 (27 FR 11527, November 24,1962), and offers the services described in paragraph (c)(2) of this section.If the Agency determines that a person occupying property adjacent to thereal property acquired for the project is caused substantial economic injurybecause of such acquisition, it may offer advisory services to such person.(2)<T3> Services to be provided.</T3> The advisory program shall include suchmeasures, facilities, and services as may be necessary or appropriate inorder to: (i) Determine the relocation needs and preferences of each person to bedisplaced and explain the relocation payments and other assistance forwhich the person may be eligible, the related eligibility requirements,and the procedures for obtaining such assistance. This shall include apersonal interview with each person. (ii) Provide current and continuing information on the availability, purchaseprices, and rental costs of comparable replacement dwellings, and explainthat the person cannot be required to move unless at least one comparablereplacement dwelling is made available as set forth in andSection; 24.204(a).(A) As soon as feasible, the Agency shall inform the person in writingof the specific comparable replacement dwelling and the price or rent usedfor establishing the upper limit of the replacement housing payment (seeandSection; 24.403 (a) and (b)) and the basis for the determination, so thatthe person is aware of the maximum replacement housing payment for whichhe or she may qualify. (B) Where feasible, housing shall be inspected prior to being made availableto assure that it meets applicable standards. (See andSection; 24.2 (d) and(f).) If such an inspection is not made, the person to be displaced shallbe notified that a replacement housing payment may not be made unless thereplacement dwelling is subsequently inspected and determined to be decent,safe, and sanitary. (C) Whenever possible, minority persons shall be given reasonable opportunitiesto relocate to decent, safe, and sanitary replacement dwellings, not locatedin an area of minority concentration, that are within their financial means.This policy, however, does not require an Agency to provide a person alarger payment than is necessary to enable a person to relocate to a comparablereplacement dwelling. (D) All persons, especially the elderly and handicapped, shall be offeredtransportation to inspect housing to which they are referred. (iii) Provide current and continuing information on the availability, purchaseprices, and rental costs of suitable commercial and farm properties andlocations. Assist any person displaced from a business or farm operationto obtain and become established in a suitable replacement location. (iv) Minimize hardships to persons in adjusting to relocation by providingcounseling, advice as to other sources of assistance that may be available,and such other help as may be appropriate. (v) Supply persons to be displaced with appropriate information concerningFederal and State housing programs, disaster loan and other programs administeredby the Small Business Administration, and other Federal and State programsoffering assistance to displaced persons, and technical help to personsapplying for such assistance.(vi) Any person who occupies property acquired by an Agency, when suchoccupancy began subsequent to the acquisition of the property, and theoccupancy is permitted by a short term rental agreement or an agreementsubject to termination when the property is needed for a program or project,shall be eligible for advisory services, as determined by the Agency. (d)<T3> Coordination of relocation activities.</T3> Relocation activitiesshall be coordinated with project work and other displacement-causing activitiesto ensure that, to the extent feasible, persons displaced receive consistenttreatment and the duplication of functions is minimized. (Also see andSection;24.6, Subpart A.)<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 24.206</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Eviction for cause.</ITAG>Eviction for cause must conform to applicable state and local law. Anyperson who occupies the real property and is not in unlawful occupancyon the date of the initiation of negotiations, is presumed to be entitledto relocation payments and other assistance set forth in this part unlessthe Agency determines that: (a) The person received an eviction notice prior to the initiation of negotiationsand, as a result of that notice is later evicted; or (b) The person is evicted after the initation of negotiations for seriousor repeated violation of material terms of the lease or occupancy agreement;and (c) In either case the eviction was not undertaken for the purpose ofevading the obligation to make available the payments and other assistanceset forth in this part.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"> For purposes of determining eligibility for relocation payments,the date of displacement is the date the person moves, or if later, thedate a comparable replacement dwelling is made available. This sectionapplies only to persons who would otherwise have been displaced by theproject.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 24.207</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> General requirements_claims for relocation payments.</ITAG> (a)<T3> Documentation.</T3> Any claim for a relocation payment shall be supportedby such documentation as may be reasonably required to support expensesincurred, such as bills, certified prices, appraisals, or other evidenceof such expenses. A displaced person must be provided reasonable assistancenecessary to complete and file any required claim for payment. (b)<T3> Expeditious payments.</T3> The Agency shall review claims in an expeditiousmanner. The claimant shall be promptly notified as to any additional documentationthat is required to support the claim. Payment for a claim shall be madeas soon as feasible following receipt of sufficient documentation to supportthe claim. (c)<T3> Advance payments.</T3> If a person demonstrates the need for an advancerelocation payment in order to avoid or reduce a hardship, the Agency shallissue the payment, subject to such safeguards as are appropriate to ensurethat the objective of the payment is accomplished. (d)<T3> Time for filing</T3>_(1) All claims for a relocation payment shallbe filed with the Agency within 18 months after: (i) For tenants, the date of displacement; (ii) For owners, the date of displacement or the date of the final paymentfor the acquisition of the rea1 property, whichever is later. (2) This time period shall be waived by the Agency for good cause. (e)<T3> Multiple occupants of one displacement dwelling.</T3> If two or moreoccupants of the displacement dwelling move to separate replacement dwellings,each occupant is entitled to a reasonable prorated share, as determinedby the Agency, of any relocation payments that would have been made ifthe occupants moved together to a comparable replacement dwelling. However,if the Agency determines that two or more occupants maintained separatehouseholds within the same dwelling, such occupants have separate entitlementsto relocation payments. (f)<T3> Deductions from relocation payments.</T3> An Agency shall deduct theamount of any advance relocation payment from the relocation payment(s)to which a displaced person is otherwise entitled. Similarly, a Federalagency shall, and a State agency may, deduct from relocation payments anyrent that the displaced person owes the Agency; provided that no deductionshall be made if it would prevent the displaced person from obtaining acomparable replacement dwelling as required by andSection; 24.204. The Agencyshall not withhold any part of a relocation payment to a displaced personto satisfy an obligation to any other creditor. (g)<T3> Notice of denial of claim.</T3> If the Agency disapproves all or partof a payment claimed or refuses to consider the claim on its merits becauseof untimely filing or other grounds, it shall promptly notify the claimantin writing of its determination, the basis for its determination, and theprocedures for appealing that determination.<ITAG tagnum="80"> andSection; 24.208</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Relocation payments not considered as income.</ITAG> No relocation payment received by a displaced person under this part shallbe considered as income for the purpose of the Internal Revenue Code of1954, which has been redesignated as the Internal Revenue Code of 1986or for the purpose of determining the eligibility or the extent of eligibilityof any person for assistance under the Social Security Act or any otherFederal law, except for any Federal law providing low-income housing assistance.<ITAG tagnum="52"> Subpart D_Payments for Moving and Related Expenses</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 24.301 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Payment for actual reasonable moving and related expenses_residentialmoves.</ITAG> Any displaced owner-occupant or tenant of a dwelling who qualifies asa displaced person (defined at andSection; 24.2(g)) is entitled to paymentof his or her actual moving and related expenses, as the Agency determinesto be reasonable and necessary, including expenses for: (a) Transportation of the displaced person and personal property. Transportationcosts for a distance beyond 50 miles are not eligible, unless the Agencydetermines that relocation beyond 50 miles is justified. (b) Packing, crating, unpacking, and uncrating of the personal property. (c) Disconnecting, dismantling, removing, reassembling, and reinstallingrelocated household appliances, and other personal property. (d) Storage of the personal property for a period not to exceed l2 months,unless the Agency determines that a longer period is necessary. (e) Insurance for the replacement value of the property in connectionwith the move and necessary storage.(f) The replacement value of property lost, stolen, or damaged in the processof moving (not through the fault or negligence of the displaced person,his or her agent, or employee) where insurance covering such loss, theft,or damage is not reasonably available.(g) Other moving-related expenses that are not listed as ineligible underandSection; 24.305, as the Agency determines to be reasonable and necessary.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 24.302</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Fixed payment for moving expenses_residential moves.</ITAG>Any person displaced from a dwelling or a seasonal residence is entitledto receive an expense and dislocation allowance as an alternative to apayment for actual moving and related expenses under andSection; 24.301.This allowance shall be determined according to the applicable scheduleapproved by the Federal Highway Administration. This includes a provisionthat the expense and dislocation allowance to a person with minimal personalpossessions who is in occupancy of a dormitory style room shared by twoor more other unrelated persons or a person whose residential move is performedby an agency at no cost to the person shall be limited to $50.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 24.303</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Payment for actual reasonable moving and related expenses_nonresidentialmoves.</ITAG><T3>(a) Eligible costs. </T3>Any business or farm operation which qualifiesas a displaced person (defined at andSection; 24.2(g)) is entitled to paymentfor such actual moving and related expenses, as the Agency determines tobe reasonable and necessary, including expenses for:(1) Transportation of personal property. Transportation costs for a distancebeyond 50 miles are not eligible, unless the Agency determines that relocationbeyond 50 miles is justified.(2) Packing, crating, unpacking, and uncrating of the personal property.(3) Disconnecting, dismantling, removing, reassembling, and reinstallingrelocated machinery, equipment, and other personal property, includingsubstitute personal property described at andSection; 24.303(a)(12). Thisincludes connection to utilities available nearby. It also includes modificationsto the personal property necessary to adapt it to the replacement structure,the replacement site, or the utilities at the replacement site, and modificationsnecessary to adapt the utilities at the replacement site to the personalproperty. (Expenses for providing utilities from the right-of-way to thebuilding or improvement are excluded.)(4) Storage of the personal property for a period not to exceed 12 months,unless the Agency determines that a longer period is necessary.(5) Insurance for the replacement value of the personal property in connectionwith the move and necessary storage.(6) Any license, permit, or certification required of the displaced personat the replacement location. However, the payment may be based on the remaininguseful life of the existing license, permit, or certification.(7) The replacement value of property lost, stolen, or damaged in the processof moving (not through the fault or negligence of the displaced person,his or her agent, or employee) where insurance covering such loss, theft,or damage is not reasonably available.(8) Professional services necessary for:(i) Planning the move of the personal property,(ii) Moving the personal property, and(iii) Installing the relocated personal property at the replacement location.(9) Relettering signs and replacing stationery on hand at the time of displacementthat are made obsolete as a result of the move.(10) Actual direct loss of tangible personal property incurred as a resultof moving or discontinuing the business or farm operation. The paymentshall consist of the lesser of:(i) The fair market value of the item for continued use at the displacementsite, less the proceeds from its sale. (To be eligible for payment, theclaimant must make a good faith effort to sell the personal property, unlessthe Agency determines that such effort is not necessary. When payment forproperty loss is claimed for goods held for sale, the fair market valueshall be based on the cost of the goods to the business, not the potentialselling price.); or(ii) The estimated cost of moving the item, but with no allowance for storage.(If the business or farm operation is discontinued, the estimated costshall be based on a moving distance of 50 miles.)(11) The reasonable cost incurred in attempting to sell an item that isnot to be relocated.(12) Purchase of substitute personal property. If an item of personal propertywhich is used as part of a business or farm operation is not moved butis promptly replaced with a substitute item that performs a comparablefunction at the replacement site, the displaced person is entitled to paymentof the lesser of:(i) The cost of the substitute item, including installation costs at thereplacement site, minus any proceeds from the sale or trade-in of the replaceditem; or(ii) The estimated cost of moving and reinstalling the replaced item butwith no allowance for storage. At the Agency's discretion, the estimatedcost for a low cost or uncomplicated move may be based on a single bidor estimate.(13) Searching for a replacement location. A displaced business or farmoperation is entitled to reimbursement for actual expenses, not to exceed$1,000, as the Agency determines to be reasonable, which are incurred insearching for a replacement location, including:(i) Transportation.(ii) Meals and lodging away from home.(iii) Time spent searching, based on reasonable salary or earnings.(iv) Fees paid to a real estate agent or broker to locate a replacementsite, exclusive of any fees or commissions related to the purchase of suchsite.(14) Other moving-related expenses that are not listed as ineligible underandSection; 24.305, as the Agency determines to be reasonable and necessary.(b)<T3> Notification and inspection.</T3> The following requirements applyto payments under this section:(1) The Agency shall inform the displaced person, in writing, of the requirementsof paragraphs (b) (2) and (3) of this section as soon as possible afterthe initiation of negotiations. This information may be included in therelocation information provided to the displaced person as set forth inandSection; 24.203.(2) The displaced person must provide the Agency reasonable advance writtennotice of the approximate date of the start of the move or dispositionof the personal property and a list of the items to be moved. However,the Agency may waive this notice requirement after documenting its fileaccordingly.(3) The displaced person must permit the Agency to make reasonable andtimely inspections of the personal property at both the displacement andreplacement sites and to monitor the move.(c)<T3> Self moves.</T3> If the displaced person elects to take full responsibilityfor the move of the business or farm operation, the Agency may make a paymentfor the person's moving expenses in an amount not to exceed the lower oftwo acceptable bids or estimates obtained by the Agency or prepared byqualified staff. At the Agency's discretion, a payment for a low cost oruncomplicated move may be based on a single bid or estimate.(d)<T3> Transfer of ownership.</T3> Upon request and in accordance with applicablelaw, the claimant shall transfer to the Agency ownership of any personalproperty that has not been moved, sold, or traded in.(e)<T3> Advertising signs.</T3> The amount of a payment for direct loss ofan advertising sign which is personal property shall be the lesser of:(1) The depreciated reproduction cost of the sign, as determined by theAgency, less the proceeds from its sale; or(2) The estimated cost of moving the sign, but with no allowance for storage.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 24.304</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Reestablishment expenses_nonresidential moves.</ITAG>In addition to the payments available under andSection; 24.303 of this subpart,a small business, as defined in andSection; 24.2(t), farm or nonprofit organizationmay be eligible to receive a payment, not to exceed $10,000, for expensesactually incurred in relocating and reestablishing such small business,farm or nonprofit organization at a replacement site.(a)<T3> Eligible expenses.</T3> Reestablishment expenses must be reasonableand necessary, as determined by the Agency. They may include, but are notlimited to, the following:(1) Repairs or improvements to the replacement real property as requiredby Federal, State or local law, code or ordinance.(2) Modifications to the replacement property to accommodate the businessoperation or make replacement structures suitable for conducting the business.(3) Construction and installation costs, not to exceed $1,500 for exteriorsigning to advertise the business.(4) Provision of utilities from right-of-way to improvements on the replacementsite.(5) Redecoration or replacement of soiled or worn surfaces at the replacementsite, such as paint, panelling, or carpeting. (6) Licenses, fees and permits when not paid as part of moving expenses. (7) Feasibility surveys, soil testing and marketing studies. (8) Advertisement of replacement location, not to exceed $1,500. (9) Professional services in connection with the purchase or lease ofa replacement site. (10) Estimated increased costs of operation during the first 2 years atthe replacement site, not to exceed $5,000, for such items as: (i) Lease or rental charges, (ii) Personal or real property taxes, (iii) Insurance premiums, and (iv) Utility charges, excluding impact fees. (11) Impact fees or one-time assessments for anticipated heavy utilityusage. (12) Other items that the Agency considers essential to the reestablishmentof the business. (13) Expenses in excess of the regulatory maximums set forth in paragraphs(a) (3), (8) and (10) of this section may be considered eligible if largeand legitimate disparities exist between costs of operation at the displacementsite and costs of operation at an otherwise similar replacement site. Insuch cases the regulatory limitation for reimbursement of such costs may,at the request of the Agency, be waived by the Federal agency funding theprogram or project, but in no event shall total costs payable under thissection exceed the $10,000 statutory maximum. (b)<T3> Ineligible expenses.</T3> The following is a nonexclusive listingof reestablishment expenditures not considered to be reasonable, necessary,or otherwise eligible: (1) Purchase of capital assets, such as, office furniture, filing cabinets,machinery, or trade fixtures. (2) Purchase of manufacturing materials, production supplies, productinventory, or other items used in the normal course of the business operation. (3) Interior or exterior refurbishments at the replacement site whichare for aesthetic purposes, except as provided in paragraph (a)(5) of thissection. (4) Interest on money borrowed to make the move or purchase the replacementproperty. (5) Payment to a part-time business in the home which does not contributematerially to the household income.<ITAG tagnum="80"> andSection; 24.305</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Ineligible moving and related expenses.</ITAG> A displaced person is not entitled to payment for: (a) The cost of moving any structure or other real property improvementin which the displaced person reserved ownership. However, this part doesnot preclude the computation under andSection; 24.401(c)(4)(iii); or (b) Interest on a loan to cover moving expenses; or (c) Loss of goodwill; or (d) Loss of profits; or (e) Loss of trained employees; or (f) Any additional operating expenses of a business or farm operationincurred because of operating in a new location except as provided in andSection;24.304(a)(10); or (g) Personal injury; or (h) Any legal fee or other cost for preparing a claim for a relocationpayment or for representing the claimant before the Agency; or (i) Expenses for searching for a replacement dwelling; or (j) Physical changes to the real property at the replacement locationof a business or farm operation except as provided in andSection;andSection;24.303(a)(3) and andSection; 24.304(a); or (k) Costs for storage of personal property on real property already ownedor leased by the displaced person.<ITAG tagnum="80"> andSection; 24.306</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Fixed payment for moving expenses_nonresidential moves.</ITAG> (a)<T3> Business.</T3> A displaced business may be eligible to choose a fixedpayment in lieu of the payments for actual moving and related expenses,and actual reasonable reestablishment expenses provided by andSection;andSection;24.303 and 24.304. Such fixed payment, except for payment to a nonprofitorganization, shall equal the average annual net earnings of the business,as computed in accordance with paragraph (e) of this section, but not lessthan $1,000 nor more than $20,000. The displaced business is eligible forthe payment if the Agency determines that: (1) The business owns or rents personal property which must be moved inconnection with such displacement and for which an expense would be incurredin such move; and, the business vacates or relocates from its displacementsite. (2) The business cannot be relocated without a substantial loss of itsexisting patronage (clientele or net earnings). A business is assumed tomeet this test unless the Agency determines that it will not suffer a substantialloss of its existing patronage; and (3) The business is not part of a commercial enterprise having more thanthree other entities which are not being acquired by the Agency, and whichare under the same ownership and engaged in the same or similar businessactivities. (4) The business is not operated at a displacement dwelling solely forthe purpose of renting such dwelling to others. (5) The business is not operated at the displacement site solely for thepurpose of renting the site to others.(6) The business contributed materially to the income of the displacedperson during the 2 taxable years prior to displacement (see andSection;24.2(e)). (b) <T3>Determining the number of businesses. </T3>In determining whether twoor more displaced legal entities constitute a single business which isentitled to only one fixed payment, all pertinent factors shall be considered,including the extent to which: (1) The same premises and equipment are shared; (2) Substantially identical or interrelated business functions are carriedout and business and financial affairs are commingled; (3) The entities are held out to the public, and to those customarily dealingwith them, as one business; and (4) The same person or closely related persons own, control, or managethe affairs of the entities. (c) <T3>Farm operation. </T3>A displaced farm operation (defined at andSection;24.2(i)) may choose a fixed payment, in lieu of the payments for actualmoving and related expenses and actual reasonable reestablishment expenses,in an amount equal to its average annual net earnings as computed in accordancewith paragraph (e) of this section, but not less than $1,000 nor more than$20,000. In the case of a partial acquisition of land which was a farmoperation before the acquisition, the fixed payment shall be made onlyif the Agency determines that: (1) The acquisition of part of the land caused the operator to be displacedfrom the farm operation on the remaining land; or (2) The partial acquisition caused a substantial change in the nature ofthe farm operation. (d) <T3>Nonprofit organization.</T3> A displaced nonprofit organization maychoose a fixed payment of $1,000 to $20,000, in lieu of the payments foractual moving and related expenses and actual reasonable reestablishmentexpenses, if the Agency determines that it cannot be relocated withouta substantial loss of existing patronage (membership or clientele). A nonprofitorganization is assumed to meet this test, unless the Agency demonstratesotherwise. Any payment in excess of $1,000 must be supported with financialstatements for the two 12-month periods prior to the acquisition. The amountto be used for the payment is the average of 2 years annual gross revenuesless administrative expenses. (See Appendix A of this part). (e) <T3>Average annual net earnings of a business or farm operation. </T3>Theaverage annual net earnings of a business or farm operation are one-halfof its net earnings before Federal, State, and local income taxes duringthe 2 taxable years immediately prior to the taxable year in which it wasdisplaced. If the business or farm was not in operation for the full 2taxable years prior to displacement, net earnings shall be based on theactual period of operation at the displacement site during the 2 taxableyears prior to displacement, projected to an annual rate. Average annualnet earnings may be based upon a different period of time when the Agencydetermines it to be more equitable. Net earnings include any compensationobtained from the business or farm operation by its owner, the owner'sspouse, and dependents. The displaced person shall furnish the Agency proofof net earnings through income tax returns, certified financial statements,or other reasonable evidence which the Agency determines is satisfactory.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 24.307</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Discretionary utility relocation payments. </ITAG>(a) Whenever a program or project undertaken by a displacing agency causesthe relocation of a utility facility (see andSection;andSection; 24.2 (aa)and (bb)) and the relocation of the facility creates extraordinary expensesfor its owner, the displacing agency may, at its option, make a relocationpayment to the owner for all or part of such expenses, if the followingcriteria are met: (1) The utility facility legally occupies State or local government property,or property over which the State or local government has an easement orright-of-way; and (2) The utility facility's right of occupancy thereon is pursuant to Statelaw or local ordinance specifically authorizing such use, or where suchuse and occupancy has been granted through a franchise, use and occupancypermit, or other similar agreement; and (3) Relocation of the utility facility is required by and is incidentalto the primary purpose of the project or program undertaken by the displacingagency; and (4) There is no Federal law, other than the Uniform Act, which clearlyestablishes a policy for the payment of utility moving costs that is applicableto the displacing agency's program or project; and (5) State or local government reimbursement for utility moving costs orpayment of such costs by the displacing agency is in accordance with Statelaw. (b) For the purposes of this section, the term ``extraordinary expenses''means those expenses which, in the opinion of the displacing agency, arenot routine or predictable expenses relating to the utility's occupancyof rights-of-way, and are not ordinarily budgeted as operating expenses,unless the owner of the utility facility has explicitly and knowingly agreedto bear such expenses as a condition for use of the property, or has voluntarilyagreed to be responsible for such expenses. (c) A relocation payment to a utility facility owner for moving costs underthis section may not exceed the cost to functionally restore the servicedisrupted by the federally assisted program or project, less any increasein value of the new facility and salvage value of the old facility. Thedisplacing agency and the utility facility owner shall reach prior agreementon the nature of the utility relocation work to be accomplished, the eligibilityof the work for reimbursement, the responsibilities for financing and accomplishingthe work, and the method of accumulating costs and making payment. (SeeAppendix A, of this part, andSection; 24.307.)<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart E_Replacement Housing Payments </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 24.401</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Replacement housing payment for 180-day homeowner-occupants. </ITAG>(a)<T3> Eligibility.</T3> A displaced person is eligible for the replacementhousing payment for a 180-day homeowner-occupant if the person: (1) Has actually owned and occupied the displacement dwelling for not lessthan 180 days immediately prior to the initiation of negotiations; and(2) Purchases and occupies a decent, safe, and sanitary replacement dwellingwithin one year after the later of the following dates (except that theAgency may extend such one year period for good cause): (i) The date the person receives final payment for the displacement dwellingor, in the case of condemnation, the date the full amount of the estimateof just compensation is deposited in the court, or (ii) The date the displacing agency's obligation under andSection; 24.204is met. (b)<T3> Amount of payment.</T3> The replacement housing payment for an eligible180-day homeowner-occupant may not exceed $22,500. (See also andSection;24.404.) The payment under this subpart is limited to the amount necessaryto relocate to a comparable replacement dwelling within one year from thedate the displaced homeowner-occupant is paid for the displacement dwelling,or the date a comparable replacement dwelling is made available to suchperson, whichever is later. The payment shall be the sum of: (1) The amount by which the cost of a replacement dwelling exceeds theacquisition cost of the displacement dwelling, as determined in accordancewith paragraph (c) of this section; and (2) The increased interest costs and other debt service costs which areincurred in connection with the mortgage(s) on the replacement dwelling,as determined in accordance with paragraph (d) of this section; and (3) The reasonable expenses incidental to the purchase of the replacementdwelling, as determined in accordance with paragraph (e) of this section.(c)<T3> Price differential</T3>_(1)<T3> Basic computation.</T3> The price differential to be paid under paragraph(b)(1) of this section is the amount which must be added to the acquisitioncost of the displacement dwelling to provide a total amount equal to thelesser of: (i) The reasonabIe cost of a comparable replacement dwelling as determinedin accordance with andSection; 24.403(a); or (ii) The purchase price of the decent, safe, and sanitary replacement dwellingactually purchased and occupied by the displaced person. (2)<T3> Mixed-use and multifamily properties.</T3> If the displacement dwellingwas part of a property that contained another dwelling unit and/or spaceused for non-residential purposes, and/or is located on a lot larger thantypical for residential purposes, only that portion of the acquisitionpayment which is actually attributable to the displacement dwelling shallbe considered its acquisition cost when computing the price differential.(3)<T3> Insurance proceeds.</T3> To the extent necessary to avoid duplicatecompensation, the amount of any insurance proceeds received by a personin connection with a loss to the displacement dwelling due to a catastrophicoccurrence (fire, flood, etc.) shall be included in the acquisition costof the displacement dwelling when computing the price differential. (Alsosee andSection; 24.3.) (4)<T3> Owner retention of displacement dwelling.</T3> If the owner retainsownership of his or her dwelling, moves it from the displacement site,and reoccupies it on a replacement site, the purchase price of the replacementdwelling shall be the sum of: (i) The cost of moving and restoring the dwelling to a condition comparableto that prior to the move; and (ii) The cost of making the unit a decent, safe, and sanitary replacementdwelling (defined at andSection; 24.2(f)); and (iii) The current fair market value for residential use of the replacementsite (see Appendix A of this part, andSection; 24.401(c)(4)(iii)), unlessthe claimant rented the displacement site and there is a reasonable opportunityfor the claimant to rent a suitable replacement site; and (iv) The retention value of the dwelling, if such retention value is reflectedin the ``acquisition cost'' used when computing the replacement housingpayment. (d)<T3> Increased mortgage interest costs.</T3> The displacing agency shalldetermine the factors to be used in computing the amount to be paid toa displaced person under paragraph (b)(2) of this section. The paymentfor increased mortgage interest cost shall be the amount which will reducethe mortgage balance on a new mortgage to an amount which could be amortizedwith the same monthly payment for principal and interest as that for themortgage(s) on the displacement dwelling. In addition, payments shall includeother debt service costs, if not paid as incidenta1 costs, and shall bebased only on bona fide mortgages that were valid liens on the displacementdwelling for at least 180 days prior to the initiation of negotiations.Paragraphs (d) (1) through (5) of this section shall apply to the computationof the increased mortgage interest costs payment, which payment shall becontingent upon a mortgage being placed on the replacement dwelling. (1) The payment shall be based on the unpaid mortgage balance(s) on thedisplacement dwelling; however, in the event the person obtains a smallermortgage than the mortgage balance(s) computed in the buydown determinationthe payment will be prorated and reduced accordingly. (See Appendix A ofthis part.) In the case of a home equity loan the unpaid balance shallbe that balance which existed 180 days prior to the initiation of negotiationsor the balance on the date of acquisition, whichever is less.(2) The payment shall be based on the remaining term of the mortgage(s)on the displacement dwelling or the term of the new mortgage, whicheveris shorter.(3) The interest rate on the new mortgage used in determining the amountof the payment shall not exceed the prevailing fixed interest rate forconventional mortgages currently charged by mortgage lending institutionsin the area in which the replacement dwelling is located.(4) Purchaser's points and loan origination or assumption fees, but notseller's points, shall be paid to the extent:(i) They are not paid as incidental expenses;(ii) They do not exceed rates normal to similar real estate transactionsin the area;(iii) The Agency determines them to be necessary; and(iv) The computation of such points and fees shall be based on the unpaidmortgage balance on the displacement dwelling, less the amount determinedfor the reduction of such mortgage balance under this section.(5) The displaced person shall be advised of the approximate amount ofthis payment and the conditions that must be met to receive the paymentas soon as the facts relative to the person's current mortgage (s) areknown and the payment shall be made available at or near the time of closingon the replacement dwelling in order to reduce the new mortgage as intended.(e)<T3> Incidental expenses.</T3> The incidental expenses to be paid underparagraph (b)(3) of this section or andSection; 24.402(c)(1) are those necessaryand reasonable costs actually incurred by the displaced person incidentto the purchase of a replacement dwelling, and customarily paid by thebuyer, including:(1) Legal, closing, and related costs, including those for title search,preparing conveyance instruments, notary fees, preparing surveys and plats,and recording fees.(2) Lender, FHA, or VA application and appraisal fees.(3) Loan origination or assumption fees that do not represent prepaid interest.(4) Certification of structural soundness and termite inspection when required.(5) Credit report.(6) Owner's and mortgagee's evidence of title, e.g., title insurance, notto exceed the costs for a comparable replacement dwelling.(7) Escrow agent's fee.(8) State revenue or documentary stamps, sales or transfer taxes (not toexceed the costs for a comparable replacement dwelling).(9) Such other costs as the Agency determines to be incidental to the purchase.(f)<T3> Rental assistance payment for 180-day homeowner.</T3> A 180-day homeowner-occupant,who could be eligible for a replacement housing payment under paragraph(a) of this section but elects to rent a replacement dwelling, is eligiblefor a rental assistance payment not to exceed $5,250, computed and disbursedin accordance with andSection; 24.402(b).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 24.402</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Replacement housing payment for 90-day occupants.</ITAG>(a)<T3> Eligibility.</T3> A tenant or owner-occupant displaced from a dwellingis entitled to a payment not to exceed $5,250 for rental assistance, ascomputed in accordance with paragraph (b) of this section, or downpaymentassistance, as computed in accordance with paragraph (c) of this section,if such displaced person:(1) Has actually and lawfully occupied the displacement dwelling for atleast 90 days immediately prior to the initiation of negotiations; and(2) Has rented, or purchased, and occupied a decent, safe, and sanitaryreplacement dwelling within 1 year (unless the Agency extends this periodfor good cause) after:(i) For a tenant, the date he or she moves from the displacement dwelling,or(ii) For an owner-occupant, the later of:(A) The date he or she receives final payment for the displacement dwelling,or in the case of condemnation, the date the full amount of the estimateof just compensation is deposited with the court; or(B) The date he or she moves from the displacement dwelling.(b)<T3> Rental assistance payment_</T3>(1)<T3> Amount of payment.</T3> An eligible displaced person who rents a replacementdwelling is entitled to a payment not to exceed $5,250 for rental assistance.(See also andSection; 24.404.) Such payment shall be 42 times the amountobtained by subtracting the base monthly rental for the displacement dwellingfrom the lesser of:(i) The monthly rent and estimated average monthly cost of utilities fora comparable replacement dwelling; or(ii) The monthly rent and estimated average monthly cost of utilities forthe decent, safe, and sanitary replacement dwelling actually occupied bythe displaced person.(2)<T3> Base monthly rental for displacement dwelling.</T3> The base monthlyrental for the displacement dwelling is the lesser of:(i) The average monthly cost for rent and utilities at the displacementdwelling for a reasonable period prior to displacement, as determined bythe Agency. (For an owner-occupant, use the fair market rent for the displacementdwelling. For a tenant who paid little or no rent for the displacementdwelling, use the fair market rent, unless its use would result in a hardshipbecause of the person's income or other circumstances); or(ii) Thirty (30) percent of the person's average gross household income.(If the person refuses to provide appropriate evidence of income or isa dependent, the base monthly rental shall be established solely on thecriteria in paragraph (b)(2)(i) of this section. A full time student orresident of an institution may be assumed to be a dependent, unless theperson demonstrates otherwise.); or(iii) The total of the amounts designated for shelter and utilities ifreceiving a welfare assistance payment from a program that designates theamounts for shelter and utilities.(3)<T3> Manner of disbursement.</T3> A rental assistance payment may, at theAgency's discretion, be disbursed in either a lump sum or in installments.However, except as limited by andSection; 24.403(f), the full amount vestsimmediately, whether or not there is any later change in the person's incomeor rent, or in the condition or location of the person's housing.(c)<T3> Downpayment assistance payment</T3>_(1)<T3> Amount of payment. </T3>An eligible displaced person who purchasesa replacement dwelling is entitled to a downpayment assistance paymentin the amount the person would receive under paragraph (b) of this sectionif the person rented a comparable replacement dwelling. At the discretionof the Agency, a downpayment assistance payment may be increased to anyamount not to exceed $5,250. However, the payment to a displaced homeownershall not exceed the amount the owner would receive under andSection; 24.401(b)if he or she met the 180-day occupancy requirement. An Agency's discretionto provide the maximum payment shall be exercised in a uniform and consistentmanner, so that eligible displaced persons in like circumstances are treatedequally. A displaced person eligible to receive a payment as a 180-dayowner-occupant under andSection; 24.401(a) is not eligible for this payment.(See also Appendix A of this part, andSection; 24.402(c).)(2)<T3> Application of payment.</T3> The full amount of the replacement housingpayment for downpayment assistance must be applied to the purchase priceof the replacement dwelling and related incidental expenses.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 24.403</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Additional rules governing replacement housing payments.</ITAG>(a)<T3> Determining cost of comparable replacement dwelling.</T3> The upperlimit of a replacement housing payment shall be based on the cost of acomparable replacement dwelling (defined at andSection; 24.2(d)).(1) If available, at least three comparable replacement dwellings shallbe examined and the payment computed on the basis of the dwelling mostnearly representative of, and equal to, or better than, the displacementdwelling. An adjustment shall be made to the asking price of any dwelling,to the extent justified by local market data (see also andSection; 24.205(a)(2)and Appendix A of this part). An obviously overpriced dwelling may be ignored.(2) If the site of the comparable replacement dwelling lacks a major exteriorattribute of the displacement dwelling site, (e.g., the site is significantlysmaller or does not contain a swimming pool), the value of such attributeshall be subtracted from the acquisition cost of the displacement dwellingfor purposes of computing the payment.(3) If the acquisition of a portion of a typical residential property causesthe displacement of the owner from the dwelling and the remainder is abuildable residential lot, the Agency may offer to purchase the entireproperty. If the owner refuses to sell the remainder to the Agency, thefair market value of the remainder may be added to the acquisition costof the displacement dwelling for purposes of computing the replacementhousing payment.(4) To the extent feasible, comparable replacement dwellings shall be selectedfrom the neighborhood in which the displacement dwelling was located or,if that is not possible, in nearby or similar neighborhoods where housingcosts are generally the same or higher.(b)<T3> Inspection of replacement dwelling.</T3> Before making a replacementhousing payment or releasing a payment from escrow, the Agency or its designatedrepresentative shall inspect the replacement dwelling and determine whetherit is a decent, safe, and sanitary dwelling as defined at andSection; 24.2(f).(c)<T3> Purchase of replacement dwelling.</T3> A displaced person is consideredto have met the requirement to purchase a replacement dwelling, if theperson:(1) Purchases a dwelling; or(2) Purchases and rehabilitates a substandard dwelling; or(3) Relocates a dwelling which he or she owns or purchases; or(4) Constructs a dwelling on a site he or she owns or purchases; or(5) Contracts for the purchase or construction of a dwelling on a siteprovided by a builder or on a site the person owns or purchases.(6) Currently owns a previously purchased dwelling and site, valuationof which shall be on the basis of current fair market value. (d)<T3> Occupancy requirements for displacement or replacement dwelling.</T3>No person shall be denied eligibility for a replacement housing paymentsolely because the person is unable to meet the occupancy requirementsset forth in these regulations for a reason beyond his or her control,including: (1) A disaster, an emergency, or an imminent threat to the public healthor welfare, as determined by the President, the Federal agency fundingthe project, or the displacing agency; or (2) Another reason, such as a delay in the construction of the replacementdwelling, military reserve duty, or hospital stay, as determined by theAgency. (e)<T3> Conversion of payment.</T3> A displaced person who initially rentsa replacement dwelling and receives a rental assistance payment under andSection;24.402(b) is eligible to receive a payment under andSection; 24.401 or andSection;24.402(c) if he or she meets the eligibility criteria for such payments,including purchase and occupancy within the prescribed 1-year period. Anyportion of the rental assistance payment that has been disbursed shallbe deducted from the payment computed under andSection; 24.401 or andSection;24.402(c). (f)<T3> Payment after death.</T3> A replacement housing payment is personalto the displaced person and upon his or her death the undisbursed portionof any such payment shall not be paid to the heirs or assigns, except that: (1) The amount attributable to the displaced person's period of actualoccupancy of the replacement housing shall be paid. (2) The full payment shall be disbursed in any case in which a memberof a displaced family dies and the other family member(s) continue to occupya decent, safe, and sanitary replacement dwelling. (3) Any portion of a replacement housing payment necessary to satisfythe legal obligation of an estate in connection with the selection of areplacement dwelling by or on behalf of a deceased person shall be disbursedto the estate.<ITAG tagnum="80"> andSection; 24.404</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Replacement housing of last resort.</ITAG> (a)<T3> Determination to provide replacement housing of last resort.</T3>Whenever a program or project cannot proceed on a timely basis becausecomparable replacement dwellings are not available within the monetarylimits for owners or tenants, as specified in andSection; 24.401 or andSection;24.402, as appropriate, the Agency shall provide additional or alternativeassistance under the provisions of this subpart. Any decision to providelast resort housing assistance must be adequately justified either: (1) On a case-by-case basis, for good cause, which means that appropriateconsideration has been given to: (i) The availability of comparable replacement housing in the programor project area; and (ii) The resources available to provide comparable replacement housing;and (iii) The individual circumstances of the displaced person; or (2) By a determination that: (i) There is little, if any, comparable replacement housing availableto displaced persons within an entire program or project area; and, therefore,last resort housing assistance is necessary for the area as a whole; and (ii) A program or project cannot be advanced to completion in a timelymanner without last resort housing assistance; and (iii) The method selected for providing last resort housing assistanceis cost effective, considering all elements which contribute to total programor project costs. (Will project delay justify waiting for less expensivecomparable replacement housing to become available?) (b)<T3> Basic rights of persons to be displaced.</T3> Notwithstanding anyprovision of this subpart, no person shall be required to move from a displacementdwelling unless comparable replacement housing is available to such person.No person may be deprived of any rights the person may have under the UniformAct or this part. The Agency shall not require any displaced person toaccept a dwelling provided by the Agency under these procedures (unlessthe Agency and the displaced person have entered into a contract to doso) in lieu of any acquisition payment or any relocation payment for whichthe person may otherwise be eligible. (c)<T3> Methods of providing comparable replacement housing.</T3> Agenciesshall have broad latitude in implementing this subpart, but implementationshall be for reasonable cost, on a case-by-case basis unless an exceptionto case-by-case analysis is justified for an entire project. (1) The methods of providing replacement housing of last resort include,but are not limited to: (i) A replacement housing payment in excess of the limits set forth inandSection; 24.401 or andSection; 24.402. A rental assistance subsidy underthis section may be provided in installments or in a lump sum at the Agency'sdiscretion. (ii) Rehabilitation of and/or additions to an existing replacement dwelling. (iii) The construction of a new replacement dwelling. (iv) The provision of a direct loan, which requires regular amortizationor deferred repayment. The loan may be unsecured or secured by the realproperty. The loan may bear interest or be interest-free. (v) The relocation and, if necessary, rehabilitation of a dwelling.(vi) The purchase of land and/or a replacement dwelling by the displacingagency and subsequent sale or lease to, or exchange with a displaced person.(vii) The removal of barriers to the handicapped.(viii) The change in status of the displaced person with his or her concurrencefrom tenant to homeowner when it is more cost effective to do so, as incases where a downpayment may be less expensive than a last resort rentalassistance payment. (2) Under special circumstances, consistent with the definition of a comparablereplacement dwelling, modified methods of providing replacement housingof last resort permit consideration of replacement housing based on spaceand physical characteristics different from those in the displacement dwelling(see Appendix A, of this part, andSection; 24.404), including upgraded, butsmaller replacement housing that is decent, safe, and sanitary and adequateto accommodate individuals or families displaced from marginal or substandardhousing with probable functional obsolesence. In no event, however, shalla displaced person be required to move into a dwelling that is not functionallyequivalent in accordance with andSection; 24.2(d)(2).(3) The agency shall provide assistance under this subpart to a displacedperson who is not eligible to receive a replacement housing payment underandSection;andSection; 24.401 and 24.402 because of failure to meet the lengthof occupancy requirement when comparable replacement rental housing isnot available at rental rates within the person's financial means, whichis 30 percent of the person's gross monthly household income. Such assistanceshall cover a period of 42 months.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart F_Mobile Homes</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 24.501</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Applicability.</ITAG>This subpart describes the requirements governing the provision of relocationpayments to a person displaced from a mobile home and/or mobile home sitewho meets the basic eligibility requirements of this part. Except as modifiedby this subpart, such a displaced person is entitled to a moving expensepayment in accordance with Subpart D and a replacement housing paymentin accordance with Subpart E to the same extent and subject to the samerequirements as persons displaced from conventional dwellings.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 24.502</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Moving and related expenses_mobile homes.</ITAG>(a) A homeowner-occupant displaced from a mobile home or mobile homesiteis entitled to a payment for the cost of moving his or her mobile homeon an actual cost basis in accordance with andSection; 24.301. A non-occupantowner of a rented mobile home is eligible for actual cost reimbursementunder andSection; 24.303. However, if the mobile home is not acquired, butthe homeowner-occupant obtains a replacement housing payment under oneof the circumstances described at andSection; 24.503(a)(3), the owner isnot eligible for payment for moving the mobile home, but may be eligiblefor a payment for moving personal property from the mobile home.(b) The following rules apply to payments for actual moving expenses underandSection; 24.301: (1) A displaced mobile homeowner, who moves the mobile home to a replacementsite, is eligible for the reasonable cost of disassembling, moving, andreassembling any attached appurtenances, such as porches, decks, skirting,and awnings, which were not acquired, anchoring of the unit, and utility``hook-up'' charges.(2) If a mobile home requires repairs and/or modifications so that it canbe moved and/or made decent, safe, and sanitary, and the Agency determinesthat it would be economically feasible to incur the additional expense,the reasonable cost of such repairs and/or modifications is reimbursable.(3) A nonreturnable mobile home park entrance fee is reimbursable to theextent it does not exceed the fee at a comparable mobile home park, ifthe person is displaced from a mobile home park or the Agency determinesthat payment of the fee is necessary to effect relocation.<ITAG tagnum="80"> andSection; 24.503</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Replacement housing payment for 180-day mobile homeowner-occupants.</ITAG>(a) A displaced owner-occupant of a mobile home is entitled to a replacementhousing payment, not to exceed $22,500, under andSection; 24.401 if:(1) The person both owned the displacement mobile home and occupied iton the displacement site for at least 180 days immediately prior to theinitiation of negotiations;(2) The person meets the other basic eligibility requirements at andSection;24.401(a); and(3) The Agency acquires the mobile home and/or mobile home site, or themobile home is not acquired by the Agency but the owner is displaced fromthe mobile home because the Agency determines that the mobile home:(i) Is not and cannot economically be made decent, safe, and sanitary;or(ii) Cannot be relocated without substantial damage or unreasonable cost;or(iii) Cannot be relocated because there is no available comparable replacementsite; or(iv) Cannot be relocated because it does not meet mobile home park entrancerequirements.(b) If the mobile home is not acquired, and the Agency determines thatit is not practical to relocate it, the acquisition cost of the displacementdwelling used when computing the price differential amount, described atandSection; 24.401(c), shall include the salvage value or trade-in valueof the mobile home, whichever is higher.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 24.504</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Replacement housing payment for 90-day mobile home occupants.</ITAG>A displaced tenant or owner-occupant of a mobile home is eligible for areplacement housing payment, not to exceed $5,250, under andSection; 24.402if: (a) The person actually occupied the displacement mobile home on the displacementsite for at least 90 days immediately prior to the initiation of negotiations; (b) The person meets the other basic eligibility requirements at andSection;24.402(a); and (c) The Agency acquires the mobile home and/or mobile home site, or themobile home is not acquired by the Agency but the owner or tenant is displacedfrom the mobile home because of one of the circumstances described at andSection;24.503(a)(3).<ITAG tagnum="80"> andSection; 24.505</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Additional rules governing relocation payments to mobile home occupants.</ITAG> (a) <T3>Replacement housing payment based on dwelling and site.</T3> Both themobile home and mobile home site must be considered when computing a replacementhousing payment. For example, a displaced mobile home occupant may haveowned the displacement mobile home and rented the site or may have rentedthe displacement mobile home and owned the site. Also, a person may electto purchase a replacement mobile home and rent a replacement site, or renta replacement mobile home and purchase a replacement site. In such cases,the total replacement housing payment shall consist of a payment for adwelling and a payment for a site, each computed under the applicable sectionin Subpart E. However, the total replacement housing payment under SubpartE shall not exceed the maximum payment (either $22,500 or $5,250) permittedunder the section that governs the computation for the dwelling. (See alsoandSection; 24.403(b).) (b)<T3> Cost of comparable replacement dwelling</T3>_(1) If a comparable replacementmobile home is not available, the replacement housing payment shall becomputed on the basis of the reasonable cost of a conventional comparablereplacement dwelling. (2) If the Agency determines that it would be practical to relocate themobile home, but the owner-occupant elects not to do so, the Agency maydetermine that, for purposes of computing the price differential underandSection; 24.401(c), the cost of a comparable replacement dwelling is thesum of: (i) The value of the mobile home, (ii) The cost of any necessary repairs or modifications, and (iii) The estimated cost of moving the mobile home to a replacement site. (c)<T3> Initiation of negotiations.</T3> If the mobile home is not actuallyacquired, but the occupant is considered displaced under this part, the``initiation of negotiations'' is the initiation of negotiations to acquirethe land, or, if the land is not acquired, the written notification thathe or she is a displaced person under this part. (d) <T3>Person moves mobile home.</T3> If the owner is reimbursed for the costof moving the mobile home under this part, he or she is not eligible toreceive a replacement housing payment to assist in purchasing or rentinga replacement mobile home. The person may, however, be eligible for assistancein purchasing or renting a replacement site. (e) <T3>Partial acquisition of mobile home park.</T3> The acquisition of aportion of a mobile home park property may leave a remaining part of theproperty that is not adequate to continue the operation of the park. Ifthe Agency determines that a mobile home located in the remaining partof the property must be moved as a direct result of the project, the ownerand any tenant shall be considered a displaced person who is entitled torelocation payments and other assistance under this part.<ITAG tagnum="52"> Subpart G_Certification</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80"> andSection; 24.601</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Purpose.</ITAG>This subpart permits a State Agency to fulfill its responsibilities underthe Uniform Act by certifying that it shall operate in accordance withState laws and regulations which shall accomplish the purpose and effectof the Uniform Act, in lieu of providing the assurances required by andSection;24.4 of this part.<ITAG tagnum="80"> andSection; 24.602</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Certification application.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General.</T3> (1) The State governor, or his or her designee, on behalfof any State agency or agencies may apply for certification in accordancewith this section. (2) The governor may designate a lead agency to administer certificationin accordance with this section. (b) <T3>Responsibilities of State agency_</T3>(1) The State agency's applicationshall be submitted to the governor, or his or her designee, for approvalor disapproval. (2) The State agency application shall contain a statement that the Stateagency shall carry out the responsibilities imposed by the Uniform Act.The State agency application shall include a copy of the State laws andregulations which shall accomplish the purpose and effect of the UniformAct.(c)<T3> Responsibilities of governor or his or her designee. </T3>(1) Thegovernor, or his or her designee, shall approve or disapprove the Stateagency's application.(2) The governor, or his or her designee, shall have discretion to disapproveany State agency application.(3) The governor, or his or her designee, shall analyze State law and regulationsand shall certify that they accomplish the purpose and effect of the UniformAct.(4) The governor, or his or her designee, shall determine in writing whetherthe State agency's professional staffing is adequate to fully implementthe State law and regulations.(5) If the State agency's application is approved by the governor, or hisor her designee, it shall be transmitted to the Federal agency providingfinancial assistance to the State agency, with an information copy to theFederal lead agency.(6) When a determination is received from the Federal funding agency, thegovernor, or his or her designee, shall notify the State agency.(d)<T3> Responsibilities of Federal funding agency.</T3> (1) The Federal fundingagency shall accept the approved application for certification providedby the governor or his or her designee and shall not conduct an independentreview unless or until future monitoring or other appropriate indicatorsreveal program deficiencies originating therefrom.(2) The Federal funding agency shall transmit all complete, approved applications,for certification to the Federal lead agency.(3) At the same time as transmission to the Federal lead agency or duringthe public comment period, the Federal funding agency shall provide tothe lead agency its written assessment of the State agency's capabilitiesto operate under certification.(4) The Federal funding agency shall promptly notify the governor, or hisor her designee, of the Federal lead agency's determination described inparagraph (e)(2) of this section.(5) The Federal funding agency shall recognize the State agency's certificationwithin 30 days of the Federal lead agency's finding.(e)<T3> Responsibilities of Federal lead agency. </T3>(1) The lead agencyshall:(i) Accept the approval provided by the governor, or his or her designee,and shall not conduct an independent review, except as provided for inparagraphs (e)(1)(ii), (iii) and (iv) of this section, unless future monitoringor other appropriate indicators reveal program deficiencies originatingtherefrom;(ii) Analyze the extent to which the provisions of the applicable Statelaws and regulations accomplish the purpose and effect of the Uniform Act,with particular emphasis on the definition of a displaced person, the categoriesof assistance required, and the levels of assistance provided to personsin such categories;(iii) Provide a 60-day period of public review and comment, and solicitand consider the views of interested general purpose local governmentswithin the State, as well as the views of interested Federal and Stateagencies and consider all comments received as a result; and(iv) Consider any extraordinary information it believes to be relevant.(2) After considering all the information provided, the lead agency shalleither make a finding that the State agency will carry out the Federalagency's Uniform Act responsibility in accordance with State laws and regulationswhich shall accomplish the same purpose and effect as the Uniform Act,or shall make a determination that a finding cannot be made; and shallso inform the Federal funding agency.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 24.603</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Monitoring and corrective action.</ITAG>(a) The Federal lead agency shall, in coordination with other Federal agencies,monitor from time to time State agency implementation of programs or projectsconducted under the certification process and the State agency shall makeavailable any information required for this purpose.(b) A Federal agency that has accepted a State Agency's certification pursuantto this subpart should withhold its approval of any of its Federal financialassistance to any project, program, or activity, in progress or to be undertakenby such State agency, if it is found by the Federal agency that the Stateagency has failed to comply with the applicable State law and regulationsimplementing those provisions of the Uniform Act for which the State agencywould otherwise have provided the assurances required by sections 210 and305 of the Uniform Act. The Federal agency may withhold Federal financialassistance if the certifying State agency fails to comply with the applicableState law and regulations implementing other provisions of the UniformAct. The Federal agency shall notify the lead agency at least 15 days priorto any decision to withhold funds under this subpart. The lead agency mayconsult with the Federal agency upon receiving such notification. The leadagency will also inform other Federal agencies which have accepted certificationunder this subpart from the same State agency of the pending action.(c) A Federal agency may, after consultation with the lead agency, andnotice to and consultation with the governor, or his or her designee, rescindany previous approval provided under this subpart if the certifying Stateagency fails to comply with its certification or with applicable Statelaw and regulations. The Federal agency shall initiate consultation withthe lead agency at least 30 days prior to any decision to rescind approvalof a certification under this subpart. The lead agency will also informother Federal agencies which have accepted a certification under this subpartfrom the same State agency, and will take whatever other action that maybe appropriate.(d) Section 103(b)(2) of the Uniform Act, as amended, requires that thehead of the lead agency report biennially to the Congress on State agencyimplementation of section 103. To enable adequate preparation of the prescribedbiennial report, the lead agency may require periodic information or datafrom affected Federal or State agencies.<ITAG tagnum="84"> Appendix A to Part 24_Additional Information</ITAG> This appendix provides additional information to explain the intent ofcertain provisions of this part.<ITAG tagnum="81"> Subpart A_General</ITAG> Section 24.2 Definitions<T3> Section 24.2(d)(2)  Definition of comparable replacement dwelling.</T3>The requirement in andSection; 24.2(d)(2) that a comparable replacement dwellingbe ``functionally equivalent'' to the displacement dwelling means thatit must perform the same function, provide the same utility, and be capableof contributing to a comparable style of living as the displacement dwelling.While it need not possess every feature of the displacement dwelling, theprincipal features must be present. For example, if the displacement dwelling contains a pantry and a similardwelling is not available, a replacement dwelling with ample kitchen cupboardsmay be acceptable. Insulated and heated space in a garage might prove anadequate substitute for basement workshop space. A dining area may substitutefor a separate dining room. Under some circumstances, attic space couldsubstitute for basement space for storage purposes, and vice versa. Only in unusual circumstances may a comparable replacement dwelling containfewer rooms or, consequentially, less living space than the displacementdwelling. Such may be the case when a decent, safe, and sanitary replacementdwelling (which by definition is ``adequate to accommodate'' the displacedperson) may be found to be ``functionally equivalent'' to a larger butvery run-down substandard displacement dwelling. Section 24.2(d)(7) requires that a comparable replacement dwelling fora person who is not receiving assistance under any government housing programbefore displacement must be currently available on the private market withoutany subsidy under a government housing program. A public housing unit may qualify as a comparable replacement dwellingonly for a person displaced from a public housing unit; a privately-owneddwelling with a housing program subsidy tied to the unit may qualify asa comparable replacement dwelling only for a person displaced from a similarlysubsidized unit or public housing; a housing program subsidy to a person(not tied to the building), such as a HU Section 8 Existing Housing ProgramCertificate or a Housing Voucher, may be reflected in an offer of a comparablereplacement dwelling to a person receiving a similar subsidy or occupyinga privately-owned subsidized unit or public housing unit before displacement. However, nothing in this part prohibits an Agency from offering, or precludesa person from accepting, assistance under a government housing program,even if the person did not receive similar assistance before displacement.However, the Agency is obligated to inform the person of his or her optionsunder this part. (If a person accepts assistance under a government housingprogram, the rental assistance payment under andSection; 24.402 would becomputed on the basis of the person's actual out-of-pocket cost for thereplacement housing.)<T3> Section 24.2(g)(2) Persons not displaced.</T3> Section 24.2(g)(2)(iv)recognizes that there are circumstances where the acquisition of real propertytakes place without the intent or necessity that an occupant of the propertybe permanently displaced. Because such occupants are not considered ``displacedpersons'' under this part, great care must be exercised to ensure thatthey are treated fairly and equitably. For example, if the tenant-occupantof a dwelling will not be displaced, but is required to relocate temporarilyin connection with the project, the temporarily-occupied housing must bedecent, safe, and sanitary and the tenant must be reimbursed for all reasonableout-of-pocket expenses incurred in connection with the temporary relocation,including moving expenses and increased housing costs during the temporaryrelocation. It is also noted that any person who disagrees with the Agency's determinationthat he or she is not a displaced person under this part may file an appealin accordance with andSection; 24.10.<T3> Section 24.2(k) Initiation of negotiations.</T3> This section of thepart; provides a special definition for acquisitions and displacementsunder Pub. L. 96-510 or Superfund. These activities differ under Superfundin that relocation may precede acquisition, the reverse of the normal sequence.Superfund is a program designed to clean up hazardous waste sites. Whensuch a site is discovered, it may be necessary, in certain limited circumstances,to alert the public to the danger and to the advisability of moving immediately.If a decision is made later to permanently relocate such persons, thosewho had moved earlier would no longer be on site when a formal, writtenoffer to acquire the property was made and thus would lose their eligibilityfor a replacement housing payment. In order to prevent this unfair outcome,we have provided a definition which is based on the public health advisoryor announcement of permanent relocation.Section 24.3 No Duplication of Payments This section prohibits an Agency from making a payment to a person underthese regulations that would duplicate another payment the person receivesunder Federal, State, or local law. The Agency is not required to conductan exhaustive search for such other payments; it is only required to avoidcreating a duplication based on the Agency's knowledge at the time a paymentunder these regulations is computed. Section 24.9  Recordkeeping and Reports<T3> Section 24.9(c) Reports.</T3> This paragraph allows Federal agenciesto require the submission of a report on activities under the Uniform Actno more frequently than once every three years. The report, if required,will cover activities during the Federal fiscal year immediately priorto the submission date. In order to minimize the administrative burdenon Agencies implementing this part, a basic report form (see Appendix Bof this part) has been developed which, with only minor modifications,would be used in all Federal and federally-assisted programs or projects.<ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart B_Real Property Acquisition </ITAG>Section 24.101 Applicabilityof Acquisition Requirements <T3>Section 24.101(b) Less-than-full-fee interest in real property.</T3>This provision provides a benchmark beyond which the requirements of thesubpart clearly apply to leases. However, the Agency may apply the regulationsto any less-than-full-fee acquisition which is short of 50 years but whichin its judgment should be covered. Section 24.102 Basic Acquisition Policies <T3>Section 24.102(d) Establishment of offer of just compensation.</T3>The initial offer to the property owner may not be less than the amountof the Agency's approved appraisal, but may exceed that amount if the Agencydetermines that a greater amount reflects just compensation for the property.<T3>Section 24.102(f) Basic negotiation procedures.</T3> It is intendedthat an offer to an owner be adequately presented, and that the owner beproperly informed. Personal, face-to-face contact should take place, iffeasible, but this section is not intended to require such contact in allcases. <T3>Section 24.102(i) Administrative settlement. </T3>This section providesguidance on administrative settlement as an alternative to judicial resolutionof a difference of opinion on the value of a property, in order to avoidunnecessary litigation and congestion in the courts.All relevant facts and circumstances should be considered by an Agencyofficial delegated this authority. Appraisers, including reviewing appraisers,must not be pressured to adjust their estimate of value for the purposeof justifying such settlements. Such action would invalidate the appraisalprocess. <T3>Section 24.102(j) Payment before taking possession. </T3>It is intendedthat a right-of-entry for construction purposes be obtained only in theexceptional case, such as an emergency project, when there is no time tomake an appraisal and purchase offer and the property owner is agreeableto the process.<T3>Section 24.102(m) Fair rental.</T3> Section 301(6) of the Uniform Actlimits what an Agency may charge when a former owner or previous occupantof a property is permitted to rent the property for a short term or whenoccupancy is subject to termination by the Agency on short notice. Suchrent may not exceed ``the fair rental value * * * to a short-term occupier.''Generally, the Agency's right to terminate occupancy on short notice (whetheror not the renter also has that right) supports the establishment of alesser rental than might be found in a longer, fixed-term situation. Section 24.103 Criteria for Appraisals <T3>Section 24.103(a) Standards of appraisal. </T3>In paragraph (a)(3)of this section, it is intended that all relevant and reliable approachesto value be utilized. However, where an Agency determines that the marketapproach will be adequate by itself because of the type of property beingappraised and the availability of sales data, it may limit the appraisalassignment to the market approach. <T3>Section 24.103(b) Influence of the project on just compensation.</T3>As used in this section, the term ``project'' is intended to mean an undertakingwhich is planned, designed, and intended to operate as a unit. Because of the public knowledge of the proposed project, property valuesmay be affected. A property owner should not be penalized because of adecrease in value caused by the proposed project nor reap a windfall atpublic expense because of increased value created by the proposed project.<T3>Section 24.103(e) Conflict of interest. </T3>The overall objectiveis to minimize the risk of fraud and mismanagement and to promote publicconfidence in Federal and federally-assisted land acquisition practices.Recognizing that the costs may outweigh the benefits in some circumstances,andSection; 24.103(e) provides that the same person may both appraise andnegotiate an acquisition, if the value is $2,500 or less. However, it shouldbe noted that all appraisals must be reviewed in accordance with andSection;24.104. This includes appraisals of real property valued at $2,500, orless. Section 24.104 Review of appraisals This section recognizes that Agencies differ in the authority delegatedto the review appraiser. In some cases the reviewer establishes the amountof the offer to the owner and in other cases the reviewer makes a recommendationwhich is acted on at a higher level. It is also within Agency discretionto decide whether a second review is needed if the first review appraiserestablishes a value different from that in the appraisal report or reportson a property. Before acceptance of an appraisal, the review appraiser must determinethat the appraiser's documentation, including valuation data and the analysesof that data, demonstrates the soundness of the appraiser's opinion ofvalue. The qualifications of the review appraiser and the level of explanationof the basis for the reviewer's recommended or approved value depend onthe complexity of the appraisal problem. For a low value property requiringan uncomplicated valuation process, the reviewer's approval, endorsingthe appraiser's report, may satisfy the requirement for the reviewer'sstatement. Section 24.106 Expenses Incidental to Transfer of Title to the Agency Generally, the Agency is able to pay such incidental costs directly and,where feasible, is required to do so. In order to prevent the propertyowner from making unnecessary out-of-pocket expenditures and to avoid duplicationof expenses, the property owner should be informed early in the acquisitionprocess of the Agency's intent to make such arrangements. In addition,it is emphasized that such expenses must be reasonable and necessary.<ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart C_General Relocation Requirements</ITAG>Section 24.204 Availabilityof Comparable Replacement Dwelling Before Displacement <T3>Section 24.204 (a) General. </T3>This provision requires that no onemay be required to move from a dwelling without one comparable replacementdwelling having been made available. In addition, andSection; 24.204(a) requiresthat, ``Where possible, three or more comparable replacement dwellingsshall be made available.'' Thus the basic standard for the number of referralsrequired under this section is three. Only in situations where three comparablereplacement dwellings are not available (e.g., when the local housing marketdoes not contain three comparable dwellings) may the Agency make fewerthan three referrals.Section 24.205 Relocation Assistance Advisory Services Section 24.205(c)(2)(ii)(C) is intended to emphasize that if the comparablereplacement dwellings are located in areas of minority concentration, minoritypersons should, if possible, also be given opportunities to relocate toreplacement dwellings not located in such areas.Section 24.207 General Requirements_Claims for Relocation Payments Section 24.207(a) allows an Agency to make a payment for low cost or uncomplicatedmoves without additional documentation, as long as the payment is limitedto the amount of the lowest acceptable bid or estimate, as provided forin andSection; 24.303(c).<ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart D_Payment for Moving and Related Expenses</ITAG>Section 24.306Fixed Payment for Moving Expenses_Nonresidential Moves<T3>Section 24.306(d) Nonprofit organizations. </T3>Gross revenues mayinclude membership fees, class fees, cash donations, tithes, receipts fromsales or other forms of fund collection that enables the non-profit organizationto operate. Administrative expenses are those for administrative supportsuch as rent, utilities, salaries, advertising and other like items aswell as fund raising expenses. Operating expenses for carrying out thepurposes of the non-profit organization are not included in administrativeexpenses. The monetary receipts and expense amounts may be verified withcertified financial statements or financial documents required by publicagencies.Section 24.307 Discretionary Utility Relocation Payments Section 24.307(c) describes the issues which must be agreed to betweenthe displacing agency and the utility facility owner in determining theamount of the relocation payment. To facilitate and aid in reaching suchagreement, the practices in the Federal Highway Administration regulation,23 CFR 645, Subpart A, Utility Relocations, Adjustments and Reimbursement,should be followed.<ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart E_Replacement Housing Payments</ITAG>Section 24.401 ReplacementHousing Payment for 180-Day Homeowner-Occupants<T3>Section 24.401(a)(2). </T3>The provision for extending eligibilityfor a replacement housing payment beyond the one year period for good causemeans that an extension may be granted if some event beyond the controlof the displaced person such as acute or life threatening illness, badweather preventing the completion of construction of a replacement dwellingor other like circumstances should cause delays in occupying a decent,safe, and sanitary replacement dwelling.<T3>Section 24.401(c) </T3>Price differential. The provision in andSection;24.401(c)(4)(iii) to use the current fair market value for residentialuse does not mean the Agency must have the property appraised. Any reasonablemethod for arriving at the fair market va1ue may be used.<T3>Section 24.401(d) Increased mortgage interest costs. </T3>The provisionin andSection; 24.401(d) set forth the factors to be used in computing thepayment that will be required to reduce a person's replacement mortgage(added to the downpayment) to an amount which can be amortized at the samemonthly payment for principal and interest over the same period of timeas the remaining term on the displacement mortgages. This payment is commonlyknown as the ``buydown.'' The remaining principal balance, the interest rate, and monthly principaland interest payments for the old mortgage aa well as the interest rate,points and term for the new mortgage must be known to compute the increasedmortgage interest costs. If the combination of interest and points forthe new mortgage exceeds the current prevailing fixed interest rate andpoints for conventional mortgages and there is no justification for theexcessive rate, then the current prevailing fixed interest rate and pointsshall be used in the computations. Justification may be the unavailabilityof the current prevailing rate due to the amount of the new mortgage, creditdifficulties, or other similar reasons.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L0,tp8,p0,8/9,g1,t1,i1,s50,8</C><T4>Sample Computation</T4><H1> </H1><H1> </H1> Old Mortgage: <ITAG tagnum="3">Remaining Principal Balance </ITAG><D>$50,000 </D><ITAG tagnum="3">Monthly Payment (principal and interest) </ITAG><D>458.22 </D><ITAG tagnum="3">Interest rate (percent) </ITAG><D>7</D>New Mortgage: <ITAG tagnum="3">Interest rate (percent) </ITAG><D>10 </D><ITAG tagnum="3">Points </ITAG><D>3 </D><ITAG tagnum="4">Term (years) <D>15 </D></ITAG></ITAG>  Remaining term of the old mortgage is determined to be 174 months. (Determining,or computing, the actual remaining term is more reliable than using thedata supplied by the mortgagee). However, if it is shorter, use the termof the new mortgage and compute the needed monthly payment. Amount to be financed to maintain monthly payments of $458.22 at 10%_$42,010.18<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L0,tp0,p0,8/9,g1,t1,i1,s50,10 </C> <H1> </H1><H1> </H1> <ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>$50,000.00 </D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>^42,010.18</D><R>n,s</R><ITAG tagnum="1">Increased mortgage interest costs<D>7,989.82 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3 points on $42,010.50<D>1,260.31</D><R>n,s</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total buydown necessary to maintain payments at $458.22/month<D>9,250.13</D></ITAG></ITAG> If the new mortgage actually obtained is less than the computed amountfor a new mortgage ($42,010.18), the buydown shall be prorated accordingly.If the actual mortgage obtained in our example were $35,000, the buydownpayment would be $7,706.57 ($35,000 andCx.1; by $42,010.18 = .83 $9,250.13andmultiply; .83 = $7,706.57). The Agency is obligated to inform the person of the approximate amountof this payment and that he or she must obtain a mortgage of at least thesame amount as the old mortgage and for at least the same term in orderto receive the full amount of this payment. The displacee is also to beadvised of the interest rate and points used to calculate the payment. Section 24.402 Replacement Housing Payment for 90-Day Occupants The downpayment assistance provisions in andSection; 24.402(c) are intendedto limit such assistance to the amount of the computed rental assistancepayment for a tenant or an eligible homeowner. It does, however, providethe latitude for Agency discretion in offering downpayment assistance whichexceeds the computed rental assistance payment, up to the $5,250 statutorymaximum. This does not mean, however, that such Agency discretion may beexercised in a selective or discriminatory fashion. The displacing agencyshould develop a policy which affords equal treatment for persons in likecircumstances and this policy should be applied uniformly throughout theAgency's programs or projects. It is recommended that displacing agenciescoordinate with each other to reach a consensus on a uniform procedurefor the State and/or the local jurisdiction. For purposes of this section, the term downpayment means the downpaymentordinarily required to obtain conventional loan financing for the decent,safe, and sanitary dwelling actually purchased and occupied. However, ifthe downpayment actually required of a displaced person for the purchaseof the replacement dwelling exceeds the amount ordinarily required, theamount of the downpayment may be the amount which the Agency determinesis necessary. Section 24.403 Additional Rules Governing Replacement Housing Payments<T3> Section 24.403(a)(1).</T3> The procedure for adjusting the askingprice of comparable replacement dwellings requires that the agency provideadvisory assistance to the displaced person concerning negotiations sothat he or she may enter the market as a knowledgeable buyer. If a displacedperson elects to buy one of the selected comparables, but cannot acquirethe property for the adjusted price, it is appropriate to increase thereplacement housing payment to the actual purchase amount.Section 24.404 Replacement Housing of Last Resort<T3>Section 24.404(b) Basic rights of persons to be displaced.</T3> Thisparagraph affirms the right of a 180-day homeowner-occupant, who is eligiblefor a replacement housing payment under andSection; 24.401, to a reasonableopportunity to purchase a comparable replacement dwelling. However, itshould be read in conjunction with the definition of ``owner of a dwelling''at andSection; 24.2(p). The Agency is not required to provide persons owningonly a fractional interest in the displacement dwelling a greater levelof assistance to purchase a replacement dwelling than the Agency wouldbe required to provide such persons if they owned fee simple title to thedisplacement dwelling. If such assistance is not sufficient to buy a replacementdwelling, the Agency may provide additional purchase assistance or rentalassistance.<T3>Section 24.404(c) Methods of providing comparable replacement housing.</T3>The use of cost effective means of providing comparable replacement housingis implied throughout the subpart. The term ``reasonable cost'' is usedhere to underline the fact that while innovative means to provide housingare encouraged, they should be cost-effective.Section 24.404(c)(2) permits the use of last resort housing, in specialcases, which may involve variations from the usual methods of obtainingcomparability. However, it should be specially noted that such variationshould never result in a lowering of housing standards nor should it everresult in a lower quality of living style for the displaced person. Thephysical characteristics of the comparable replacement dwelling may bedissimilar to those of the displacement dwelling but they may never beinferior.One example might be the use of a new mobile home to replace a very substandardconventional dwelling in an area where comparable conventional dwellingsare not available.Another example could be the use of a superior, but smaller decent, safeand sanitary dwelling to replace a large, old substandard dwelling, onlya portion of which is being used as living quarters by the occupants andno other large comparable dwellings are available in the area.<ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart F_Mobile Homes</ITAG>Section 24.503 Replacement Housing Paymentfor 180-Day Mobile Homeowner-OccupantsA 180-day owner-occupant who is displaced from a mobile home on a rentedsite may be eligible for a replacement housing payment for a dwelling computedunder andSection; 24.401 and a replacement housing payment for a site computedunder andSection; 24.402. A 180-day owner-occupant of both the mobile homeand the site, who relocates the mobile home, may be eligible for a replacementhousing payment under andSection; 24.401 to assist in the purchase of a replacementsite or, under andSection; 24.402, to assist in renting a replacement site.<ITAG tagnum="84">Appendix B to Part 24_Statistical Report Form</ITAG>This appendix sets forth the statistical information collected from Agenciesin accordance with andSection; 24.9(c).General1.<T3> Report coverage.</T3> This report covers all relocation and real propertyacquisition activities under a Federal or a federally assisted projector program subject to the provisions of the Uniform Relocation Assistanceand Real Property Acquisition Policies Act of 1970, as amended by Pub.L. 100-17, 101 Stat. 132.2.<T3> Report period.</T3> Activities shall be reported on a Federal FiscalYear basis, i.e., October 1 through September 30.3.<T3> Where and when to submit report.</T3> Submit an original and two copiesof this report to (<T3>Name and Address of Federal Agency</T3>) as soon as possible afterSeptember 30, but NOT LATER THAN NOVEMBER 15.4.<T3> How to report relocation payments.</T3> The full amount of a relocationpayment shall be reported as if disbursed in the year during which theclaim was approved, regardless of whether the payment is to be paid ininstallments.5.<T3> How to report dollar amounts.</T3> Round off all money entries inParts B and C to the nearest dollar.6.<T3> Statutory references.</T3> The references in Part B indicate the sectionof the Uniform Act that authorizes the cost.Part A. Persons displacedReport in Part A the number of persons (``households,'' ``businesses, includingnonprofit organizations,'' and ``farms'') who were permanently displacedduring the fiscal year by project or program activities and moved to theirreplacement dwelling or location. This includes businesses, nonprofit organizationsand farms which, upon displacement, discontinued operations. The category``households'' includes all families and individuals. A family shall bereported as ``one'' household, <T3>not</T3> by the number of people in the family unit. Persons shallbe reported according to their status as ``owners'' or ``tenants'' of theproperty from which displaced.Part B. Relocation payments and expenses<T3>Columns (A) and (B).</T3> Report in Column (A) the number of displacementsduring the report year. Report in Column (B) the total amount representedby the displacements reported in Column (A).<T3>Line 7A</T3> is a new line item for reporting the business reestablishmentexpense payment.<T3>Lines 7A and 9, Column (B).</T3> Report in Column (B) the amount ofcosts that were included in the total amount approved on Lines 6 and 8,Column (B).<T3>Lines 12 A and B.</T3> Report in Column (A) the number of householdsdisplaced by project or program activities which were provided assistancein accordance with section 206(a) of the Uniform Act. Report in Column(B) the total financial assistance under section 20; (a) allocable to thehouseholds reported in Column (A). (If a household received financial assistanceunder section 203 or section 204 as well as under section 20; (a) of theUniform Act, report the household as a displacement in Column (A), butin Column (B) report<T3> only</T3> the amount of financial assistance allocable to section206(a). For example, if a tenant-household receives a payment of $7,000to rent a replacement dwelling, the sum of $5,250 shall be included onLine 10, Column (B), and $1,750 shall be included on Line 12B, Column (B).)<T3>Line 13.</T3> Report on Line 13 all administrative costs incurred duringthe report year in connection with providing relocation advisory assistanceand services under section 205 of the Uniform Act.<T3>Line 15.</T3> Report on Line 15 the total number of relocation appealsfiled during the fiscal year by aggrieved persons.Part C. Real property acquisition subject to Uniform Act<T3> Line 16, Columns (A) and (B).</T3> Report in Column (A) all parcelsacquired during the report year where title or possession was vested inthe acquiring agency during the reporting period. (Include parcels acquiredwithout Federal financial assistance, if there was or will be Federal financialassistance in other phases of the project or program.) Report in Column(B) the total of the amounts paid, deposited in court, or otherwise madeavailable to a property owner pursuant to applicable law in order to vesttitle or possession in the acquiring agency.<T3>Line 17.</T3> Report on Line 17 the number of parcels reported on Line16 that were acquired by condemnation where price disagreement was involved.<ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4910-22-M001</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-4543 Filed 3-1-89; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4910-22-C</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>